BUSINESS  ACTIONS  REDUCING
GREENHOUSE  GAS  EMISSIONS

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JUNE  8,  2005

Serial No. 109–16

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

21–708PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
DENNIS  MOORE,  Kansas

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

June  8,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Sherwood  L.  Boehlert,  Chairman,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Bart  Gordon,  Minority  Ranking  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Judy  Biggert,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  En-
ergy, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ...........................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Com-
mittee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ............................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Committee
on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................................................

Witnesses:

Mr.  James  E.  Rogers,  Chairman,  CEO,  and  President,  Cinergy  Corporation
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Mack  McFarland,  Environmental  Manager,  Fluorochemicals  Business,

E.I. DuPont De Nemours and Company

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Ronald  E.  Meissen,  Senior  Director,  Engineering,  Environment,  Health

& Safety, Baxter International, Inc.

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Robert  H.  Hobbs,  Director  of  Operations,  United  Technologies  Research

Center, United Technologies Corporation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr.  Mack  McFarland,  Environmental  Manager,  Fluorochemicals  Business,
E.I. DuPont De Nemours and Company ............................................................

(III)

9
9

9
10

11

10

11

12
14
20

21
22
24

25
27
32

33
34
38
39

68

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement  of  Tom  Catania,  Vice  President  of  Government  Relations,  Whirl-
pool Corporation ...................................................................................................
Climate  Change  Science:  An  Analysis  of  Some  Key  Questions,  Committee
on the Science of Climate Change, National Research Council, The National
Academies .............................................................................................................

Page

70

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

BUSINESS  ACTIONS  TO  REDUCE
GREENHOUSE  GAS  EMISSIONS

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  8,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:10  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Sherwood  L.
Boehlert [Chairman of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Business Actions to Reduce
Greenhouse Gas Emissions

WEDNESDAY, JUNE 8, 2005

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

Purpose

On June 8, 2005, the Science Committee will hold a hearing on what several lead-
ing businesses in a variety of industries are doing to reduce emissions of greenhouse
gases.

The  Bush  Administration  has  initiated  a  number  of  programs  to  encourage  busi-
nesses to take voluntary actions to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases. Either as
part  of  the  Administration  programs  or  other  efforts,  many  U.S.  companies  are
working  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  (See  attached  list.)  Some  companies
have  begun  simply  by  taking  stock  of  the  emissions  they  produce.  Others  have  set
targets for reducing their emissions and are taking steps to meet them by improving
energy efficiency, switching to energy sources that produce fewer greenhouse gases,
or eliminating greenhouse gases from manufacturing processes.

The  motivations  of  these  companies  vary.  Some  find  the  scientific  evidence  of  a
changing climate compelling. Others face domestic or international competitive pres-
sure,  while  others  face  pressure  from  lenders  or  shareholders.  Some  see  advantage
in  creating  new  products  or  businesses  that  may  hold  a  competitive  advantage  in
future markets. Still others see financial risk to their businesses should the climate
change substantially.

The  Committee  plans  to  explore  the  following  overarching  questions  at  the  hear-

ing:

1. What concrete actions are businesses taking to reduce greenhouse gas emis-

sions? In what ways are these actions beneficial to the company?

2. Why  are  businesses  taking  these  actions  and  what  are  the  most  important

drivers for them?

Witnesses
James  E.  Rogers,  Chairman,  CEO  and  President,  Cinergy  Corp.  Based  in  Cin-
cinnati,  Cinergy  provides  electricity  to  1.5  million  customers  in  Ohio,  Indiana  and
Kentucky, has more than 7,000 employees, and generated $4.7 billion of revenue in
2004. It owns 13,000 megawatts of electric generating capacity and is largely reliant
on  coal  as  a  fuel  source.  Cinergy  and  Duke  Power,  a  major  utility  in  the  Southeast
United States, recently announced plans to merge.
Dr.  Mack  McFarland,  Environmental  Manager,  Fluorochemicals  Business,  E.I.
DuPont de Nemours and Company. As a multinational chemical and product manu-
facturer  based  in  Delaware,  DuPont  ranks  66  among  the  Fortune  500,  with  55,000
employees worldwide and 2004 revenues of $27.3 billion.
Mr.  Ron  Meissen,  Senior  Director,  Engineering,  Environment,  Health  &  Safety;
Baxter  International  Inc.  Baxter  is  a  global  health  care  company  that  supports
treatment  of  medical  conditions  including  hemophilia,  immune  disorders,  kidney
disease,  cancer,  trauma  and  other  conditions.  Based  in  Deerfield,  Ill.,  and  with  fa-
cilities  throughout  the  United  States  and  the  rest  of  the  world,  Baxter  has  51,000
employees and generated $8.9 billion of sales in 2003.
Robert  Hobbs,  Director  of  Operations,  United  Technologies  Research  Center,
United  Technologies  Corporation  (UTC).  Ranked  22  among  the  Fortune  500  and
based  in  Connecticut,  UTC  businesses  include  Carrier  heating  and  cooling,  UTC
Fire  &  Security  systems,  Hamilton  Sundstrand  aerospace  systems  and  industrial
products,  Otis  elevators  and  escalators,  Pratt  &  Whitney  aircraft  engines,  Sikorsky
helicopters  and  UTC  Power  fuel  cells.  In  2004,  UTC  had  210,000  employees  and
generated $37 billion in revenue.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Background

4

Carbon  dioxide  (CO2)  is  a  greenhouse  gas  and  an  inevitable  product  of  combus-
tion. It is the greenhouse gas that has received the most attention, but others gases
such as methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons and sulfur hexafluoride are also
produced by human activities and have a greater greenhouse effect than CO2.

In  a  speech  in  February  2002,  President  Bush  ‘‘reaffirmed  America’s  commit-
ment. . .to  stabilize  atmospheric  greenhouse  gas  concentrations  at  a  level  that  will
prevent dangerous human interference with climate,’’ and initiated a number of vol-
untary  programs  aimed  at  reducing  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  Specifically,  the
President  has  committed  to  reducing  the  Nation’s  greenhouse  gas  intensity—the
amount  of  greenhouse  gases  emitted  per  unit  of  economic  activity—by  18  percent
by 2012. Several states and other countries have contemplated or are now attempt-
ing to implement mandatory emission-reduction policies.

In  May  2001,  the  Bush  White  House  requested  a  report  from  the  National  Acad-
emy  of  Sciences  on  the  status  of  scientific  understanding  of  climate  change.  The
Academy’s reply is attached.
What are companies doing to reduce their greenhouse gas emissions?

A number of United States-based businesses have begun to inventory and reduce
their  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  These  are  some  of  the  activities  companies  are  un-
dertaking:

Identifying  and  tracking  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  An  inventory  is  necessary  to
establish  a  company’s  baseline  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  It  is  usually  the  first
step  for  any  company  planning  to  set  a  reduction  target,  to  develop  options  for  re-
ducing emissions, and to track progress toward a target. It is also necessary for any
company  wishing  to  accurately  assess  the  risk  posed  by  any  particular  shareholder
resolution,  regulatory  proposal,  or  lending  policy  related  to  climate  change.  More-
over,  it  is  essential  for  companies  participating  in  voluntary  or  mandatory  green-
house  gas  trading  market.  According  to  economists,  trading  markets  would  lower
the costs of any future greenhouse gas regulation, should one be implemented.

Companies  have  developed  a  variety  of  approaches  for  inventorying  their  green-
house  gas  emissions.  While  all  companies  generally  include  direct  emissions  from
internal  operations,  they  must  also  decide  whether  to  include  indirect  emissions
generated  from  the  electricity  they  buy  or  from  the  products  they  sell.  Utilities,  for
example,  tend  to  count  only  those  emissions  that  are  directly  the  result  of  gener-
ating  electricity.  Energy  intensive  manufacturers,  however,  include  not  only  the
emissions  generated  in  their  manufacturing  processes,  but  also  usually  include  in
their inventories emissions generated by the electricity they purchase to power their
operations.  Appliance  manufacturers  and  other  companies  whose  largest  emissions
arise  from  the  use  of  their  products  often  include  those  emissions  in  their  inven-
tories.  Companies  participating  in  emissions  trading  markets  have  realized  that  it
is  important  to  maintain  careful  accounts  of  each  type  of  emission  to  avoid  double
counting or trading the same emissions twice. Most companies report that they have
developed their inventories through a ‘‘learn by doing’’ approach.

Setting targets for reduction. A number of companies have set targets for reducing
the  greenhouse  gas  emissions  in  their  inventory.  Some  have  set  targets  in  absolute
terms,  while  others  have  pledged  to  reduce  emissions  relative  to  production  or  rev-
enue.  Still  others  have  expressed  their  commitment  in  terms  of  cutting  energy  use.
Among  the  companies  that  have  set  absolute  emission  reduction  targets,  Nike  has
pledged to reduce greenhouse gas emissions 13 percent below its 1998 inventory by
2005.  DuPont  set  a  goal  (and  has  already  surpassed  it)  of  reducing  greenhouse  gas
emissions 65 percent below its 1990 inventory by 2010. Using the same target date
and  baseline  date,  Alcoa  has  pledged  a  25  percent  reduction,  British  Petroleum  10
percent, and Johnson & Johnson 7 percent. Eastman Kodak has committed to reduc-
ing its energy use 15 percent by 2004 below the amount it consumed in 2000.

Among companies that have pledged to reduce emissions relative to output or rev-
enue  rather  than  in  absolute  terms,  Pfizer  has  plans  to  reduce  its  greenhouse  gas
emissions  by  35  percent  for  every  dollar  in  revenue  the  company  earns  by  2007
using 2000 as its baseline year. Baxter International has pledged to make a 30 per-
cent reduction per unit of production value by 2005 using 1996 as its baseline year.
And  United  Technologies  Corporation  committed  to  a  40  percent  reduction  per  dol-
lar  of  revenue  by  2007  using  1997  as  its  baseline  and  has  already  met  that  target.
Improving  energy  efficiency.  Improving  energy  efficiency  reduces  greenhouse
gases, and may also save a company money. Some companies are improving the effi-
ciency  of  their  manufacturing  processes  or  their  lighting  and  heating  systems.  Re-
ductions  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  which  accompany  these  efficiency  gains,  are
often  viewed  as  a  bonus.  For  example,  United  Technologies  Corporation  and  IBM

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

have  found  that  energy  efficiency  provides  a  significant  opportunity  to  save  money
and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

Changing  manufacturing  processes.  Some  companies  are  altering  their  manufac-
turing process to reduce emissions of potent greenhouse gases such as nitrous oxide
or fluorocarbons. For example, DuPont met a substantial portion of its commitment
to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  reducing  emissions  of  nitrous  oxide  in  the
nylon manufacturing process. IBM pledged to reduce emissions of perfluorocarbons,
a  potent  greenhouse  gas,  by  40  percent  per  unit  of  production  (and  10  percent  in
absolute terms) from its semiconductor manufacturing operations.

Green power purchasing. In states that allow consumers to choose among utilities,
companies can reduce emissions by switching, in whole or in part, to ‘‘green power’’
suppliers, which generate electricity from renewable energy sources that do not emit
greenhouse gas, such as wind, solar, biomass, and geothermal. For example, Staples,
Bristol-Myers  Squibb  and  Johnson  &  Johnson  have  purchased  or  are  purchasing
‘‘green  power’’  that  allows  them  to  claim  significant  reductions  in  greenhouse  gas
emissions.

Sequestration. A number of businesses have been ‘‘road-testing’’ carbon sequestra-
tion  projects—the  long-term  storage  of  carbon  dioxide  in  its  organic  form  in  forests
or  soils,  or  in  liquid  form  in  the  ocean,  so  as  to  prevent  its  release  into  the  atmos-
phere.  For  example,  DTE  Energy,  Wisconsin  Energy  Corporation,  Georgia-Pacific,
and Weyerhaeuser, are working to enhance carbon sequestration in forests and soils
to offset their greenhouse gas emissions. American Electric Power and British Petro-
leum are developing technologies to sequester carbon dioxide in the ocean or in un-
derground, depleted oil and gas reservoirs, coal seams, or saline aquifers. Many sci-
entists  believe  that  there  is  much  still  to  learn  about  whether  the  carbon  dioxide
placed in these so-called carbon sinks can be considered to be permanently removed
from the atmosphere.
Why are companies reducing greenhouse gas emissions?

According  to  a  variety  of  recent  reports  that  have  surveyed  business  practices,1
businesses that are investing to reduce greenhouse gas emissions do so because they
believe such investments will help them compete.

Reducing  greenhouse  gases  can  make  a  company  more  competitive  in  a  variety
of  ways.  Actions  to  reduce  emissions  can  make  a  company  more  energy  efficient  or
can  lead  it  to  develop  new  products.  Such  advantages  can  benefit  a  company’s  bot-
tom line, even if the company never encounters pressure to reduce greenhouse gases
in the future.

Companies  also  decide  to  reduce  greenhouse  gases  as  a  way  to  manage  future
risks as many appear to view as real the possibility that shareholders, creditors, or
governments  may  some  day  require  them  to  reduce  their  emissions  of  greenhouse
gases. Some companies take the position that the scientific evidence that man-made
greenhouse  gas  emissions  may  be  harming  the  climate  is  credible.2 Others  are
‘‘hedging  their  bets’’  either  about  future  climate  change  or  about  future  constraints
on  emissions.  In  the  process,  some  companies  have  discovered  that  emission  reduc-
tions can in fact benefit them today. For example, while compiling a greenhouse gas
inventory,  some  companies  have  discovered  opportunities  to  improve  efficiency  that
they had not previously identified.

These  are  some  of  the  reasons  that  businesses  have  found  compelling  enough  to

justify their taking steps to inventory or reduce greenhouse gas emissions:

Increased  efficiency  saves  money.  Investments  in  energy  conservation  and  effi-
ciency can yield direct savings in energy costs and lower the per-unit cost of produc-
tion  for  some  companies.  For  example,  between  1990  and  2000  DuPont  held  its  en-
ergy  use  constant  while  boosting  its  production  by  35  percent,  saving  the  company
$2 billion. Efficiency and conservation are particularly valuable to companies whose

1 See  World  Resources  Institute,  ‘‘A  Climate  of  Innovation:  Northeast  Business  Action  to  Re-
duce  Greenhouse  Gas  Emissions,’’  (2004);  Pew  Center  on  Global  Climate  Change,  ‘‘Corporate
Greenhouse Gas Reduction Targets,’’ (2001); Kolk, A., and J. Pinske, ‘‘Market Strategies for Cli-
mate  Change,’’  European  Management  Journal,  22  (3):304–14  (2004);  Coalition  for  Environ-
mentally  Responsible  Economies  (Ceres),  ‘‘Electric  Power  Climate  Risk  Disclosure:  A  Compari-
son  of  2004  Reports  Released  by  American  Electric  Power,  Cinergy  and  TXU.’’  (2005).  In  addi-
tion, a number of companies have issued annual reports, which describe their actions to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions and their rationale.

2 The  aluminum  manufacturer  Alcoa,  Inc.,  has  said  on  its  website  that  ‘‘the  time  for  debate
is  long  past’’  and  that  while  ‘‘the  science  may  or  may  not  be  incomplete,  [i]f  you  get  this  one
wrong,  you  don’t  get  a  second  chance.’’  On  its  website,  British  Petroleum  says,  ‘‘There  is  an
emerging  consensus  that  climate  change  is,  at  least  in  part,  linked  to  the  production  and  con-
sumption  of  carbon  based  fuels.  As  a  major  supplier  of  these  fuels  it’s  only  right  that  we  play
a  part  in  finding  and  implementing  solutions  to  one  of  the  greatest  challenges  of  this  century.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

greenhouse gas emissions come from the energy purchased from electric utilities, as
reducing expenditures for electricity purchases can directly benefit such a company’s
bottom line.

Competitive advantages may go to innovators. A number of companies are betting
that  future  markets  will  favor  more  energy  efficient  products.  For  automobile  and
appliance manufacturers that make products that use electricity or that themselves
emit  greenhouse  gases,  creating  more  efficient  products  may  give  these  companies
a competitive advantage. It may also improve the public’s perception of the company
as being environmentally responsible. For example, a number of automakers are in-
vesting  in  hybrid  vehicle  technologies,  which  are  up  to  50  percent  more  efficient
than  conventional  gasoline  engines.  Whirlpool,  whose  products  are  responsible  for
95 percent of its greenhouse gas emissions, has committed to reducing the emissions
from its products by three percent between 1998 and 2008. General Electric recently
announced  plans  to  double  its  spending  on  developing  environmental  and  energy-
efficient products and to double revenue from those products to $20 billion by 2010.
Early  action  is  a  hedge  against  future  regulations  or  other  pressures.  Although
companies  are  facing  a  good  deal  of  investment  and  regulatory  uncertainty  sur-
rounding reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, some companies have decided that
acting  in  the  near-term  is  more  cost-effective  than  reacting  later  when  there  may
be  less  uncertainty,  but  potentially  higher  costs.  They  believe  that  beginning  to  re-
duce  emissions  now  and  continuing  steadily  over  time  will  be  cheaper  than  being
forced to make large reductions all at once in the future should it become necessary
to  do  so.  For  example,  companies  are  measuring  and  tracking  their  greenhouse  gas
emissions and participating in a variety of emissions trading programs to learn how
to  track  and  trade  emissions.  Dow  Corning  and  Baxter  International  are  two  of  a
number  of  companies  participating  in  the  Chicago  Climate  Exchange,  a  voluntary
market to demonstrate trading of CO2 emissions. These companies appear to believe
that  first-hand  knowledge  of  how  greenhouse  gas  markets  work  may  benefit  them
in the future.

Direct  financial  risk  from  climate  change.  Some  companies  face  direct  financial
risks  from  climate  change.  For  example,  insurance  companies  and  the  companies
that  reinsure  them  are  beginning  to  recognize  financial  risks  from  climate  change.
On its website, Swiss Re, one of the leading global reinsurers, says that ‘‘the world
of insurance and re-insurance will have to face a new challenge: developing and im-
plementing strategies and business solutions to deal with climate change and a car-
bon-constrained  future.’’  The  company  says  that  climate  change  may  alter  not  only
the average losses faced by insurers, but the range and annual fluctuations of those
losses.

Pressure  from  investors  and  lenders  to  reduce  risk.  Individual  and  institutional
shareholders as well as the lending arms of major financial institutions are increas-
ingly  concerned  with  the  risks  they  might  face  should  regulation,  public  perception
or  other  pressures  one  day  induce  companies  to  emit  fewer  greenhouse  gas  emis-
sions.  They  are  beginning  to  recognize  that  some  companies  within  a  given  sector
will likely perform better than others should reductions in greenhouse gas emissions
ever  be  required.  To  protect  the  future  value  of  their  stocks,  an  increasing  number
of investors have introduced shareholder resolutions calling on companies to develop
climate  change  strategies,  cut  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  invest  in  renewable  en-
ergy,  and  disclose  greenhouse  gas  information.  In  addition,  lending  institutions,
such as Bank of America and JPMorgan Chase, have committed to figuring out how
to  take  these  considerations  into  account  in  their  investment  decisions.  There  has
also been growth in specialized stock indices, such as the Dow Jones Sustainability
Index,  that  recognize  companies  that  are  taking  early  action  and  that  attract  some
investors seeking ‘‘green’’ stocks.

Influencing  the  policy  and  regulatory  debate.  Some  companies  believe  that  their
experience in applying various approaches to reducing greenhouse gases to their op-
erations  will  lend  credibility  to  their  efforts  to  shape  climate  policy.  For  example,
American  Electric  Power  has  committed  to  reduce  or  offset  emissions  by  four  per-
cent between 2003 and 2007 and is gaining real world experience in tracking, reduc-
ing  and  trading  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  participation  in  the  Chicago  Climate
Exchange.  These  actions,  the  company  has  said,  have  put  it  in  a  better  position  to
inform the current policy debate on climate change. Duke Power’s CEO recently an-
nounced steps that his company would take to reduce greenhouse gas emissions. In
addition,  in  an  attempt  to  influence  the  national  policy  debate,  he  also  called  for
an  economy-wide,  mandatory  carbon  tax  to  reduce  the  dependence  of  our  economy
on fossil fuels and thus lower greenhouse gas emissions.

Questions to the Witnesses

The witnesses were asked to respond in their testimony to the following questions:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

James Rogers, Cinergy

7

• What concrete actions is Cinergy taking to reduce greenhouse gas emissions?

In what ways are they beneficial to Cinergy?

• Why is Cinergy taking these actions and what are the most important drivers

for them?

Dr. Mack McFarland, Dupont

• What  concrete  actions  is  DuPont  taking  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions?

In what ways are they beneficial to DuPont?

• Why is DuPont taking these actions and what are the most important drivers

for them?

Ronald Meissen, Baxter International

• What concrete actions is Baxter Health Care taking to reduce greenhouse gas

emissions? In what ways are they beneficial to Baxter?

• Why is Baxter taking these actions and what are the most important drivers

for them?

Robert Hobbs, United Technologies Corporation

• What concrete actions is UTC taking to reduce greenhouse gas emissions? In

what ways are they beneficial to UTC?

• Why  is  UTC  taking  these  actions  and  what  are  the  most  important  drivers

for them?

The following companies are among those that are taking action to address
greenhouse gases. The lists include companies participating in the
Pew  Center’s  Business  Environmental  Leadership  Council  (BELC)
or  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency’s  (EPA)  Voluntary  Cli-
mate Leaders Program. Some companies participate in both.

According  to  the  Pew  Center’s  web  site,  members  of  the  Business  Environmental
Leadership  Council  (BELC)  are  taking  any  of  the  following  types  of  action  to  ad-
dress greenhouse gas emissions: set targets for emissions reductions; implement in-
novative energy supply and demand solutions; participate in emissions trading; and
invest  in  carbon  sequestration  opportunities  and  research.  They  also  agree  on  sev-
eral beliefs:

1. We  accept  the  views  of  most  scientists  that  enough  is  known  about  the
science  and  environmental  impacts  of  climate  change  for  us  to  take  actions
to address its consequences.

2. Businesses  can  and  should  take  concrete  steps  now  in  the  U.S.  and  abroad
to  assess  opportunities  for  emission  reductions,  establish  and  meet  emission
reduction objectives, and invest in new, more efficient products, practices and
technologies.

3. The Kyoto agreement represents a first step in the international process, but
more  must  be  done  both  to  implement  the  market-based  mechanisms  that
were  adopted  in  principle  in  Kyoto  and  to  more  fully  involve  the  rest  of  the
world in the solution.

4. We  can  make  significant  progress  in  addressing  climate  change  and  sus-
taining  economic  growth  in  the  United  States  by  adopting  reasonable  poli-
cies, programs and transition strategies.

According  to  EPA’s  Climate  Leaders  web  site,  EPA’s  Climate  Leaders  program  is
an  EPA  industry-government  partnership  that  works  with  companies  to  develop
long-term  comprehensive  climate  change  strategies.  Partners  set  a  corporate-wide
greenhouse  gas  (GHG)  reduction  goal  and  inventory  their  emissions  to  measure
progress.  By  reporting  inventory  data  to  EPA,  Partners  create  a  lasting  record  of
their  accomplishments.  Partners  also  identify  themselves  as  corporate  environ-
mental  leaders  and  strategically  position  themselves  as  climate  change  policy  con-
tinues to unfold.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3M
ABB
Air Products
Advanced Micro Devices, Inc.
Alcan Aluminum Corporation
Alcoa
American Electric Power
Ball Corporation
Baltimore Aircoil Company
Bank of America Corporation
Baxter International
Boeing
BP
California Portland Cement
Calpine
Caterpillar, Inc.
CH2M Hill
Cinergy Corp.
Cummins, Inc.
Deutsche Telekom
DTE Energy
DuPont
Eastman Kodak Company
EMC Corporation
Entergy
Exelon Corporation
Fetzer Vineyards
First Environment, Inc.
FPL Group, Inc.
Frito-Lay, Inc.
GAP Inc.
GE Transportation
General Motors Corporation
Georgia-Pacific
Green Mountain Energy Company
Hasbro, Inc.
Hewlett-Packard Company
Holcim
IBM
Intel
Interface, Inc.
International Paper
Johnson & Johnson
Johnson Controls, Inc.
John Hancock Financial Services
Lafarge North America Inc.
Lockheed Martin

8

Mack Trucks, Inc.
Marriott International, Inc.
Maytag
Melaver, Inc.
Miller Brewing Company
National Renewable Energy Laboratory
NiSource Inc.
Noble Corporation
Norm Thompson
Oracle Corporation
Outfitters, Inc.
Novartis
Ontario Power Generation
Pfizer Inc.
PG&E Corporation
Polaroid Corporation
Praxair, Inc.
PSEG
Quad/Graphics Inc.
Raytheon Company
Rio Tinto
Roche Group U.S. Affiliates
Rohm and Hass
Royal Dutch Shell
Shaklee Corporation
SC Johnson
St. Lawrence Cement
Staples, Inc.
STMicroelectronics
Sun Microsystems, Inc.
Sunoco
Target Corporation
Tenneco Automotive
The Collins Companies
The Hartford
Toyota
TransAlta
Tyson Foods, Inc.
U.S. Steel Corporation
United Technologies Corp.
Unilever HPC
Volvo Trucks North America, Inc.
We Energies
Weyerhaeuser
Whirlpool
Wisconsin Energy Corporation
Xerox Corporation

Source:
http://www.pewclimate.org/companies¥leading¥the¥way¥belc/company¥profiles/
http://www.epa.gov/climateleaders/partners/index.html

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

Chairman BOEHLERT. Good morning. It is a pleasure to welcome
everyone  here  this  morning  for  this  important  and,  I  hope,  eye-
opening hearing.

We  spend  a  lot  of  time  in  Washington  talking  about  what  might
or  might  not  be  done  about  climate  change  in  theory,  but  mean-
while,  out  in  the  ‘‘real  world,’’  real  companies  that  make  real
money, making real products for real people are taking action.

So  we  ought  to  be  sure  that  our  debate  here  is  informed  by  the
real  experience.  We  need  to  understand  why  your  companies  are
taking  steps  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  and  what  you
have learned through your actions.

I  don’t  want  to  say  much  more  than  that.  I  think  today’s  testi-
mony  speaks  for  itself,  and  my  own  views  on  climate  change  are
well known.

I  just  want  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  being  here  today.  I  think
that  you  and  your  companies  are  real  heroes.  You  are  taking  a
broad  view  while  still  remaining  hardheaded,  bottom  line-oriented
business  people  who  have  an  obligation  to  protect  your  companies.
But  you  are  putting  the  enlightened  back  in  self-interest.  Some-
where Adam Smith’s invisible hand is applauding.

I thank you for appearing today.
And  I  recognize  Mr.  Gordon  for  any  comments  he  might  care  to

make.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Boehlert follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN SHERWOOD L. BOEHLERT

It’s  a  pleasure  to  welcome  everyone  here  this  morning  for  this  important  and,  I
hope,  eye-opening  hearing.  We  spend  a  lot  of  time  in  Washington  talking  about
what might or might not be done about climate change—in theory—but meanwhile,
out  in  the  ‘‘real  world’’  real  companies  that  make  real  money  making  real  products
for real people are taking action.

So  we  ought  to  be  sure  that  our  debate  here  is  informed  by  that  real  experience.
We  need  to  understand  why  your  companies  are  taking  steps  to  reduce  greenhouse
gas emissions and what you’ve learned through your actions.

I  don’t  want  to  say  much  more  than  that.  I  think  today’s  testimony  speaks  for

itself, and my own views on climate change are well known.

I just want to thank our witnesses for being here today; I think that you and your
companies  are  real  heroes.  You’re  taking  a  broad  view,  while  still  remaining  hard-
headed, bottom-line oriented business people who have an obligation to protect your
companies.  But  you’re  putting  the  ‘‘enlightened’’  back  in  self-interest.  Somewhere
Adam Smith’s ‘‘invisible hand’’ is applauding.

Mr. Gordon.
Mr. GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and good morning. And
as usual, I concur with your remarks. And I want to thank you for
calling  this  hearing  on  the  voluntary  efforts  that  U.S.  businesses
are  making  to  improve  their  energy  efficiency  and  reduce  their
greenhouse gas emissions.

It is refreshing to hear something positive on this issue. The pro-
grams  these  companies  have  initiated  demonstrate  that  not  all  ef-
forts to reduce emissions result in economic losses or put our busi-
nesses at an economic disadvantage.

These programs are obviously not cost-free, but they appear to be
cost-effective.  The  firms  represented  here  have  made  investments
that are returning economic and environmental dividends.

The  voluntary  programs  undertaken  by  these  firms  and  others
can also help us to better understand how far current technologies

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

can take us in reducing greenhouse gases and what level of invest-
ment is required to achieve them.

Perhaps the experience gained through this type of voluntary ef-
fort will give us insights into the types of government research and
development efforts we should focus on and the type of adjustment
programs that might be needed to reduce the costs and improve the
effectiveness  of  technologies  that  reduce  energy  consumption  and
emissions.

So once again, thank you, Mr. Chairman, for calling this hearing,

and I look forward to hearing from our informed witnesses.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Gordon follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE BART GORDON

Good morning. Thank you, Mr. Chairman for calling this hearing on the voluntary
efforts  that  U.S.  businesses  are  making  to  improve  their  energy  efficiency  and  re-
duce their greenhouse gas emissions.

It is refreshing to hear something positive on this issue. The programs these com-
panies  have  initiated  demonstrate  that  not  all  efforts  to  reduce  emissions  result  in
economic losses or put our businesses at an economic disadvantage.

These  programs  are  obviously  not  cost  free,  but  they  appear  to  be  cost  effective.
The firms represented here have made investments that are returning economic and
environmental dividends.

The  voluntary  programs  undertaken  by  these  firms  and  others  can  also  help  us
to  better  understand  how  far  current  technologies  can  take  us  in  reducing  green-
house gases and what level of investment is required to achieve them.

Perhaps  the  experience  gained  through  this  type  of  voluntary  effort  will  give  us
insights  into  the  types  of  government  research  and  development  efforts  we  should
focus  on  and  the  type  of  adjustment  programs  that  might  be  needed  to  reduce  the
costs  and  improve  the  effectiveness  of  technologies  that  reduce  energy  consumption
and emissions.

These programs demonstrate that we have technologies available today to reduce
energy use and emissions. We may not be able to address all of our energy and envi-
ronmental  security  issues  through  voluntary  efforts  alone,  but  the  reductions
achieved  by  these  companies  show  that  we  can  begin  to  improve  our  energy  effi-
ciency.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  your  testimony  and  thank  you  for  appearing  before  the

Committee this morning.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Mr. Gordon.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

I want to thank Chairman Boehlert and Ranking Member Gordon for bringing the
issue  of  global  climate  change  and  the  control  of  greenhouse  gases  before  the  Com-
mittee  today.  I  appreciate  their  continued  leadership  on  science  and  environmental
policy issues.

I  am  pleased  to  hear  from  businesses  that  have  had  the  foresight  and  the  capa-
bility  to  begin  developing  suitable  and  equitable  approaches  in  solving  this  shared
problem of the control of greenhouse gases.

Business  leadership  is  necessary  if  we  are  to  avoid  further  catastrophic  effects  of

our actions on the environment.

of global climate change.

One  of  the  most  profound  challenges  we  face  in  the  21st  century  is  the  problem

Time and again, the world’s leading atmospheric scientists have warned us about
the  devastating  impact  of  climate  change.  We  now  have  irrefutable  proof  of  its  im-
pact on our economy, our way of life, our health and our children.

Because our country is leading the world in the output of those negative elements
that lead to climate change, I am embarrassed that we are one of the last industri-
alized nations to accept responsibility to clean up our environment.

I  realize  that  solutions  may  not  be  easy,  quick,  or  cheap;  however,  if  we  do  not
address this problem now, future costs will be measured in dire consequences to our
lives and our children’s lives.

Mr. Chairman, I want to acknowledge and applaud TXU and UPS for their clean
air  efforts  in  the  right  direction  in  my  district.  It  will  take  efforts  like  this  where

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

businesses,  based  on  their  own  set  of  values  and  their  sense  of  right  and  wrong,
will  step  up  to  the  plate  and  make  the  right  decisions  about  what  effect  their  com-
panies activities are having on the environment.

An  effective  program  to  fight  climate  change  need  not  involve  huge  increases  in
energy prices or draconian rules that choke industries and damage a company’s eco-
nomic well-being. There are immense business opportunities in creating approaches
to sustainable growth and development.

We must invest in the development of new technologies that will provide new and
environmentally  friendly  sources  of  energy  that  include  both  conventional  and  non-
conventional  energy  sources.  We  must  work  with  other  nations  in  a  cooperative
manner. A well-crafted strategy can address global climate change and maintain our
preeminent economic position in the world.

What gives me hope is the fact that the same science and technology that discov-
ered and produced the harmful effects of climate change is the same type of science
and  technology  that  Congress  and  businesses  can  depend  on  to  come  up  with  solu-
tions to the threat climate change poses.

In  Texas,  a  slight  change  in  the  average  temperature  has  already  begun  to  ad-
versely  affect  our  inland  and  marine  fisheries,  beaches,  forest  composition,  water
supply, agribusiness and health (more Lyme disease and asthma, for example).

The suffering is unacceptable and unnecessary in the richest and most innovative
country  in  the  world.  Increasing  health  care  costs  strain  an  already  struggling
health care system.

I urge all of my colleagues to look at this issue closely, and I am looking forward
to  working  with  businesses,  non-profits  and  my  colleagues  to  reduce  the  impact  of
carbon emissions from coal-burning plants, greenhouse gases, and other human-gen-
erated pollutants upon our citizens.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr. Chairman and Mr. Ranking Member, thank you for holding this hearing.
It  is  inspiring  to  hear  that  the  four  companies’  represented  before  us  have  been
able to simultaneously lower energy costs while voluntarily reducing greenhouse gas
emissions (GHG). The efforts of these companies should be applauded and imitated
by others.

The United States accounts for between one-fifth and one-fourth of current global
GHG  emissions  annually.  These  companies  have  volunteered  to  help  in  reducing
GHGs and in doing so have been positive examples. Yet, our nation as a whole has
a responsibility to address our role in GHG emissions and in the larger issue of cli-
mate change.

I  believe  we  can  do  more  in  the  area  of  reducing  emissions.  Earlier  this  year,  I
sponsored  an  amendment  to  the  Energy  Bill  that  would  offer  tax  credits  for  hybrid
vehicles  to  both  manufacturers  and  consumers.  I  hope  that  industry  and  govern-
ment  alike  can  examine  areas  where  everyone  can  work  together  to  reduce  green-
house gas emissions.

I welcome the witnesses to our committee today and look forward to hearing their

testimony. Thank you.

Biggert.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  And  our  distinguished  panel,  and  it  is  a
very distinguished panel. It consists of Mr. James R. Rogers, Chair-
man  and  CEO  and  President  of  Cinergy  Corporation;  Dr.  Mack
McFarland,  Environmental  Manager,  Fluorochemicals  Business,
E.I. DuPont de Nemours and Company.

And for the purpose of an introduction, the Chair recognizes Mrs.

Ms. BIGGERT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
It  is  a  privilege  for  me  to  introduce  Mr.  Ron  Meissen,  a  Senior
Director  at  Baxter  International  who  manages  the  company’s
worldwide  environment,  health,  and  safety  resources.  With  an
MBA  and  Bachelors  and  Masters  degree  in  civil  engineering,  Mr.
Meissen  is  a  30-year  employee  of  Baxter  Global  Health  Care  Com-
pany  that  produces  medical  supplies  and  biopharmaceuticals  for
the  treatment  of  hemophilia,  immune  disorders,  kidney  disease,
cancer, trauma, and other conditions. Baxter generated $8.9 billion

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

in  sales  in  2003  thanks  to  the  hard  work  of  51,000  employees  at
64  different  facilities  in  seven  states,  one  U.S.  territory,  and  nu-
merous foreign facilities in other countries.

Headquartered  in  my  home  state,  Baxter  is  one  of  Illinois’  great
corporate  citizens  in  part  because  of  its  commitment  to  reducing
energy consumption and associated greenhouse gas emissions. So I
would like to welcome Mr. Meissen to the hearing today.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield back.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much for that commercial.

It is a pleasure to have that introduction.

And our final witness, Dr. Robert Hobbs, Director of Operations,
United  Technologies  Research  Center,  United  Technologies  Cor-
poration.

And  I  just  might  add  that  all  of  these  witnesses  are  very  distin-
guished  in  their  careers  and  their  accomplishments,  and  I  very
much appreciate, gentlemen, you serving as resources for this com-
mittee,  because  we  have  so  much  to  learn  from  people  with  real-
life  experiences  in  the  ‘‘real  world.’’  Sometimes  we  are  insulated
from  the  ‘‘real  world,’’  so  we  welcome  the  ‘‘real  world’’  to  Capitol
Hill.

With that, let me start out with Mr. Rogers, who will be—oh, let
me  also  add  that  the  Whirlpool  Corporation  has  submitted  testi-
mony, and we appreciate that, for the record. (See Appendix 2: Ad-
ditional Material for the Record.)

Mr. Rogers, and all of the witnesses, your full statements will ap-
pear  in  their  entirety  in  the  record.  We  would  ask  that  you  try  to
summarize  your  remarks,  which  will  afford  us  ample  opportunity
to sort of pick your brains some more.

Mr. Rogers, welcome.

STATEMENT OF MR. JAMES E. ROGERS, CHAIRMAN, CEO, AND

PRESIDENT, CINERGY CORPORATION

Mr. ROGERS. Thank you, and good morning.
I appreciate the opportunity on behalf of Cinergy to testify today
at  what  I  hope  will  be  a  series  of  hearings  on  the  issue  of  global
warming.

My name is Jim Rogers. I am the CEO of Cinergy. We serve ap-
proximately 1.5 million customers in Ohio, Indiana, and Kentucky.
As you know, we have recently announced a merger with Duke En-
ergy, which is headquartered in Charlotte, North Carolina.

As  a  Midwest  utility,  coal  fuels  most  of  our  generating  plants.
We burn approximately 30 million tons of coal a year. That makes
us  the  fifth  largest  consumer  of  coal.  And  despite  this  utilization
of  coal,  which  is  one  of  our  greatest  resources  in  this  country,  we
recently, in fact, in 2003, announced a voluntary commitment to re-
duce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  to  five  percent  below  our  2000  lev-
els and to do this by the period 2010 to 2012.

To  reach  that  goal,  we  are  going  to  spend  over  $21  million  on  a
variety  of  projects  that  we  anticipate,  with  these  projects,  cutting
about 30 million tons of greenhouse gas emissions.

We  are  not  alone  in  this  country  in  industrial  America  in  terms
of  working  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  There  are  94  For-
tune 500 companies that are working today to reduce emissions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

The  question  you  are  probably  asking  yourself  is:  ‘‘Why  would  a
primarily  coal-burning  utility  in  the  Midwest  take  on  such  a  com-
mitment?’’ And as I think about it, I look back over the last decade
and we spent $1.7 billion to reduce the emissions of SOΧ, NOΧ, and
Mercury from our plants. We are looking, over the next five years,
to  spend  roughly  $1.8  billion  to  reduce  SOΧ,  NOΧ,  and  Mercury
from our plants.

My  position  and  our  company’s  position  on  the  issue  of  global
warming  has  evolved.  This  is  not  an  overnight  recognition  on  our
part. We have opportunities for research and participate in domes-
tic  and  international  economic  and  environmental  discussions,  and
from  these  various  vantagepoints,  we  have  come  to  believe  several
things.  One  is  the  world  is  warming.  Two,  human  activities  have
contributed  to  the  warming.  Thirdly,  and  this  is  the  part  that
needs  more  work,  it  is  not  clear,  and  I  don’t  think  we  fully  under-
stand what the impact should be.

But understanding all of that, it has led us to the conclusion that
the  prudent  path  at  this  point  in  time  is  to  take  actions  today  to
prepare to live in a carbon-constrained world tomorrow.

But the question you have to ask is, and I have asked myself is:
‘‘What  if  we  were  wrong.  What  if  the  scientists  that  say  this  is  a
problem are wrong? Will the steps we have taken be inappropriate?
Will it leave the world in a worse spot than it would have been oth-
erwise?’’

And  I  believe  the  answer  is  simply  this.  As  we  work  to  reduce
greenhouse gas emissions, we will work to create environmentally-
friendly  technologies.  We  will  be  pursuing  methods  of  saving  en-
ergy  far  more  efficiently  than  we  have  before.  We  will  be  working
in  this  country  to  lower  our  dependency  on  foreign  oil  by  encour-
aging the development of numerous auto fuel sources. These advan-
tages can shape our economy into one that is cleaner and more self-
reliant, and who can argue with that outcome?

In our 2004 annual report, we did something quite different. We
focused on the issue of global warming. And the headline was, ‘‘Can
we  find  common  ground?’’  So  rather  than  rely  on  all  of  the  smart
people,  the  scientists,  and  all  of  the  others,  we  went  to  the  people
who have a stake in our company: the investors, the employees, the
customers, policy-makers. And we asked them: ‘‘How should we, as
a company, be thinking about this issue?’’

And  I  would  urge  you  to  look  at  our  website,  because  you  could
see  our  annual  report  there,  and  you  could  look  at  what  people
were  saying.  But  let  me  quickly  tell  you  the  signposts  that  have
motivated us to deal with this issue.

One  signpost  is  the  states  are  increasingly  taking  on  the  role  of
regulation of greenhouse gas emissions. Just look across this coun-
try, and there are over eight states that are now either registering
your CO2 emissions or looking at ways to regulate it.

Congress  is  continuing  to  look  at  this  issue  as  signpost  two.  Not
only  is  this  committee  addressing  how  businesses  are  reacting  to
global  warming,  the  Senate,  as  you  know,  has  been  tackling  the
issue in a number of ways.

We  believe  that  the  Clear  Skies  legislation  that  is  now  pending,
this  multi-emission  legislation,  is  stalled  because  of  the  lack  of
progress on carbon.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

The  third  signpost  that  we  see  is  that  Kyoto  was  approved,  and
we believe that can have possible trade implications going forward.
And  the  fourth  point  that  I  would  highlight  is  that  our  share-
holders  are  increasingly  asking  companies  to  quantify  their  green-
house gas emissions. Several years ago, we had a shareholder pro-
posal,  and  that  has  helped  stimulate  and  accelerate  our  thinking
on these important issues.

The  other  signpost  I  would  mention  is  that  trading  markets  are
developing  both  here  and  abroad,  and  so  smart  people  that  make
money  from  having  markets  develop  are  already  anticipating  that
this is going to be an issue and that there will be a trading of emis-
sion allowances from reduction of CO2.

And  the  last  point  I  would  make  is  as  you  look  around  our  soci-
ety,  look  at  the  movies,  look  at  the  books,  and  look  at  the  cover  of
Business Week and the cover of National Geographic, it is all about
global  warming.  It  is  in  the  consciousness  of  people  across  this
country.

So our—my challenge to you, and the challenge that we have, is
to  find  a  way  to  reduce  emissions,  to  find  a  way  to  invest  more  in
technology,  and  to  make  sure  that  we  have  technology  to  do  that.
And  I  would  say  in  conclusion  that  we  have  invested  in  IGCC
coal  gasification.  We  were  one  of  two  companies  that  participated
in  a  project  in  the  early  1990s.  We  built  a  coal  gasification  facility
using  Dow  technology.  And  we  are  currently  in  negotiation  with
GE  and  Bechtel  to  build  another  coal  gasification.  We  believe  that
is an important technology to allow us to utilize one of the greatest
resources we have in this country, and that is coal.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Rogers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES E. ROGERS

Good  Morning.  My  name  is  Jim  Rogers,  I  am  Chairman,  CEO  and  President  of
Cinergy.  Cinergy  was  formed  ten  years  ago  by  the  combination  of  PSI  Energy  in
Indiana  and  Cincinnati  Gas  &  Electric.  As  you  know,  Cinergy  also  recently  an-
nounced a merger with Duke Energy based in Charlotte, North Carolina.

Let  me  tell  you  a  bit  about  our  company  before  I  explore  our  interest  in  green-

house gas emission policies.

Cinergy  serves  approximately  1.5  million  customers  in  Ohio,  northern  Kentucky
and  much  of  Indiana.  We  operate  nine  coal-fired  generating  stations  that  burn  al-
most 30 million tons of coal per year.

As  a  Midwest  utility  Cinergy  has  ample  access  to  coal.  And  with  rising  natural
gas prices, coal is the most economical choice for supplying our customers with elec-
tricity.  Despite  our  generating  choice,  in  2003  Cinergy  committed  to  reducing  our
greenhouse gas emissions to five percent below 2000 levels during the period of 2010
and  2012.  To  reach  that  goal  we  are  spending  $21  million  to  fund  projects  through
the  remainder  of  the  decade.  We  plan  on  reaching  the  goal  despite  a  growing  de-
mand  for  electricity  in  our  region,  and  taking  into  account  the  electricity  penalty
we  will  realize  when  the  bulk  of  our  generating  units  are  outfitted  with  pollution
control  equipment  to  meet  new  Environmental  Protection  Agency  regulatory  re-
quirements.

All  in  all  we  expect  that  we  will  need  to  cut  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  a  total

of 30 million tons.

While  electric  rates  in  the  Midwest  are  likely  to  increase  as  a  result  of  pollution
control  expenditures  to  reduce  sulfur  dioxide,  nitrogen  oxide  and  mercury,  no  in-
creases will be due to our carbon commitment.

We  made  our  decision  to  reduce  GHG  emissions  despite  the  fact  that  there  cur-
rently  is  no  commercially  viable  method  of  capturing  and  sequestering  carbon  from
coal fired power plants. However there are new technologies on the horizon and re-
search  on  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  applications  will  and  must  continue  to
keep coal a viable and necessary fuel for the future.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

In  fact,  Cinergy  is  completing  a  feasibility  study  on  the  construction  of  an  Inte-
grated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle  power  plant  (IGCC)—the  state  of  the  art  coal
plant  technology  available  to  us  today.  It  is  relatively  easier  and  less  energy  inten-
sive  to  capture  CO2 from  an  IRC’s  high  pressure  synthesis  gas  than  from  conven-
tional  pulverized  coal  flue  gas.  In  addition,  sulfur  dioxide,  nitrogen  oxide  and  mer-
cury  emissions  are  substantially  reduced  with  IGCC  technology  and  because  it  is
more efficient even without carbon capture components, it does reduce carbon emis-
sions.

According to industry analysts’ estimates, the cost of IGCC is 10–20 percent more
then traditional pulverized coal. Those costs will come down, however, if the appro-
priate incentives are made available and we are able to deploy five or more facilities
over  the  next  decade.  It  is  also  a  technology  that  is  a  necessary  component  of  any
international  technology  transfer  program.  Developing  countries  that  today  operate
plants  without  even  the  simplest  of  pollution  control  equipment  can  with  tech-
nologies such as IGCC begin reducing all emissions more efficiently and completely.
Let  me  turn  to  the  subject  at  hand.  Why  has  Cinergy  taken  on  this  commitment

and why expend so much attention on greenhouse gas emissions?

I spend a good deal of my time, not just in running the company—but also in re-
searching  and  participating  in  domestic  and  international  economic  and  environ-
mental  conferences  so  that  I  can  appropriate  the  wisdom  from  those  venues  back
to  our  shareholders  and  all  of  our  stakeholders.  Over  the  past  several  years  I  have
developed a better understanding of climate change and I see the debate in the sci-
entific  world  honing  in  on  a  few  basic  facts:  that  the  world  is  warming  and  that
human activities have contributed to the warming. What the impacts will be I don’t
think we yet fully understand.

Because  of  this,  I  believe  people  increasingly  will  believe  that  greenhouse  gas
emissions should be reduced and that actions should begin today to prepare for that
eventuality.

But  what  if  I  and  the  multitude  of  scientists  and  industries  agreeing  with  that
premise  are  wrong?  If  we  approach  this  issue  appropriately,  then  we  will  have
worked  to  create  new  environmentally  friendly  technologies,  pursued  methods  of
saving energy far more efficiently and work to lower our dependence on foreign oil.
We  will  have  advanced  to  a  multitude  of  fuel  sources  and  technological  configura-
tions  that  will  help  move  our  economy  into  a  cleaner  and  more  self  reliant  future.
And I don’t know anyone that can argue effectively against that outcome.

Let  me  share  with  you  some  of  what  I  call  signposts  that  I  have  observed  over
the  past  several  years  which  helped  guide  me  to  the  development  of  our  position
today.  We  published  these  signposts  in  our  2004  annual  report  because  we  chose
not  to  ignore  the  issue  of  greenhouse  gases  but  to  address  it  in  a  positive  manner.
Signpost #1
The states are taking action

Four  states  have  an  overall  cap  on  GHG  emissions  and  two  have  a  cap  on  power
plant  CO2 emissions.  Eight  states  regulate  GHG  emissions.  And,  eight  states  have
filed  suits  against  Cinergy  and  four  other  utilities  to  curb  their  GHG  emissions,
while others are involved in suits with EPA over the need to regulate carbon.

A coalition of nine northeast states has initiated the regional greenhouse gas ini-

tiative which would create a regional market based cap and trade program.

Governor Schwarzenegger of California an executive order identifying a goal to re-

duce emissions including:

produced in 2000.

• By  the  year  2010,  to  reduce  California’s  GHG  emissions  to  less  than  those
• By 2020, to reduce GHG emissions below 1990 levels.
• By 2050, reduce overall emissions a full 80 percent below 1990 levels.

other waste.

He  noted  that  the  state  is  going  to  accelerate  the  timetable  to  get  more  energy

from renewable sources 20 percent by 2010 and a third by 2020.

These  sources  include  solar,  wind,  geothermal,  and  biomass  from  agriculture  and

The state’s fleet of government vehicles, all 70,000 of them, will be replaced with

hybrids.
Signpost #2
An  increasing  number  of  Members  of  Congress  are  expressing  concern
about global warming.

While  in  1997  the  U.S.  Senate  voted  to  reject  the  Kyoto  Protocol,  that  did  not
mean  they  were  rejecting  the  issue.  I  think  that  it  is  important  to  remember  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

the  ratified  1992  Agreement  of  the  Parties  has  an  objective  of  stabilizing  atmos-
pheric greenhouse gas concentrations ‘‘at a level that prevents dangerous anthropo-
genic interference with the climate system’’ has never been refuted.

Senators  McCain  and  Lieberman  have  introduced  and  modified  their  climate  re-
duction  proposal  and  those  voting  favorably  have  increased  even  though  there  are
still not enough votes to pass the Senate.

Multi-Emissions legislation, which I have championed for years, sadly can’t move
past  the  Senate  Environmental  and  Public  Works  Committee  because  the  issue  of
climate  remains  unresolved.  That  hurts  the  utility  industry  and  its  customers  be-
cause also unresolved are rules that regulate sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxide and mer-
cury  as  well—all  which  will  undoubtedly  cost  rate  payers  millions  in  unneeded  ex-
penditures because the roadmap for an eventual solution to those issues will be tied
up in courts for years.
Signpost #3
Kyoto has been approved by 38 Industrial nations this year.

Europe  wants  to  accelerate  GHG  mitigation  and  some  countries,  including  Tony
Blair  with  whom  I  met  yesterday,  are  interested  in  exploring  what  lies  beyond
Kyoto’s 2012 expiration.

I think that it is also important to consider that while industry in Europe is man-
dated  to  deal  with  emissions  reductions,  that  issue  could  become  increasingly
confrontational  in  trade  discussions  as  the  lack  of  a  U.S.  policy  could  possibly  be
considered a trade subsidy.
Signpost #4
A  growing  number  of  shareholders  are  asking  companies  to  quantify  the
risks associated with GHG emissions.

Increasingly  investor  groups  are  asking  utilities  and  other  companies  to  quantify
their  GHG  emission  risks  and  to  determine  what  steps  are  being  taken  to  manage
those risks.

The  assets  of  socially  responsible  mutual  funds  are  growing  faster  then  the  mu-

tual fund industry as a whole.

And,  the  California  Public  Employee  Retirement  System  (CalPERS)  announced
that  it  will  sign  onto  the  Global  Carbon  Disclosure  Project,  an  international  effort
to improve the transparency of business risks associated with climate change.
Signpost #5
CO2 and GHG emissions trading markets are developing in Europe and the
U.S.

The  EU  initiated  its  emissions  trading  scheme  this  year  and  facilitates  the  trad-

ing of CO2 allowances among 12,000 EU industrial installations.

The  Chicago  Climate  Exchange  established  in  2003,  has  grown  from  13  to  85

members.
Signpost #6
Global Warming is becoming part of our everyday consciousness.

2004.

The  issue  served  as  cover  stories  for  Business  Week  and  National  Geographic  in

And  this  past  Saturday’s  New  York  Times  included  a  front  page  story  discussing
world-wide technology advances in energy efficiency. The story highlighted countries
that have outperformed the U.S., from Japan with its newly manufactured kilowatt
saving  refrigerators  and  air  conditioners  to  Germany  with  its  impressive  new  fuel
efficient  homes  and  to  Singapore  which  is  placing  new  restrictions  on  autos  to  en-
courage increased bus and rail usage.

Increasingly, U.S. businesses are stepping up to take action. Not just in the utility
industry but if you look at the President’s voluntary climate reduction program, nu-
merous  business  have  made  commitments  to  reduce  emissions.  Even  Exxon-Mobile
is  now  advertising  voluntary  actions  it  is  taking  to  reduce  its  impact  on  climate
trapping emissions.

But  what  does  all  of  this  domestic  and  international  activity  mean  for  the  U.S.?
While other countries are incentivizng new technologies in a comprehensive fashion,
we  are  arguing  about  what  to  do.  And  where  will  those  other  countries  take  those
technologies? To China which according to the New York Times consumes 11.5 times
the energy of Japan to produce the same industrial output.

Despite  the  fact  that  Japan  is  far  from  meeting  its  Kyoto  target—it  is  already
moving from industry to home and automobile—in attempts to dramatically increase
efficiency  and  alternative  vehicle  use.  And  who  is  dominating  the  world  market  on
hybrid vehicle sales? The Japanese car manufacturers. Meanwhile Japan has nearly

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

tripled its industrial output from 1973 to today while keeping its overall energy con-
sumption roughly flat.

While the world is deploying leapfrogging technology in an effort to deal with cli-
mate  change,  the  U.S.  lags  sorely  behind;  concerned  that  movement  to  address  the
climate issue might create some kind of economic instability.

So how do you and we in industry alter the climate paradigm?
I  think  that  it  will  require  a  number  of  steps—smaller  steps  then  embracing

Kyoto that will set us on the right path.

First,  again,  there  are  aspects  of  climate  science  that  are  indisputable  even

thought significant additional scientific work remains to refine the unknowns.

Æ CO2 is at its highest concentrations in the past 400,000 years
Æ The Earth is getting warmer
Æ The warming is caused by a combination of human and natural processes.

Second,  I  think  that  we  have  all  recognized  that  Kyoto  was  a  10,000  pound  go-
rilla,  and  too  much  for  the  U.S.  to  tackle.  As  a  result,  I  think  that  it  is  important
to eliminate the linkage between any kind of carbon reduction policy and Kyoto.

While I believe that the best approach to climate is an economy wide approach—
I think the path there may need to be more creative and perhaps even incremental
in  order  to  demonstrate  the  ability  to  control  emissions  in  an  economically  viable
way.

Whatever  emission  reduction  approach  is  adopted,  I  believe  that  coupling  it  with
legitimate  methods  of  advancing  technology  is  crucial.  I  know  that  this  committee
focuses on Research and Development. I believe that taking a hard look at what pro-
grams  are  funded  and  what  can  be  jump-started  in  order  to  bring  them  closer  to
commercial  adaptation  is  important.  Much  of  the  discussion  on  R&D  tends  to  focus
on  the  R  and  not  so  much  on  the  D—development  or  what  I  think  we  need  to  see
is Deployment. Getting these technologies into the marketplace earlier and more ef-
fectively is an issue that I believe is often overlooked.

And,  I  think  that  beyond  traditional  government  programs,  the  development  of
technology  funds  to  help  offset  the  costs  of  meeting  emission  reduction  targets  can
work, not only by spreading out the cost of those targets throughout the entire econ-
omy but by also helping the U.S. regain the lost momentum to lead the energy effi-
ciency technology race. Ideas abound about how to fund these off budget—and they
may  not  be  practical  right  now—however  beginning  the  discussion  is  important  if
optimal  solutions  to  meeting  a  greenhouse  gas  reduction  target  are  to  be  utilized.
Third, I also think it’s important to greatly simplify the implementation of taking
on emission reduction commitments. As a Utility company executive I am mystified
each  and  every  time  the  issue  of  meeting  climate  reduction  programs  or  even  the
development of a voluntary registration of emissions arises, with it surfaces the host
of  issues  that  makes  a  solution  all  but  impossible.  How  do  you  deal  with  past  ac-
tions, additionality, every household and homeowner taking on a commitment? The
Answer: Don’t.

Let’s  not  follow  the  complicated  example  of  our  friends  across  the  ‘‘pond’’  that
have developed hundreds of varying allocation rules for every industry or fuel type.
Keep  it  simple.  Make  a  forward  looking  commitment,  meet  it  and  if  you  go  below
it—allow those tons to be used to trade with others.

And  finally  as  the  Committee  continues  to  examine  greenhouse  gas  emissions  I
would  urge  you  to  be  creative.  This  commitment  in  my  own  company  has  empow-
ered  our  employees  to  creatively  address  how  best  to  meet  that  commitment.  The
Acid  Rain  Program  reforms  to  command  and  control  regulations  helped  minimize
the  role  of  the  government  in  business  decisions  and  unleashed  the  power  of  the
market by making reductions a good investment. This is the one of the economically
efficient  paths  forward.  To  take  another  approach  provides  naysayers  with  the  un-
wavering momentum that challenges the possibility of forward movement.

I believe that the country needs leadership in this area. I don’t believe that I am
being  disloyal  to  the  President  whom  I  support,  to  Congress  or  to  my  shareholders
when I say that the time is now to move positively toward reachable goals that will
not  only  put  us  on  track  to  operate  in  a  greenhouse  constrained  environment,  but
on a track that will also make this country the technological leader it once was and
can be again.
Measuring Baseline GHG Emissions

The  table  below  summarizes  Cinergy’s  baseline  2000  GHG  emissions.  Cinergy  is
reporting  corporate-wide  GHG  emissions  that  include  all  of  Cinergy’s  business  ac-
tivities.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

Cinergy GHG Goal Reductions

Cinergy  chose  to  adopt  a  voluntary  GHG  emissions  cap  of  five  percent  below
Cinergy’s 2000 GHG emissions for the period 2010 through 2012 because we wanted
to emphasize on-system GHG reductions. Cinergy could have chosen a different goal
such as committing to reduce our GHG emissions one (1) percent per year beginning
2004. However, such a commitment would probably have to be met through the pur-
chasing  of  offsets.  To  identify,  design,  and  implement  on-system  reductions  will  re-
quire  a  certain  amount  of  lead-time.  Cinergy  believes  that  the  results  of  on-system
reductions will be much more beneficial to the Company and to the electric industry
in  general.  Cinergy  designed  its  GHG  goal  to  provide  an  opportunity  for  the  Com-
pany  to  first  explore  implementation  of  cost-effective  on-system  methods  of  reduc-
tions.

Part of Cinergy’s GHG Management Goal was a pledge to spend up to $21 million
on  CO2 reducing  and  offsetting  projects  from  2004  to  2010.  In  2004  and  2005
Cinergy allocated $3 million in each year to various projects designed to reduce, off-
set,  or  provide  research  in  the  reduction  of  Cinergy’s  CO2  emissions.  The  projects
selected by the internal Cinergy GHG Management Committee included:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

Prior to 2004 Cinergy has implemented a number of projects and activities specifi-
cally  for  the  reduction  of  GHG  emissions  or  for  other  business  reasons  that  have
reduced or offset our GHG emissions in the following areas:

• Power plant efficiency
• Combined heat and power
• Landfill gas capture and electric generation
• End-user energy conservation
• Renewable energy generation
• Terrestrial sequestration
• SF6 usage reduction
• Fly ash reuse
• Materials recycling

These  past  and  future  projects  and  activities  that  are  not  directly  connected  to

the expenditure of the $21 million will continue to reduce GHG emissions.

The table below presents the amount of GHG reductions or offsets for each of the

project categories. Emission reductions for 2004 are still being calculated.

The table below provides aggregated data for Cinergy’s GHG emissions and reduc-
tions  for  the  years  2001  through  2003.  Data  for  2004  is  still  being  aggregated.  The
company’s reduction target is based on Cinergy’s baseline emissions that include its
large generating plants, non-regulated generating plants, combined heat and power

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

plants, fugitive natural gas emissions, SF6 emissions, and emissions from fleet vehi-
cles.

20

The  reader  should  not  assume  that  Cinergy  has  already  met  its  GHG  goal  of  re-
ducing  its  GHG  emissions  more  than  the  five  percent  below  our  2000  GHG  emis-
sions. While Cinergy’s GHG emissions were below our year 2000 corporate baseline
emissions  of  more  than  73  million  tons,  the  lower  emissions  are  due  to  the  slow
economy in 2001 and 2002 and mild summer and winter weather in 2002 and 2003.
GHG  emissions  in  2003  were  higher  because  of  increased  economic  activity.  The
slow economy and mild weather lowered demand for electricity so Cinergy generated
less  and  therefore  lower  associated  GHG  emissions.  Cinergy  cannot  predict  future
weather or economic conditions with absolute certainty. Cinergy uses internal mod-
els to project electricity demand into the future. Based on certain scenarios modeled
during  evaluation  of  the  Cinergy  GHG  goal,  Cinergy  anticipates  that  the  demand
for  electricity  will  grow  and  that  our  GHG  emissions  will  exceed  our  2000  baseline
emissions  anywhere  from  one  million  tons  to  more  than  12  million  tons  annually
during the 2010 through 2012 time period.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JAMES E. ROGERS

Mr.  Rogers,  57,  has  been  CEO  for  more  than  16  years—at  PSI  and  now  at
Cinergy.  Prior  to  the  formation  of  Cinergy,  he  joined  PSI  Energy,  Inc.,  in  1988  as
the  company’s  Chairman,  President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer.  Prior  to  joining
PSI,  he  was  Executive  Vice  President,  Interstate  Pipelines  for  the  Enron  Gas  Pipe-
line  Group.  Before  joining  Enron  Corp.,  Mr.  Rogers  was  a  partner  in  the  Wash-
ington, D.C. office of Akin, Gump, Strauss, Hauer & Feld (a law firm based in Dal-
las, Texas). He represented energy companies before the Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission  (FERC),  the  Department  of  Energy,  various  Congressional  committees
and federal courts.

Immediately  before  joining  Akin,  Gump,  Strauss,  Hauer  &  Feld,  Mr.  Rogers  was
Deputy  General  Counsel  for  Litigation  and  Enforcement  of  the  FERC.  In  this  posi-
tion  he  directed  all  aspects  of  the  FERC’s  litigation  and  enforcement.  Previously,
Mr.  Rogers  served  as  Assistant  to  the  Chief  Trial  Counsel  at  the  FERC,  as  a  Law
Clerk  for  the  Supreme  Court  of  Kentucky,  and  as  Assistant  Attorney  General  for
the  Commonwealth  of  Kentucky,  where  he  acted  as  intervener  on  behalf  of  State
consumers in gas, electric, and telephone rate cases. He was a reporter for the Lex-
ington (Kentucky) Herald-Leader from 1967 to 1970.

Mr. Rogers has served more than 38 years cumulatively on the boards of Fortune
500  companies.  He  is  currently  a  director  of  the  following  corporations:  Cinergy
Corp., Fifth Third Bancorp and Fifth Third Bank. He serves as 2nd Vice Chairman
of the Board, is on the Executive Committee and is Chairman of the Strategic Plan-
ning Committee of the Edison Electric Institute. He previously served as Chairman
of  the  Environmental  Policy  Committee.  He  also  serves  on  the  Board  of  the  Amer-
ican Gas Association and the U.S. Chamber of Commerce.

Mr. Rogers also serves on numerous civic boards and has published numerous ar-
ticles on energy and environmental issues. He formerly served as director of the fol-
lowing  corporations:  Duke  Realty  Corp.,  Bankers  Life  Holding  Corporation;  A  O
Irkutskenergo  (a  Russian  hydroelectric/coal-fired  steam  utility),  INB  (Indiana  Na-
tional  Bank)  and  NBD  Indiana  Inc.  He  has  testified  before  Congressional  Commit-
tees 13 times since 1989.

Mr. Rogers attended Emory University (Atlanta, Georgia) and holds a B.B.A. and
J.D.  degree  from  the  University  of  Kentucky,  where  he  was  a  member  of  the  Ken-
tucky  Law  Journal  and  Beta  Gamma  Sigma  (Academic  Honorary  Society).  He  was
named to the Hall of Fame at the Carol Martin Gatton College of Business and Eco-
nomics  and  the  Hall  of  Fame  of  the  College  of  Law,  both  of  the  University  of  Ken-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

tucky.  He  also  received  an  honorary  Doctor  of  Law  degree  from  Indiana  State  Uni-
versity.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Mr. Rogers.
Dr. McFarland.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  MACK  McFARLAND,  ENVIRONMENTAL
MANAGER,  FLUOROCHEMICALS  BUSINESS,  E.I.  DuPONT  DE
NEMOURS AND COMPANY
Dr. MCFARLAND. Good morning, Chairman Boehlert, Mr. Gordon,

and members of the Committee.

My  name  is  Mack  McFarland,  and  I  am  the  Global  Environ-

mental Manager for DuPont’s Fluorochemicals Business.

In that role, I advise our worldwide operations on a range of en-
vironmental and business matters. I appreciate this opportunity to
share  our  experiences  regarding  greenhouse  gas  emission  reduc-
tions with you.

DuPont  is  a  science-driven  company  with  a  commitment  to  safe-
ty,  health,  and  environmental  protection.  We  use  science  to  derive
products  and  services  that  improve  the  quality  and  safety  of  peo-
ple’s  lives.  We  also  use  science  to  drive  how  we  develop,  manufac-
ture, and manage our products throughout their life cycle.

As a 200-year-old company, we take the long view and strive for
sustainable  growth  that  benefits  our  shareholders,  the  societies  in
which  we  operate,  and  the  global  environment.  It  is  that  commit-
ment to sustainable growth and the science that underpins our ap-
proach to global climate change.

Our experience with climate change actually began with another
global  environmental  issue,  stratospheric  ozone  depletion.  DuPont
developed the first fluorochemical refrigerating gases, CFCs, in the
1930s.  In  the  1970s,  when  it  was  proposed  that  CFCs  might  de-
plete  stratospheric  ozone,  DuPont  delved  into  the  science.  In  1988,
based  on  the  scientific  consensus  presented  in  the  International
Ozone  Trends  Panel  Report  and  our  evaluation  of  that  science,  we
voluntarily and unilaterally committed to phase out CFCs.

We  also  used  our  science  capabilities  to  lead  in  the  development
of alternative products to meet the growing societal demand for air
conditioning and refrigeration. This experience with the CFC ozone
issue provided us with a keen understanding of the implications of
environmental  issues  that  are  global  in  scope  and  decades  to  cen-
turies in duration.

Global climate change was a natural extension of this experience.
With the beginning of the negotiations of the UN Framework Con-
vention  on  Climate  Change,  we  again  delved  into  the  science.  We
concluded  that  the  scientific  understanding,  while  imperfect,  was
certainly  sufficient  to  indicate  a  legitimate  issue.  In  1991,  we  took
a hard look at our own greenhouse gas emissions and realized that
they  were  not  insignificant.  While  we  recognize  that  it  would  take
concerted global action across all economic sectors to address global
climate  change,  we  determined  that  we  needed  to  take  responsible
action and reduce our own emissions footprint.

The  largest  contributors  to  our  footprint  were  unintended  by-
product  emissions,  nitrous  oxide  associated  with  the  manufacture
of  a  key  raw  material  for  nylon,  and  HFC–23  associated  with  the
manufacture of a fluorochemicals refrigerant.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

We  set  aggressive  goals  to  reduce  our  greenhouse  gas  emissions
by 40 percent on a global carbon equivalent basis by the year 2000,
using  1990  as  a  base  year.  We  also  set  goals  to  address  carbon  di-
oxide  emissions  from  energy  use,  aiming  to  keep  energy  use  flat,
even as production grew.

By  the  year  2000,  we  exceeded  our  original  goals  globally.  In
1999,  with  our  2000  goals  in  sight  and  the  scientific  case  for  cli-
mate  change  continuing  to  strengthen,  we  reaffirmed  our  commit-
ment  to  action  on  greenhouse  gases  and  set  aggressive  new  goals
for the year 2010. We committed to reduce our global carbon equiv-
alent greenhouse gas emissions by 65 percent, using 1990 as a base
year.  We  committed  to  continue  to  hold  our  global  energy  use  flat.
And  finally,  we  committed  to  acquire  10  percent  of  our  global  en-
ergy in the year 2010 from renewable resources. By the year 2004,
we  had  exceeded  the  emission  reduction  goal  and  had  held  energy
use flat while global production grew by over 30 percent.

We  are  also  making  steady  progress  on  our  renewable  energy
goal.  We  have  spent  over  $50  million  to  achieve  the  byproduct
emission  reductions  and  have  made  additional  investments  in  en-
ergy  efficiency.  On  the  other  hand,  achieving  the  energy  flat  goal
has saved us over $2 billion.

In conclusion, first, we determined that enough was known about
global  climate  change  to  provide  a  basis  for  concern  and  warrant
prudent action on our part. Second, we set and achieved aggressive
greenhouse  gas  emission  reduction  goals  that,  while  costly  to  pur-
sue,  have  created  an  overall  cost  savings  for  the  company  due  to
reduced energy use. Third, we believe that climate change is clear-
ly  an  environmental,  social,  and  economic  challenge  and  must  be
addressed  with  all  of  these  aspects  in  mind.  Fourth,  although  we
have  no  regrets  over  taking  these  actions,  we  do  have  a  concern
that developing policy regimes around the world do not adequately
account  for  the  actions  of  early  movers.  This  can  place  the  early
movers  at  a  competitive  disadvantage  and  act  as  disincentives  to
others to step up with bold, voluntary action.

Thank you. I will be happy to answer any questions.
[The prepared statement of Dr. McFarland follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MACK MCFARLAND

Good  morning  Chairman  Boehlert,  Mr.  Gordon,  and  Members  of  the  Committee.
My  name  is  Mack  McFarland,  and  I  am  the  Global  Environmental  Manager  for
DuPont’s  fluorochemicals  business.  In  that  role  I  advise  our  worldwide  operations
on  a  range  of  environmental  and  business  matters.  I  appreciate  this  opportunity  to
share our experiences regarding greenhouse gas emission reductions with you.

DuPont is a science driven company with a commitment to safety, health and en-
vironmental protection. We use science to derive products and services that improve
the quality and safety of people’s lives. We also use science to drive how we develop,
manufacture  and  manage  our  products  throughout  their  life  cycle.  As  a  200-year-
old  company  we  take  the  long  view,  and  strive  for  sustainable  growth  that  benefits
our  shareholders,  the  societies  in  which  we  operate  and  the  global  environment.  It
is  that  commitment  to  sustainable  growth  and  dedication  to  science  that  underpins
our approach to global climate change and greenhouse gas emissions reductions.

Our experience with greenhouse gas reductions actually began with another glob-
al  environmental  issue;  stratospheric  ozone  depletion.  DuPont  developed  the  first
fluorochemical  refrigerant  gases,  chlorofluorocarbons,  or  CFCs,  in  the  1930s.  They
were developed as safe alternatives to the more dangerous refrigerants then in use,
such  as  ammonia.  In  the  1970s  when  it  was  proposed  that  CFCs  might  deplete
stratospheric ozone DuPont delved into the science. In 1988, based on the scientific
consensus presented in the International Ozone Trends Panel Report, and our eval-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

uation of that science, we voluntarily and unilaterally committed to phase out CFCs.
We also used our science capabilities to lead in the development of alternative prod-
ucts  to  meet  the  growing  societal  need  for  air  conditioning  and  refrigeration.  This
experience  with  the  CFC/ozone  issue  provided  us  with  a  keen  understanding  of  the
implications  of  environmental  issues  that  are  global  in  scope  and  decades  to  cen-
turies in duration.

Global climate change was a natural extension of this experience. With the begin-
ning  of  negotiations  for  the  UN  Framework  Convention  on  Climate  Change  we
again delved into the science. We concluded that the scientific consensus, while im-
perfect, was certainly sufficient to indicate a legitimate issue.

In  1991  we  took  a  hard  look  at  our  own  greenhouse  gas  emissions  and  realized
that  they  were  not  insignificant.  While  we  recognized  that  it  would  take  concerted
global action across all economic sectors to address global climate change, we deter-
mined  that  we  needed  to  take  responsible  action  to  be  part  of  the  solution,  and  to
reduce our own emissions ‘‘footprint.’’ The largest contributors to our footprint were
unintended by-product emissions associated with manufacture of a key raw material
for nylon and with manufacture of a fluorochemicals refrigerant; nitrous oxide from
our  nylon  plants  and  trifluoromethane  or  HFC–23  from  some  of  our  fluorochemical
plants. Both have significant global warming potentials.

We set aggressive goals to reduce our global greenhouse gas emissions by 40 per-
cent on a carbon-equivalent basis by the year 2000, using 1990 as a base year, with
most  of  our  actions  targeted  at  nitrous  oxide  and  HFC–23.  We  built  a  detailed  in-
ventory of our global emissions and a system to search out the lowest cost emissions
reductions in our global operations, as well as a system to track and publicly report
our  ongoing  emissions.  We  also  set  goals  to  address  carbon  dioxide  emissions  from
energy use, aiming to keep energy use flat even as production grew.

We  recognized  that  this  was  a  significant  undertaking  that  needed  to  be  done  in
as  flexible  and  cost  effective  a  manner  as  possible.  This,  of  course,  is  as  true  for
a  national  or  global  program  as  it  is  for  a  single  company’s  actions.  The  byproduct
emissions  were  reduced  both  by  traditional  abatement  technologies  and,  more  im-
portantly, by changing our manufacturing processes to avoid producing them in the
first  instance.  We  pursued  our  energy  goals  through  a  wide  variety  of  large  and
small  projects,  including  everything  from  expanding  our  use  of  highly  efficient  co-
generation to changing light bulbs in our offices.

So,  how  have  we  done  against  these  goals?  By  the  year  2000,  we  exceeded  our
original goals globally. In 1999, with our 2000 goals in sight and the scientific case
for  climate  change  continuing  to  strengthen,  we  reaffirmed  our  commitment  to  ac-
tion on greenhouse gases and set aggressive new goals for the year 2010.

• First,  we  committed  to  reduce  our  global  carbon-equivalent  greenhouse  gas
emissions by 65 percent using 1990 as a base year (vs. our original 40 percent
goal).
• Second,  we  committed  to  continue  to  hold  our  global  energy  use  flat  using
1990  as  a  base  year.  The  achievement  of  this  goal  will  require  that  our  busi-
ness  growth  be  much  less  raw  material  and  energy  intensive  than  in  the
past—a move that is very consistent with our overarching goals of sustainable
growth.
• Third,  we  have  committed  to  acquiring  10  percent  of  our  global  energy  use  in
the year 2010 from renewable resources. We want to show that we are serious
about the need for renewable energy to be a part of our future. We also want
to  indicate  that  we  are  prepared  to  work  with  energy  suppliers  and  others
to develop a robust renewable energy market.

We  have  been  making  steady  progress  on  our  2010  goals.  Through  a  technology
breakthrough  in  our  fluorochemical  operations,  we  have  reduced  our  global  carbon-
equivalent  emissions  by  over  72  percent.  We  also  continue  to  hold  our  energy  use
flat while our global production has grown over 30 percent since 1991. This has re-
sulted in a reduction of 420 million cumulative metric tons of greenhouse gas emis-
sions from our global operations versus business as usual. We are also making solid
progress  in  meeting  our  renewable  energy  goal  with  about  five  percent  of  our  cur-
rent  energy  use  from  renewable  resources  such  as  wind,  hydropower  and  landfill
gas.

In 2004 we divested our nylon business and we are now in the process of recalcu-
lating  our  goals  by  subtracting  the  emissions  of  that  business  from  both  our  1990
baseline  and  from  the  emissions  for  subsequent  years.  We  will  of  course  make  the
recalculated goals public.

Let  me  share  with  you  a  few  of  the  things  we  have  learned  from  our  experience

with reducing greenhouse gas emissions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

• First,  these  kinds  of  reductions  are  not  a  simple  matter  and  have  economic
ramifications. We have spent over $50 million dollars in our efforts to reduce
nitrous  oxide  and  HFC–23,  as  well  as  spending  on  energy  efficiency  projects.
• That  leads  me  to  a  happier  second  key  learning—the  sort  of  programmatic
actions  necessary  to  address  greenhouse  gases  can  lead  to  unexpected  bene-
fits. Our hold-energy-use-flat goal has helped us to focus effort on energy sav-
ings  activities  and  projects  that  might  not  have  otherwise  risen  far  enough
up  on  our  capital  spending  priorities  to  have  been  pursued.  The  result?  We
have  saved  over  $2  billion  dollars  on  energy  costs  since  1991,  and  this  is  the
‘‘gift that keeps on giving’’ in ongoing operating cost savings.
• Third, as various greenhouse gas emissions policy regimes develop around the
world  there  seems  to  be  little  effort  to  take  account  of  the  actions  of  early
movers  like  ourselves.  This  can  place  the  early  movers  at  a  competitive  dis-
advantage and act as a disincentive to other entities to step up with bold vol-
untary actions.

In conclusion:

a basis for concern and warrant prudent action on our part;

• We determined that enough is known about global climate change to provide
• We  have  set  and  achieved  aggressive  greenhouse  gas  emissions  reduction
goals that while costly to pursue, have created an overall cost savings for the
company due to reduced energy use;
• Climate change is clearly both an environmental and economic challenge and

must be addressed with both of these aspects in mind.

Thank you. I will be happy to answer any questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MACK MCFARLAND

Summary CV

Mack received a B.S. in chemistry from the University of Texas at Austin in 1970
and  a  Ph.D.  in  Chemical  Physics  from  the  University  of  Colorado  in  1973.  From
1974  through  1983,  first  as  a  Post-Doctoral  Fellow  at  York  University  and  then  a
research scientist at the NOAA Aeronomy Laboratory, Mack planned, conducted and
interpreted  field  experiments  designed  to  probe  the  cycles  that  control  atmospheric
ozone  concentrations.  These  studies  included  measurements  of  gases  and  processes
important  to  the  global  climate  change  issue.  In  late  1983  Mack  joined  the  DuPont
Company. His primary responsibilities have been in the areas of coordination of re-
search  programs  and  assessment  and  interpretation  of  scientific  information  on
stratospheric  ozone  depletion  and  global  climate  change.  During  1995  and  1996,
Mack was on loan to the Atmosphere Unit of the United Nations Environment Pro-
gramme  and  in  1997  he  was  on  loan  to  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate
Change (IPCC) Working Group II Technical Support Unit. The value of his contribu-
tions  to  DuPont  has  been  recognized  through  a  C&P  Flagship  Award,  Environ-
mental Respect Awards, and Environmental Excellence Awards. In 1999, Mack was
awarded an individual Climate Protection Award by the U.S. Environmental Protec-
tion  Agency  for  his  contributions  in  providing  understandable,  reliable  information
to decision-makers.
Education
Ph.D.  in  Chemical  Physics,  1973,  University  of  Colorado.  Thesis  title:  Development

of a Flow-drift Technique for Ion-molecule Kinetic Studies.

B.S. in Chemistry with Honors, Special Honors, 1970, University of Texas at Austin.
Publications

Co-author  of  over  40  scientific  publications  primarily  in  the  areas  of  reaction  ki-

netics and atmospheric measurements of trace gas concentrations.
Work Experience
March,  1998–present:  Principal  Scientist,  Environmental  Programs  in  DuPont

Fluoroproducts, Wilmington, DE.

March,  1997–February,  1998:  On  loan  (from  DuPont)  to  the  Intergovernmental
Panel on Climate Change (IPCC), Working Group II (WG II), Technical Support
Unit  (TSU),  Washington,  D.C.  Decision-makers  rely  on  IPCC  Assessment  Re-
ports as their primary source of scientific, technical and socio-economic informa-
tion  on  global  climate  change.  The  TSUs  play  lead  roles  in  the  IPCC  process
by helping to assure that reports are complete, objective and policy relevant.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

March, 1995–February, 1997: On loan (from DuPont) to the Atmosphere Unit of the
United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP), Nairobi, Kenya. Responsibil-
ities during this assignment included representing UNEP at international meet-
ings,  assisting  in  strategy  development  for  the  Atmosphere  and  other  UNEP
programs, and preparing policy relevant materials for publication.

December,  1983–February,  1995:  Principal  Consultant,  Environmental  Programs
(most  recent  title)  in  DuPont  Fluoroproducts  (formerly  Freon(r)  Products),  Wil-
mington,  DE.  Primary  responsibilities  included  management  of  atmospheric
science  research  programs;  representing  DuPont  in  scientific  meetings  and  be-
fore  regulatory  bodies,  the  media  and  customers;  facilitating  the  preparation  of
scientific assessments; and analysis and communication of information on strat-
ospheric  ozone  depletion  and  global  climate  change  for  development  and  imple-
mentation of business strategies.

1975–1983:  Scientist  in  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration
(NOAA) Aeronomy Laboratory (AL), Boulder, CO. While at York University (see
below)  and  NOAA,  Mack  planned,  conducted  and  interpreted  field  experiments
designed to probe the cycles that control atmospheric ozone concentrations.

1974–1975:  Post  Doctoral  Fellow  at  York  University,  Downsview,  Ontario,  Canada.
Since  joining  DuPont  in  1983,  Mack’s  primary  responsibilities  have  been  in  the
areas of coordination of research programs and assessment and interpretation of sci-
entific  information  on  stratospheric  ozone  depletion  and  global  climate  change.  Co-
ordination of research programs involved two types of activities, both aimed at a co-
operative  approach  to  research  and  assessment  to  provide  policy  relevant  informa-
tion:  project  management  through  representing  DuPont  on  the  industry  sponsored
research programs to determine potential environmental impacts of CFCs and their
replacements; and influence of direction of government sponsored research programs
to  ensure  that  they  were  appropriately  focused  on  providing  sound  information  as
a  basis  for  decisions.  Cooperative  research  efforts  tend  to  build  consensus  around
key  policy  relevant  scientific  information  as  opposed  to  isolated  research  programs
that  have  led  to  ‘‘our  science/their  science’’  politicization  of  environmental  issues  in
some other areas.

Mack  has  been  involved  as  an  author,  contributor  or  reviewer  of  every  major
international  assessment  on  stratospheric  ozone  depletion  and  global  climate
change.  Most  recently  he  was  a  Lead  Author  of  the  technology  chapter  of  Working
Group  III  (Mitigation)  of  the  IPCC  Third  Assessment  Report  (TAR—the  report  re-
leased  in  2001)  and  a  Lead  Author  on  the  Appendix  to  that  chapter:  ‘‘Options  to
Reduce  Global  Warming  Contributions  from  Substitutes  for  Ozone  Depleting  Sub-
stances.’’  He  was  also  a  Lead  Author  of  the  Technical  Summary  for  the  Working
Group  I  TAR  (The  Scientific  Basis)  as  well  as  an  Author  of  the  draft  Summary  for
Policy-makers that was ultimately accepted by the IPCC. In 1999 he was a member
of  the  UNEP  TEAP  task  force  that  prepared  the  report:  ‘‘The  Implications  of  the
Montreal Protocol of the Inclusion of HFCs and PFCs in the Kyoto Protocol.’’

Interpretation and communication of scientific information based on these assess-
ments  has  provided  a  basis  for  developing  and  implementing  business  strategies.
Mack has given hundreds of presentations on the science of ozone depletion and cli-
mate  change  to  DuPont  management,  DuPont’s  customers,  media  representatives,
government representatives and scientists. The value of his contributions to DuPont
has  been  recognized  through  a  C&P  Flagship  Award,  Environmental  Respect
Awards, and Environmental Excellence Awards. In 1999 Mack was awarded an indi-
vidual  Climate  Protection  Award  by  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  for
his contributions in providing understandable, reliable information to decision-mak-
ers.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Dr. McFarland.
Mr. Meissen.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  RONALD  E.  MEISSEN,  SENIOR  DIRECTOR,
ENGINEERING,  ENVIRONMENT,  HEALTH  &  SAFETY,  BAXTER
INTERNATIONAL, INC.
Mr.  MEISSEN.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I
would  like  to  thank  you  for  your  leadership  on  this  area  of  global
climate  change.  I  would  also  like  to  thank  you  for  holding  this
hearing.

I  am  Ron  Meissen,  and  I  manage  Baxter’s  climate  initiatives.  I
also  manage  the  reduction  of  Baxter’s  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

appreciate the opportunity that you have provided to us to describe
the  balance  between  environmental  stewardship  and  business  re-
alities.

In my remarks today, I would like to share with you some of the
examples  of  how  Baxter  is  proactively  addressing  environmental
issues by driving greater operating efficiencies, adopting new tech-
nologies,  and  collaborating  through  public  and  private  partner-
ships.

Baxter  is  a  global  health  care  company  based  in  Deerfield,  Illi-
nois  that  produces  biotech,  specialty  pharmaceutical,  and  device
products  that  are  used  in  the  treatment  of  a  variety  of  complex
medical conditions.

In  the  mid-1990s,  Baxter  began  publicly  reporting  information
regarding  energy  use,  cost,  and  associated  greenhouse  gas  emis-
sions,  and  was  the  first  company  to  publish  an  environmental  fi-
nancial  statement  to  demonstrate  the  linkage  between  our  activi-
ties  and  our  bottom  line.  In  1997,  we  set  a  number  of  long-term,
nine-year goals in environmental health and safety including a goal
to reduce energy usage and associated greenhouse gas emissions by
30 percent per unit.

A key driver in our proactive initiatives has been the realization
that  sound  environmental  practices  can  provide  a  competitive  ad-
vantage.  By  driving  greater  operating  efficiencies  by  adopting  new
technologies  and  by  sharing  ideas  and  best  practices,  we  have
achieved  a  35  percent  per  unit  reduction  in  greenhouse  gas  emis-
sions  from  1996  to  2004,  a  22  percent  improvement  in  energy  effi-
ciency  during  the  same  period,  and  our  environmental  health  and
safety  investments  over  the  last  six  years  have  yielded  a  savings
of  $80  million  in  2004.  We  estimate  that  our  energy  savings  and
cost avoidance alone in that year exceeded $9 million.

The benefits go far beyond cost avoidance and energy or raw ma-
terial  savings.  Many  of  the  initiatives  that  we  have  put  in  place
and  investments  that  we  have  made  have  yielded  higher  quality
levels,  greater  production  output,  and  flexibility  in  our  operations,
reduced waste, as well as improvements in workplace safety, which
is very important to Baxter.

We have pioneered a Lean and Clean approach by applying Lean
manufacturing disciplines to our environmental processes and envi-
ronmental know-how to our manufacturing operations. You may be
familiar  with  Lean  manufacturing,  which  is  a  process  designed  to
remove  waste  and  improve  quality  and  efficiency  by  reducing  or
eliminating non-value-added activities and materials.

At  Baxter,  we  have  integrated  Clean  expertise  into  our  Lean
manufacturing  initiatives  to  not  only  prevent  negative  environ-
mental consequences but also to identify opportunities for environ-
mental improvement.

Over  the  past  decade,  Baxter  has  grown  significantly,  investing
in  important  expansions  and  upgrades  to  our  manufacturing  base.
The  investments  that  we  have  made  also  provide  great  opportuni-
ties  to  implement  environmental  improvements.  For  example,  in
the  process  of  expanding  our  facility  in  Bloomington,  Indiana,  we
are  using  new  technologies  to  reduce  energy  usage  and  associated
greenhouse gas emissions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

I  also  can  not  speak  positively  enough  about  the  benefits  of  col-
laboration  through  public  and  private  partnerships,  such  as  the
U.S.  EPA’s  Climate  Leaders  program  and  the  Green  Supplier  Net-
work.

Last year, Baxter led participation in the health care industry in
the  Green  Suppliers  Network  program,  which  strives  to  integrate
both  Lean  and  Clean  manufacturing  principles  into  the  operations
of suppliers common to that particular industry. So far, seven Bax-
ter  suppliers  have  agreed  to  participate  in  the  program  in  which
the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce’s  Manufacturing  Extension
Partnership  and  the  U.S.  EPA  provide  fronts  for  technical  profes-
sionals  to  train  suppliers  in  Lean  and  Clean  manufacturing  proc-
esses.  These  professionals  conduct  a  review  of  the  suppliers’  oper-
ations and recommend areas for improvement. This program brings
expertise  to  small-  and  medium-sized  companies  that  would  nor-
mally not be considered or it would be unaffordable to them.

We are a global company, and we must remain globally competi-
tive.  Our  67  manufacturing  facilities  are  located  in  28  countries,
and we hold all to the same high levels of standards.

Accordingly,  we  must  closely  monitor  the  actions  proposed  and
taken  by  other  countries  to  address  climate  change.  For  example,
one  of  our  food  manufacturing  facilities  in  Ireland  will  be  affected
by the phase one of the EU Emissions Trading Directive, which es-
tablishes a mandatory carbon cap and trade system. Climate taxes
are  also  being  implemented  in  some  countries,  and  we  currently
pay  climate  tax  for  the  electricity  that  we  use  in  the  United  King-
dom.

We believe we are well positioned to respond to these initiatives,
because  our  experience  has  taught  us  that  reasonable  improve-
ments in energy conservation and emissions reductions are possible
without  huge  investment,  that  investments  in  technology  and  im-
provements  in  manufacturing  processes  can  bring  both  environ-
mental  and  other  benefits,  including  quality  improvements,  re-
duced  raw  material  costs,  and  improved  workplace  safety,  that
companies  that  have  been  forward-looking  on  this  issue  are  in  a
better position to compete on a global basis.

In summary, we believe that it is possible to responsibly address
environmental  issues  and  specifically  climate  change  in  a  manner
that provides economic benefit and is of a competitive advantage to
our company.

Thank you for this opportunity to share with you our experiences

and perspectives.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Meissen follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF RONALD E. MEISSEN

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, I would like to thank you for this
opportunity  to  testify  today  on  climate  change  and  related  activity  within  the  busi-
ness community, particularly at my company, Baxter International Inc.

I speak to you today both as a representative of one company that has been recog-
nized  as  being  at  the  leading  edge  of  corporate  environmental  stewardship  and  as
a practicing expert in the field. My name is Ron Meissen, and I serve as Senior Di-
rector of Environment, Health and Safety Engineering at Baxter. In addition to my
professional  interest  in  the  subject  of  climate  change  and  sustainability,  I  have  a
strong  personal  interest  in  this  subject  as  well—I  am  currently  pursuing  my  Ph.D.
at  the  University  of  Wisconsin  in  Madison  in  sustainable  development.  The  focus
of my dissertation research, which I am hoping to complete in the next year, is the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

development  and  application  of  a  strategic  business  model  to  reduce  energy  related
greenhouse gas emissions.

In  my  role  at  Baxter,  I  coordinate  the  company’s  safety,  occupational  health,  in-
dustrial hygiene and environmental engineering professionals as they lead their re-
spective  functions  for  the  company  and  provide  their  expertise  to  Baxter’s  facilities
and  employees  throughout  the  world.  I  also  oversee  Baxter’s  initiatives  related  to
climate change and greenhouse gas emissions reductions.

Baxter International Inc. is a global health care company based in Deerfield, Illi-
nois that assists health care professionals and their patients with treatment of com-
plex  medical  conditions  including  hemophilia,  immune  disorders,  kidney  disease,
cancer,  trauma  and  other  conditions.  Baxter’s  48,000  employees  apply  their  exper-
tise in medical devices, pharmaceuticals and biotechnology to help make a meaning-
ful difference in patients’ lives. In short, we strive to make a positive impact on the
health and well-being of our local and global communities, and to conduct our oper-
ations  in  a  manner  that  minimizes  the  use  of  natural  resources  and  impact  on  the
environment.  Because  of  the  life-saving  nature  of  the  products  that  we  make,  and
the  significant  impact  that  we  have  on  human  health,  Baxter  has  held  environ-
mental stewardship as a priority for more than two decades, and has been a pioneer
in  the  areas  of  environmental  financial  reporting,  management  of  environmental,
safety and health data, and establishing, tracking progress against and reporting on
specific environmental goals, including greenhouse gas emissions. We recognize that
the health of the planet affects the health of the people who inhabit it. As a health
care company, we understand this connection and work toward improving both.

I  gave  my  first  speech  on  global  warming  in  1989,  to  a  group  of  my  colleagues
attending the company’s annual Environmental Conference. Even then, prior to the
more definitive scientific studies that have emerged over the last decade, some envi-
ronmental  professionals  and  enlightened  organizations  concluded  that  their  emis-
sions  were  having  an  impact  on  the  atmosphere  and  environment,  and  began  pur-
suing  initiatives  to  reduce  energy  use,  reduce  emissions  and  eliminate  the  use  of
compounds  and  gases  believed  to  contribute  to  the  greenhouse  effect.  In  the  early
1990s,  I  became  very  interested  in  sustainable  development,  especially  after  the
Earth  Summit  Conference  in  1992,  when  essentially  all  the  nations  of  the  world
adopted sustainable development as world policy.

In the mid-1990s, Baxter began tracking and publicly reporting detailed informa-
tion  regarding  energy  use,  energy  cost  and  associated  greenhouse  gas  emissions
from all of Baxter’s facilities. Then, in 1997, Baxter set a number of long-term envi-
ronmental,  health  and  safety  (EHS)  goals,  including  a  goal  to  reduce  energy  usage
and associated greenhouse gas emissions by 30 percent, per unit of production activ-
ity,  by  2005  from  1996  levels.  Also  in  the  late  1990s,  the  World  Business  Council
on Sustainable Development (WBCSD) and the World Resources Institute (WRI) or-
ganized  a  group  of  experts  and  business  leaders  to  develop  the  WBCSD/WRI  GHG
Protocol for calculating greenhouse gas emissions. I was honored to be a part of that
group  to  develop  what  is  now  the  global  standard  businesses  and  other  organiza-
tions use to determine their greenhouse gas emissions.

Baxter  has  continued  its  leadership  on  this  issue  in  the  ensuing  years,  becoming
one of the initial members of the Pew Center on Global Climate Change’s Business
Environment  Leadership  Council,  a  non-profit,  non-partisan  independent  organiza-
tion that is facilitating exchange of information and innovative solutions to address
global  climate  change,  a  charter  member  of  the  U.S.  EPA’s  Climate  Leaders  Pro-
gram, a voluntary EPA industry-government partnership that encourages companies
to develop long-term comprehensive climate change strategies, and a founding mem-
ber  of  the  Chicago  Climate  Exchange,  the  first  voluntary  pilot  carbon  trading  plat-
form in North America.

Our  leadership  and  commitment  to  reducing  our  environmental  footprint  and  ad-
vancing  the  health  and  welfare  of  our  communities  has  been  sustained  over  the
years  not  just  by  good  intentions.  A  key  driver  for  these  proactive  initiatives  over
the years at Baxter has been the realization that sound environmental practices can
contribute to and in some cases drive competitive advantage.

By  driving  greater  operating  efficiencies,  by  piloting  and  in  many  cases  adopting
new  technologies,  and  by  sharing  ideas  and  best  practices  within  the  company  and
through  collaborations  and  voluntary  programs  sponsored  by  the  EPA  and  others,
we have achieved among other things:

• A 35 percent reduction in greenhouse gas emissions from 1996 through 2004,
• A  22  percent  improvement  in  energy  efficiency  from  1996  through  2004,  on

on a per-unit-of-production value basis;

a per-unit-of-production value basis; and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

• Savings  and  cost  avoidance  totaling  several  millions  of  dollars  each  year.  In
2004  alone,  we  estimate  our  energy  savings  and  cost  avoidance  exceeded  $9
million.

And  the  benefits  go  far  beyond  just  cost  avoidance  and  energy  or  raw  material
savings.  Many  of  the  initiatives  we  have  put  in  place  in  our  facilities  have  also
brought  higher  production  throughput,  higher  quality  levels,  greater  production
flexibility  and  optimization  of  manufacturing  assets,  reduced  scrap  materials  and
waste, as well as improvements in workplace safety.

Given  the  nature  of  our  products  and  the  nature  of  our  operations,  the  majority
of Baxter’s greenhouse gas emissions are carbon dioxide emissions related to energy
usage.  Therefore,  the  focus  of  our  greenhouse  gas  management  strategy  is  energy
conservation—specifically,  activities  and  initiatives  that  improve  the  energy  effi-
ciency of our facility and reduce our energy costs.
Driving Operating Efficiencies

At Baxter, we view EHS as an integrated part of our operations, not as a separate
or supplemental function. We believe that world-class manufacturing requires excel-
lence  in  design,  process,  purchasing,  quality  and  EHS.  Successful,  world-class  com-
panies  tap  all  of  those  areas  of  expertise  in  a  seamless  manner  to  reduce  waste,
drive efficiency and increase productivity.

By  applying  Lean  manufacturing  disciplines  to  our  environmental  processes,  and
environmental  know-how  to  our  manufacturing  operations,  we  have  driven  both
Lean and Clean concepts and tools through our organization. The results have been
greater  efficiencies  and  productivity  in  our  manufacturing  facilities,  as  well  as  re-
ductions  in  raw  material  and  energy  use,  and  reduction  in  waste  generation  and
emissions.

Lean  manufacturing  is  a  process  designed  to  remove  waste  and  improve  quality
and  efficiency  by  continuously  identifying,  reducing  and  eliminating  non-value-
added  activities,  materials  and  other  resources  in  the  manufacturing  process.  Lean
tools  like  value  streams  and  process  mapping  help  identify  opportunities  to  reduce
raw  materials,  wasted  motion  and  scrap  by  standardizing  processes  and  materials
by  pinpointing  where  waste  is  created.  But,  Lean  manufacturing  initiatives,  when
taken  solely  on  their  own,  can  sometimes  have  negative  environmental  con-
sequences.

At  Baxter,  we  have  integrated  our  EHS  expertise  and  professionals  into  Lean
manufacturing initiatives to not only prevent negative environmental consequences,
but also to identify opportunities for environmental improvement—we call this Lean
and  Clean.  First,  we  apply  environmental  concepts  such  as  waste,  water  use  and
emissions  to  such  commonly  used  lean  tools  as  value  stream  maps  to  incorporate
environmental  considerations  into  the  improvement  initiative.  Secondly,  we  apply
lean tools to EHS-focused processes as waste water treatment or safety incident in-
vestigations to make our EHS processes more efficient. And, we integrate our tradi-
tion pollution prevention techniques into Lean and Clean tools to provide a new way
of systematically looking at waste reduction opportunities.

This  enables  plant  personnel  to  see  and  think  about  their  processes  differently,
which can and does inspire innovative solutions. In a number of our manufacturing
facilities, projects are underway that use process mapping and other lean manufac-
turing  techniques  to  reduce  the  amount  of  waste  or  scrap  generated  in  production.
By breaking down all of the steps in a specific manufacturing process and assessing
the  resource  allocation  in  terms  of  materials,  utilities  and  other  ‘‘inputs’’  and  ‘‘out-
puts’’  for  each  step,  our  plants  are  able  to  identify  multiple  opportunities  to  reduce
both manufacturing costs and waste. And, since employees themselves generate the
ideas,  they  have  a  vested  interest  in  seeing  the  initiatives  through  to  successful
completion and are motivated to continue to suggest further improvements.

The American Society for Quality recently recognized our facility in Marion, North
Carolina  with  its  Gold  Award  for  International  Team  Excellence  for  applying  Lean
tools to one area of the facility. Through value stream mapping, the team identified
a  number  of  opportunities  to  reconfigure  production  processes,  which  yielded  in-
creased product throughput, decreased the amount of manufacturing floor space re-
quired  to  get  the  work  done,  and  reduced  energy  and  heating,  ventilation  and  air
conditioning, or HVAC, requirements. As a result of these changes, the facility esti-
mates  it  has  saved  in  excess  of  $100,000  per  year  in  utility  costs.  While  $100,000
a year may not seem like a big number, when you consider that we have 67 manu-
facturing  facilities  alone,  these  kinds  of  projects  and  incremental  savings  quickly
add up to much larger numbers and do make a difference.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Adopting New Technologies

30

Over  the  last  decade,  Baxter  has  grown  significantly,  investing  in  important  ex-
pansions  and  upgrades  to  its  manufacturing  base.  The  capital  investments  that  we
have  made  to  expand  our  manufacturing  capacity,  assure  product  quality  and  ad-
vance  our  product  portfolio  have  also  provided  great  opportunities  for  us  to  imple-
ment environmental improvement.

For  example,  we  are  moving  away  from  sterilization  methods  that  use  ethylene
oxide  to  methods  that  use  e-beam  sterilization.  Baxter  is  different  from  most  phar-
maceutical  companies,  because  we  don’t  manufacture  pills  and  tablets.  Instead,
most  of  our  products  are  medications  that  are  administered  intravenously  or  in-
jected,  or  are  devices.  The  production  process  for  these  types  of  products  typically
requires much more extensive sterilization procedures, which can be labor and cap-
ital intensive. For decades, many of our products have been sterilized using ethylene
oxide. In this process, finished product is moved along a conveyor belt into a special
room  or  chamber.  Then  ethylene  oxide  gas  is  released  into  the  room  and  product
exposed  to  the  gas  for  a  certain  length  of  time  to  render  it  sterile.  The  ethylene
oxide,  which  is  a  toxic  gas,  is  then  evacuated  from  the  room  by  means  of  vacuum
pressure,  which  is  an  energy  intensive  process.  Then  the  product  is  moved  to  an-
other  well-ventilated  area  for  a  period  of  time  to  allow  for  any  remaining  gas  to  be
released  from  the  product.  All  of  the  exhaust  gases  are  required  to  be  treated  with
a scrubber, also an energy intensive process.

Now, we are increasingly using alternative, more energy efficient methods of ster-
ilization  that  also  have  considerably  less  environmental  impact—technologies  simi-
lar  to  those  used  to  protect  your  own  mail  from  anthrax  and  other  contamination.
With  e-beam  sterilization,  we  use  high  energy  electrons  to  sterilize  our  products.
These  newer  methods  are  significantly  more  energy  efficient  and  do  not  have  the
same requirements for ventilation and treatment of exhaust gases.

Because of the sterilization processes we employ and the clean room environments
we must maintain in our facilities in order to produce the highest quality of medical
products,  our  HVAC  requirements  are  very  high,  and  energy  intensive,  in  some
cases  representing  60  to  70  percent  of  the  energy  consumption  for  the  facility.  Ac-
cordingly, this is an important area of focus for us.

For  example,  we  are  currently  in  the  process  of  expanding  our  facility  in  Bloom-
ington,  Indiana,  and  are  employing  new  technology  to  replace  clean  rooms  and
thereby  reduce  our  HVAC  and  lighting  requirements.  Through  the  use  of  isolators,
special pre-assembled self-contained production and laboratory units, we are able to
confine  and  more  closely  control  the  higher  sterility,  ventilation  and  lighting  re-
quirements of a clean room to significantly smaller space. Picture if you will a trail-
er sized unit, with equipment inside and the walls made up of windows. Depending
on  the  particular  application,  work  may  done  in  the  small  area  within  the  isolator,
or employees may even work outside of the unit, with their hands and arms inserted
into glove-like apparatus that extends from the window into the unit. Not only will
this  approach  save  a  considerable  amount  in  energy  costs,  less  investment  is  re-
quired in HVAC and other infrastructure. And, the risk of employees possibly being
exposed to chemicals used in the process is significantly lower.
Sharing Ideas and Best Practices

I  cannot  speak  positively  enough  about  the  benefits  of  collaboration—the  sharing
of  ideas,  practical  advice  and  best  practices  within  our  own  organization  and
through such formal industry and agency collaborations as the EPA’s Climate Lead-
ers and Green Supplier Network programs.

These  programs  serve  as  valuable  clearinghouses  for  sharing  of  best  practices,
real-world  experience  and  multiple  perspectives  that  really  set  a  strong  foundation
for  continuous  environmental  improvement  across  companies  and  industries.  Most
importantly,  they  are  helping  to  address  some  of  the  most  difficult  environmental
challenges we face today, and extending the progress that large companies like Bax-
ter have made further into the supply chain—to the smaller and medium sized com-
panies that are our suppliers.

Last  year,  Baxter  spearheaded  the  participation  of  the  health  care  industry  in  a
public/private initiative called the Green Suppliers Network. The objective is to inte-
grate both Lean and Clean manufacturing principles into the operations of suppliers
common to a particular industry. While large companies like Baxter are able to tap
the  expertise  that  resides  within  the  organization  to  drive  improvement  in  oper-
ations  and  reduce  their  environmental  impact,  the  reality  is  that  few  small  or  me-
dium  size  companies  have  that  expertise  available  to  them  internally.  Over  the
years,  we  had  tried  to  share  our  own  expertise  with  select  suppliers  through  con-
ferences,  audits,  and  meetings,  but  recognized  that  the  impact  that  we  could  have
was  limited  while  the  opportunity  for  improvement  was  significant.  We  learned  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

the Green Suppliers Network and the impact it was having in other industries, like
the  automotive  industry,  and  we  were  immediately  attracted  to  the  program.  Our
Purchasing  and  Environment,  Health  and  Safety  departments  have  worked  to  ag-
gressively promote the program with suppliers. So far, seven Baxter suppliers have
agreed  to  participate  in  the  program,  in  which  the  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce’s
Manufacturing  Extension  Partnership  (MEP)  and  the  U.S.  EPA  provide  funds  for
technical  professionals  to  train  suppliers  in  Lean  and  Clean  manufacturing  proc-
esses.

For a small fee, a participating supplier receives access to manufacturing consult-
ants  experienced  in  process  improvement  and  waste  reduction,  including  a  week-
long review of the supplier’s operations, help in administering relevant training and
expertise,  and  a  full  report  detailing  areas  for  improvement  and  change.  Experts
from  EPA’s  state  pollution  prevention  technical  programs  also  lend  their  support.
This  program  brings  expertise  and  insight  to  these  companies  that  would  normally
not be considered or would be unaffordable.

The first of our seven suppliers to participate already has implemented a number
of  changes  and  yielded  impressive  results,  significantly  reducing  energy  consump-
tion  and  therefore  cost,  and  significantly  reducing  hazardous  waste  generation  and
emissions—savings that have far exceeded the initial fee and modest capital invest-
ments  required.  The  environmental  and  economic  benefits  realized  have  motivated
this supplier to continue with other initiatives. We look forward to similar successes
with the other suppliers that are participating.

While  we  highly  value  external  collaborations  such  as  these,  we  also  recognize
that some of the best ideas can and do come from within our own company. We have
created  a  number  of  ways  to  share  and  leverage  those  ideas  and  expertise  that  re-
sides  within  our  global  organizations,  including  global  energy  engineering  con-
ferences, training sessions and awards.

We  held  our  last  biannual  global  energy  engineering  conference  in  September
2004  in  Austin,  Texas,  with  60  Baxter  energy  managers  representing  44  facilities
from  21  different  countries  attended  the  week  long  conference.  The  conference  in-
cluded  training  sessions  dedicated  to  maximizing  the  performance  of  plant  utility
systems  and  sharing  information  on  best  demonstrated  energy  practices.  At  every
biannual  conference,  each  manufacturing  facility  is  asked  to  identify  three  specific
energy projects that its energy management team will commit to implement during
the next two-year period. At the next energy conference, the locations report the re-
sults  of  their  three  key  projects  to  all  conference  attendees.  This  open  sharing  of
both  successful  energy  projects  and  unforeseen  challenges  has  been  beneficial  in
strengthening  individual  expertise  and  broadening  institutional  technical  knowl-
edge. As part of the conference, we also present awards to the engineers and facili-
ties that achieve outstanding performance in such areas as:

• Largest percentage of energy cost saved per unit of production
• Largest percentage of energy usage saved per unit of production
• Energy project that has the widest application throughout Baxter
• Most innovative cost saving project implemented at Baxter
• Largest percentage of energy saved of total facility energy cost in a non-man-
• Special  recognition  for  outstanding  contribution  to  Baxter’s  energy  program.
Our next energy conference is scheduled for the fall of 2006, and I am very excited
to  hear  updates  from  the  facilities  on  the  three  projects  that  they  each  committed
to in 2004.

ufacturing facility

While  we  have  achieved  reductions  in  greenhouse  gas  emissions  and  improve-
ments  in  energy  efficiency  over  the  years,  we  recognize  that  much  more  needs  to
be  done.  We  are  a  very  global  company,  with  more  than  half  of  our  sales  and  two-
thirds  of  our  employees  located  outside  the  United  States.  Our  67  manufacturing
facilities  are  located  in  28  countries,  and  no  matter  where  a  facility  is  located,  all
are held to the same high level of EHS policies, standards and metrics.

We  are  a  global  company  and  we  must  remain  globally  competitive.  Accordingly,
we must closely monitor actions proposed or taken by other countries to address cli-
mate  change,  such  as  implementing  regional  or  national  carbon  cap  or  trade  sys-
tems.  One  of  our  manufacturing  facilities  in  Ireland  will  be  affected  by  phase  one
of  the  EU  Emissions  Trading  Directive,  which  establishes  a  mandatory  carbon  cap-
and-trade scheme. Climate taxes also are being implemented in some countries. We
currently  pay  climate  taxes  on  our  electricity  use  in  the  United  Kingdom.  Here  in
the United States, 132 mayors from across the country recently announced that they
would voluntarily adopt the Kyoto Protocol reduction target for their cities. In 2001,
Baxter  developed  its  formal  position  on  climate  change,  which  states  that  we  be-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

lieve, ‘‘The Kyoto agreement represents a first step in the international process, but
more  must  be  done,  both  to  implement  the  market-based  mechanisms  that  were
adopted in principle in Kyoto and to more fully involve all countries in the solution.’’
Fortunately, because of our foresight on this issue, because of the significant expe-
rience we have gained over the years in reducing our greenhouse gas emissions and
energy use, and the experience we have gained through participation in the Chicago
Climate  Exchange’s  voluntary  program  for  capping  and  trading  greenhouse  gas
emissions,  we  expect  to  be  well-positioned  to  respond  to  these  and  other  emerging
cap-and-trade initiatives.

Our  EHS  policy  clearly  states  that  we  are  committed  to  continuous  improvement
in  environmental,  health  and  safety  performance.  We  strive  to  conserve  resources
and  minimize  or  eliminate  adverse  EHS  effects  and  risks  that  may  be  associated
with  our  products,  services  and  operations.  Because  we  self-manufacture  nearly  90
percent of the products that we sell, and because we have in place talented environ-
mental  professionals  in  all  of  our  major  facilities,  we  are  able  to  more  closely  mon-
itor our environmental impact, and implement appropriate changes.

While we recognize that we are in the minority of companies that voluntarily have
taken  action  on  this  issue,  we  are  encouraged  by  the  lessons  that  our  own  experi-
ence has taught us:

• that  reasonable  improvements  in  energy  conservation  and  emissions  reduc-

tions are possible without huge investment;

• that  investments  in  new  technology  and  improvements  in  manufacturing
process can bring significant benefits in quality, optimal use of manufacturing
assets, reduced raw material costs, and improved workplace safety as well as
reduced  energy  requirements  and  associated  greenhouse  gas  emissions;  and
• that  companies  that  have  been  forward-looking  on  this  issue  are  in  the  best
position  to  build  upon  the  momentum  they  have  created  and  better  compete
on a global basis.

In  summary,  we  believe  that  it  is  possible  to  responsibly  address  environmental
issues  in  a  manner  that  provides  economic  benefit  and  competitive  advantage.  Our
experience has proven to us that the business case is indeed there for taking action
to reduce impact on our climate and environment by decreasing energy consumption
and lowering greenhouse gas emissions.

Thank you for this opportunity to share with you some of our experiences and per-

spectives on climate change.

BIOGRAPHY FOR RONALD E. MEISSEN

Ron  Meissen  manages  worldwide  Environment,  Health  and  Safety  (EHS)  re-
sources for Baxter International Inc. In this position, Mr. Meissen is responsible for
providing EHS services to regional and facility team members through the coordina-
tion  of  Baxter’s  safety,  occupational  health,  industrial  hygiene  and  environmental
engineering professionals.

Mr.  Meissen  joined  Baxter  in  1975  as  a  project  control  engineer  and  progressed
through  a  variety  of  positions  in  energy  management  and  environmental  engineer-
ing. He has been actively engaged in the company’s environmental program and re-
porting  and  co-founded  the  company’s  EHS  sustainability  team.  For  the  past  10
years,  he  has  managed  Baxter’s  greenhouse  gas  and  climate  change  initiatives  and
represents  the  company  in  outside  climate  groups,  including  the  Chicago  Climate
Exchange,  the  Pew  Center  on  Global  Climate  Change  and  the  U.S.  Environmental
Protection Agency Climate Leaders Program.

Mr. Meissen has Bachelor of Science degree in civil engineering from the Univer-
sity  of  Wisconsin–Platteville,  a  Master  of  Science  degree  in  civil  engineering  from
the  University  of  Illinois,  and  a  masters  of  business  administration  from  Lake  For-
est Graduate School of Management. He is currently pursuing his Ph.D. in sustain-
able  development  at  the  University  of  Wisconsin–Madison,  where  he  is  working  on
his  dissertation  about  the  development  of  a  strategic  business  model  to  reduce  en-
ergy-related greenhouse gas emissions.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you, Mr. Meissen.
Dr. Hobbs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ROBERT  H.  HOBBS,  DIRECTOR  OF  OPER-
ATIONS,  UNITED  TECHNOLOGIES  RESEARCH  CENTER,
UNITED TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION
Dr.  HOBBS.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the
Committee.  I  am  Bob  Hobbs,  Director  of  Operations  at  the  United
Technology Research Center, the research and development arm of
United  Technologies  Corporation.  United  Technologies,  based  in
Hartford,  Connecticut,  is  a  diversified  company  that  provides  high
technology  products  and  services  to  the  aerospace  and  commercial
building  industries  worldwide.  UTC’s  products  include  Otis  ele-
vators  and  escalators,  Carrier  air  conditioning  systems,  UTC  Fire
&  Security  products  and  services,  UTC  Power  fuel  cells,  Pratt  &
Whitney  aircraft  engines  and  space  propulsion  systems,  Hamilton
Sundstrand aerospace systems, and Sikorsky helicopters.

UTC  is  a  $38  billion  company,  the  39th  largest  in  the  United
States. Our shareholder return since 1992 is more than three times
that  of  either  the  S&P  500  index  or  the  Dow  30  Industrials.  UTC
is proud of its record of providing shareholder value within the con-
fines of very good corporate citizenship.

UTC  is  pursuing  its  climate  change  goals  directly  by  reducing
greenhouse  gas  emissions  produced  by  UTC  operations  and  indi-
rectly  by  developing  and  manufacturing  products  that  use  less  en-
ergy and emit smaller amounts of greenhouse gases.

In  1997,  UTC  resolved  to  reduce  its  global  energy  consumption
by  25  percent  by  2007.  We  exceeded  that  target  halfway  through
the 10-year period and so increased the goal to a 40 percent reduc-
tion, which we met last year, two years early. Since joining the En-
vironmental  Protection  Agency  Climate  Leaders  in  2001,  we  have
reduced  our  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  74,000  metric  tons  as  a
result  of  our  energy  efficiency  goals.  In  roughly  the  same  time  pe-
riod, our revenues increased by $9.5 billion, demonstrating that en-
vironmental  quality  and  economic  growth  can  indeed  go  hand-in-
hand.  UTC’s  environmental  performance  and  achievements  re-
cently earned us one of the EPA’s 2005 Climate Protection Awards.
Why is UTC taking a leadership role to address climate change?
The  short  answer  is  that  our  own  corporate  policy  demands  it.
UTC’s  environmental  health  and  safety  policy  requires  that  we
‘‘conserve  natural  resources  in  the  design,  manufacture,  and  dis-
posal of products and delivery of service.’’

To quote our Chairman, George David, ‘‘We don’t choose between
responsibility and profitability. We pursue both with discipline and
focus.’’  Our  vision  of  corporate  responsibility  and  global  sustain-
ability  places  environmental  performance  right  alongside  financial
results.  We  believe  that  setting  goals  for  reduced  energy  consump-
tion, which translates into lower greenhouse gas emissions, has al-
ready  improved  our  bottom  line  performance  by  reducing  produc-
tion costs and allowing us to be more competitive.

Environmental  leadership  doesn’t  merely  enhance  our  corporate
reputation, it offers our customers world-class quality and products
while increasing efficiency and reducing waste, making them better
stewards of the environment as well.

By  creating  products  that  use  less  energy  and  help  lower  green-
house gases that contribute to climate change, we can differentiate

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

chiller 

system, 

our  products  in  an  increasingly  environmentally-conscious  global
marketplace.

UTC  has  an  expansive  and  diverse  portfolio  of  energy-efficient
and  environmentally-friendly  products,  but  let  me  talk  briefly
about one.

UTC  Power  has  developed  the  industry’s  first  integrated  micro-
turbine  and  double-effect  absorption 
the
PureComfort  240M.  The  system  converts  more  than  80  percent  of
its  fuel  input  to  efficient  electric  cooling  and  heating  output.  I
started  to  say  90,  because  we  see  90  percent  fuel  efficiency  in  our
laboratories.  They  quote  80  in  their  literature.  We  expect  it  to  re-
duce  carbon  dioxide  emissions  by  40  percent  and  nitrogen  oxide
emissions by 90 percent over those of the average central fossil fuel
generation  plant.  In  May,  the  A&P  grocery  chain  installed  a
PureComfort  240M  in  its  Mount  Kisco,  New  York  store,  citing  the
technology as one of the company’s commitments to ‘‘make more ef-
ficient use of energy and to protect the environment by minimizing
emissions.’’

New corporate climate policies have proven to be complementary
to  good  business  policies,  allowing  UTC  to  understand,  manage,
track,  and  minimize  our  greenhouse  gas  emissions  and  energy  use
while simultaneously adding business value.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for giving us the opportunity today to
share  with  you  and  members  of  the  Committee  some  of  the  spe-
cifics  of  our  commitment  to  reducing  greenhouse  gases  throughout
our  operation  and  across  all  our  product  lines.  If  you  would  like
further  information  regarding  our  environmental  success  story,  we
have  copies  of  the  UTC  2004  corporate  responsibility  report  avail-
able here or on our website.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Hobbs follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT H. HOBBS

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  am  Bob  Hobbs,
Director  of  Operations  at  the  United  Technologies  Research  Center,  the  research
and  development  arm  of  United  Technologies  Corporation  (UTC).  United  Tech-
nologies, based in Hartford, Connecticut, is a diversified company that provides high
technology  products  and  services  to  the  aerospace  and  commercial  building  indus-
tries  worldwide.  UTC’s  products  include  Otis  elevators,  escalators  and  people  mov-
ers;  Carrier  heating  and  air  conditioning  systems;  UTC  Fire  &  Security  fire  safety
and security products and services; UTC Power fuel cells; Pratt & Whitney aircraft
engines; Hamilton Sundstrand aerospace systems; and Sikorsky helicopters.
UTC & Corporate Responsibility

UTC  is  a  $38  billion  company,  the  39th  largest  in  the  United  States.  Our  total
shareholder return since 1992 is close to 1000 percent and is more than three times
that  of  either  the  S&P  500  index  or  the  Dow  30  Industrials.  UTC  is  proud  of  its
record of solid corporate citizenship. We’ve been included in the Dow Jones Sustain-
ability World Indexes since it began in 1999 and have been rated AAA by Innovest
Strategic Value Advisors. We were also named one of the world’s 100 most sustain-
able companies at this year’s World Economic Forum in Davos by Corporate Knights
and  were  the  only  aerospace  company  included.  UTC’s  success  is  rooted  in  clarity
of organization and total alignment among management about what we want to ac-
complish.  For  UTC,  that  is  shareholder  value  within  the  confines  of  very  good  cor-
porate  citizenship.  We  don’t  choose  between  one  or  the  other,  we  pursue  both  with
discipline and focus.

Shareholder value comes in part from research and development. UTC spends ap-
proximately $2.8 billion annually, 90 percent of that in the United States, to develop
tomorrow’s  technologies.  United  Technologies  Research  Center  (UTRC)  works  with
each UTC business to make certain their products and services are the most innova-
tive and technologically advanced in the world. UTRC is an incubator for UTC prod-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

ucts,  researching  energy  and  environmental  innovations  to  assist  UTC  in  devel-
oping,  and  then  building,  new  products  for  the  next  generation.  Whether  its  re-
search on hydrogen production and storage technologies, inventing ways to heat and
cool  more  efficiently  or  improving  jet  engine  design  and  efficiency,  UTRC  provides
valuable technical experience to further UTC’s pursuit of better environmental qual-
ity in its products.
UTC Voluntary Commitment

UTC is constantly working to reduce the environmental footprint of our worldwide
facilities  and  operations.  We  are  accomplishing  this  objective  directly  by  reducing
greenhouse gas emissions produced by UTC operations and indirectly by developing
and  manufacturing  products  that  use  less  energy  and  emit  smaller  amounts  of
greenhouse  gases.  We  are  driving  pollutants  in  the  manufacturing  process  down  to
their lowest achievable levels and reducing our energy consumption so less pollution
is  produced  in  the  satisfaction  of  our  energy  needs.  UTC  quantifies  environmental
goals,  measures  progress  and  reports  that  progress  to  our  Board  of  Directors,  em-
ployees and community.

In 1997, UTC resolved to reduce its global energy consumption by 25 percent (nor-
malized  for  revenues)  from  1997  levels  by  2007.  Once  we  exceeded  that  target,  we
increased  the  goal  to  a  40  percent  reduction  in  our  energy  use  worldwide,  and  we
are  already  meeting  that  ambitious  goal.  Even  as  we  revised  the  goal  upward,  we
kept  the  timetable  firm  and  still  achieved  the  enhanced  goal  two  years  ahead  of
schedule. Since joining the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Climate Leaders
in  2001,  we  have  reduced  our  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  74,000  metric  tons  as
a  result  of  our  energy  efficiency  goals.  In  roughly  the  same  time  period,  our  reve-
nues  increased  by  $9.5  billion,  demonstrating  that  environmental  quality  and  eco-
nomic  growth  can  indeed  go  hand-in-hand.  UTC’s  environmental  performance  and
achievements recently earned us one of the EPA’s 2005 Climate Protection Awards.
Key Drivers in Reducing Greenhouse Gases

Why is UTC taking a leadership role to address climate change? The short answer
is that our own corporate policy demands it. UTC’s environmental, health and safety
policy requires that we ‘‘conserve natural resources in the design, manufacture, use
and  disposal  of  products  and  delivery  of  service.’’  We  take  this  directive  extremely
seriously  and  have  established  internal  environmental  standards  that  both  comply
with  the  law  and  go  beyond  it  when  necessary  to  achieve  the  goals  of  this  policy.
We don’t choose between responsibility and profitability; our corporate responsibility
places environmental performance right alongside financial results.

We  would  not  be  where  we  are  today  if  not  for  strong  commitment  of  our  Chair-
man,  George  David,  senior  managers  and  front-line  employees  in  each  of  our  busi-
ness  units.  In  a  speech  given  in  1998  at  the  Earth  Technologies  Forum,  Mr.  David
explained  his  personal  motivation  in  committing  the  corporation  to  address  the  cli-
mate change issue by stating: ‘‘I have children and prospectively grandchildren and
great  grandchildren  whose  lives  and  livelihoods  concern  me.’’  Mr.  David  again
stressed UTC’s commitment to sustainability in a 2003 speech to the Society for Or-
ganizational Learning in East Hartford, Connecticut. He defined UTC’s approach to
sustainability  within  the  context  of  five  general  themes:  energy  efficiency  of  our
products and service; environment, health and safety impacts in our own operations;
productivity  in  its  conventional  sense  (doing  more  with  less);  opportunities  for  em-
ployees to develop themselves; and legal compliance and high ethical standards.

Through  close  coordination  among  the  operating  businesses  and  corporate  head-
quarters,  UTC  has  brought  together  a  tight  network  of  experts  to  gather  and  ana-
lyze  energy  consumption  data;  provide  technical  assistance;  develop  benchmarks;
and  share  best  practices  across  the  corporation.  We  have  developed  internal  guide-
lines  for  use  across  the  units  in  common  energy  applications  such  as  lighting  and
compressed  air.  In  addition  to  our  energy  efficiency  goals,  we  are  also  on  track  to
achieve  a  60  percent  reduction  in  air  pollutants  and  non-recycled  waste  and  a  40
percent reduction in water consumption by 2007 (all normalized for revenue). We’ve
been able to achieve such dramatic progress due in part to our ‘‘Achieving Competi-
tive  Excellence’’  (ACE)  program.  ACE  is  the  internal  UTC  discipline  intended  to
simplify  procedures,  raise  efficiency  and  ensure  world-class  quality  in  products  and
processes  while  supporting  our  environmental  commitments.  ‘‘Continuous  improve-
ment’’ in our operations is the key element of ACE.

Climate  change  is  a  growing  dynamic  in  the  global  marketplace.  We  believe  that
setting  goals  for  reduced  energy  consumption,  which  translates  into  lower  green-
house gas emissions, has already improved our bottom line performance by reducing
production  costs  and  allowing  us  to  be  more  competitive.  Lower  energy  costs  and
improvements in manufacturing processes are leaving us with more resources to de-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

vote  to  developing  new  and  innovative  products  that  address  climate  change  and
other  environmental  and  energy  problems.  We  are  also  keeping  ahead  of  the  curve
on potential future climate change regulations by investing in greenhouse gas reduc-
tions now. We hope and trust that policy-makers will recognize these early commit-
ments to the climate change solution.
Energy Efficiency, Greenhouse Gases and UTC Products

Genuine  corporate  responsibility  requires  that  we  make  environmental  consider-
ations  priorities  in  new  product  development  and  investment  decisions.  Environ-
mental leadership doesn’t merely enhance our corporate reputation; it offers our cus-
tomers  world-class  quality  in  products  while  increasing  efficiency  and  reducing
waste—making them better stewards of the environment as well. UTC continuously
explores  ways  to  increase  efficiency  and  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  through
the products it develops.

By  creating  products  that  use  less  energy  and  help  lower  greenhouse  gases  that
contribute  to  climate  change,  we  can  differentiate  our  products  in  an  increasingly
environmentally conscious global marketplace. Because the energy savings from the
use of our products present our greatest contribution to the reduction of greenhouse
gases,  I’d  like  to  give  you  a  snapshot  of  UTC’s  expansive  and  diverse  portfolio  of
energy-efficient and environmentally friendly products.
UTC Power/Fuel Cells

Our  UTC  Power  division  is  a  full-service  provider  of  clean  power  solutions  and
is  the  leading  developer  and  producer  of  fuel  cells  for  on-site  power,  transportation
and  space  applications.  UTC  Fuel  Cells  (UTCFC)  is  a  business  unit  of  UTC  Power
and  manufactures  the  PureCellΤΜ 200  power  system,  which  provides  200  kilowatts
of electricity and up to 925,000 btu/hr of heat for combined heat and power applica-
tions.  Each  PureCellΤΜ 200  avoids  the  production  of  1,100  tons  of  carbon  dioxide
emissions annually, which is why UTC Power earned one of the EPA’s Climate Pro-
tection  Awards  in  2000.  Last  month,  the  PureCellΤΜ 200  fuel  cell  fleet  achieved  a
major  milestone,  providing  one  billion  kilowatt  hours  of  energy  production,  or
enough  to  power  91,000  homes  for  a  year.  We’ve  already  deployed  a  total  of  275
units  world  wide,  including  26  in  New  York  to  date,  avoiding  102  million  pounds
of carbon dioxide emissions in the Chairman’s home state alone.

In  addition  to  its  demonstrated  environmental  and  energy  efficiency  accomplish-
ments,  the  PureCellΤΜ 200  is  earning  a  reputation  for  reliability  as  well.  A  UTC
Power  fuel  cell  kept  the  Central  Park  police  station  operating  during  New  York
City’s  famous  power  outage  in  2003,  and  just  last  month,  Russia’s  leading  oil  and
gas pipeline engineering company, Orgenergogaz, was able to keep operating during
a blackout in southern Moscow because of the PureCellΤΜ 200. We’re keeping lights
on from New York to Moscow and will expand our reach in 2007 when UTC Power
plans  to  introduce  an  enhanced  version  of  the  PureCellΤΜ 200  with  twice  the  life
span of its existing product.

UTC  Power  has  also  developed  the  industry’s  first  integrated  microturbine  and
double-effect  absorption  chiller  system,  the  PureComfortΤΜ 240M.  The  system  con-
verts more than 80 percent of its fuel input to efficient electric, cooling and heating
output. We expect it to reduce carbon dioxide emissions by 40 percent and nitrogen
oxide emissions by 90 percent over those of the average central fossil fuel generation
plant.  This  is  equal  to  the  benefits  of  planting  150  acres  of  trees  and  taking  250
cars  off  the  road,  respectively,  during  the  same  time  period.  In  May,  the  A&P  gro-
cery chain, which operates 650 stores in 10 states, installed a PureComfortΤΜ 240M
system  in  its  Mount  Kisco,  NY  store,  citing  the  technology  as  one  of  the  company’s
commitments to ‘‘make more efficient use of energy and to protect the environment
by minimizing emissions.’’

Waste  heat  represents  an  untapped  energy  resource.  According  to  the  U.S.  De-
partment  of  Energy’s  May  2003  Thermally  Activated  Technologies  Roadmap,  total
energy  loss  in  the  form  of  waste  heat  in  the  United  States  is  equal  to  the  amount
of energy annually consumed by the U.S. transportation sector or by the entire Jap-
anese economy. UTC Power, in partnership with Carrier Corporation, another UTC
business unit, developed the PureCycleΤΜ 200 power system to turn waste heat into
electricity, providing a zero-emission alternative to traditional power sources. In ad-
dition to the environmental benefits, the PureCycleΤΜ 200 offers high reliability, low
maintenance and cost savings through the reduced fuel use.

In  addition  to  its  portfolio  of  climate-friendly  on-site  power  solutions,  UTCFC  is
also  developing  zero  emission,  energy  efficient  fuel  cells  for  transportation  applica-
tions with environmental and energy security benefits. We’ve deployed zero emission
fuel  cell  buses  in  Washington,  DC,  California,  Madrid  and  Turin.  Last  year,  AC
Transit logged over 8,000 miles operating a Thor 30’ hydrogen fuel cell, hybrid-elec-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

tric  bus  developed  by  ISE  Corporation  and  UTC  Fuel  Cells.  This  bus  was  deployed
in  the  Oakland,  California  area  and  achieved  double  the  fuel  economy  of  a  30-foot
diesel  bus.  This  year,  we  are  delivering  power  plants  for  four  fuel  cell  buses  that
will be operated in California by AC Transit and SunLine Transit.

UTCFC is currently working with major automobile manufacturers, including Nis-
san, Hyundai-KIA and BMW, and the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) on develop-
ment  and  demonstration  programs  for  automobiles.  We  are  teamed  with  Chevron
and Hyundai-KIA as part of DOE’s Hydrogen Learning Demonstration Program and
will be deploying a fleet of 32 zero-emission Hyundai-KIA Tucson sport utility vehi-
cles and Sportage cars as part of the initiative.
Carrier

Carrier  Corporation  is  the  world’s  leading  manufacturer  of  heating,  ventilating,
refrigerating, and air conditioning systems and products. Carrier is at the forefront
of  its  industry,  developing  systems  with  ever-more  environmentally  sound  refrig-
erants  and  dramatically  reducing  the  power  requirements  of  their  products.  From
the  smallest  window  air  conditioning  units  to  the  largest  centrifugal  chillers,  Car-
rier  heating  and  cooling  equipment  is  distinguished  by  some  of  the  highest  energy
efficiency ratings in the industry. Carrier participates in the EPA’s Energy Star pro-
gram  to  provide  energy  efficient  products  to  residents  and  businesses.  Carrier  sup-
ports the goals of the Montreal Protocol to phase out use of certain substances that
deplete  the  ozone  layer,  and  in  1994,  pioneered  the  worldwide  phase-out  of  CFCs.
Carrier  is  also  helping  lead  a  revolution  in  the  way  the  air  conditioning  industry
handles  chlorine-containing  refrigerants  and  is  the  only  air  conditioning  manufac-
turer that provides chlorine-free refrigerants across its entire product line.

Not  a  company  to  rest  on  its  laurels,  Carrier  is  a  leading  advocate  for  a  national
energy  policy  with  a  strong  commitment  to  conservation  and  efficiency  improve-
ment,  including  a  consensus  energy  efficiency  standard  agreement  for  commercial
packaged  air  conditioning  products,  refrigerants  and  freezers.  Carrier  was  instru-
mental  in  moving  the  industry  to  a  13  SEER  [Seasonal  Energy  Efficiency  Ratio]
standard,  meaning  that  Carrier  residential  air  conditioning  systems  shipped  in  the
United States after January 2006 will be on average 30 percent more efficient than
today’s standard.
Pratt & Whitney

Pratt & Whitney is a world leader in the design, manufacture and support of air-
craft engines, gas turbines and space propulsion systems. Through the development
of  better  heat  resistant  coatings,  more  environmentally  friendly  processes,  innova-
tive  servicing  procedures,  more  efficient  turbine  blades  and  quieter,  more  fuel  effi-
cient engines, Pratt & Whitney has pioneered most major advances in both military
and  commercial  aviation.  And,  the  company’s  new  Specialty  Materials  &  Services
business  is  redefining  entire  industries  by  applying  environmental  technologies  in
unique ways. For example, ElectroCoreΤΜ is a new, advanced power plant emissions
control system under development that will control a variety of pollutants from coal-
, wood- and other solid fuel-fired boilers, ushering in a new way to control multiple
pollutants in power plants and manufacturing facilities.
Otis

Another  UTC  division,  Otis,  the  world  largest  manufacturer  of  elevators,  esca-
lators  and  moving  walkways,  reexamined  every  aspect  of  the  elevator—from  design
and  installation  to  operation  and  maintenance—and  created  the  Gen2  system  that
is  up  to  50  percent  more  efficient  than  conventional  elevators.  Innovative  new  re-
generative  technologies  will  reduce  the  net  power  requirements  of  new  Otis  ele-
vators installed worldwide even further.
Forming Partnerships

UTC regularly forms partnerships with others to encourage greenhouse gas reduc-
tions  and  meet  energy  efficiency  goals.  As  an  EPA  Climate  Leaders  partner,  UTC
pledged  to  reduce  global  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  16  percent  per  dollar  of  rev-
enue from 2001 to 2007. As an EPA Energy Star member, we are helping Americans
to  save  energy  and  avoid  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  providing  energy  efficient
products  in  residential  and  commercial  settings.  UTC  is  a  founding  member  of  the
Pew  Center’s  Business  Environmental  Leadership  Council,  a  group  of  companies
committed to responding to climate change challenges, and the U.S. Green Building
Council, a coalition of companies promoting the use of green building practices.

Earlier this year, Global Green USA awarded UTC the ‘‘Corporate Design Award’’
for our Sustainable Cities environmental grant and volunteer effort to advance envi-
ronmentally  responsible  building  systems  in  urban  areas.  UTC  Power  joined  with
the  EPA  as  part  of  CHP  Partners,  a  public-private  partnership  committed  to  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

viding clean, efficient power and thermal energy and reducing pollutants and green-
house  gases.  On  the  state  level,  UTC  is  active  with  the  Regional  Greenhouse  Gas
Initiative,  a  multi-state  effort  to  reduce  carbon  dioxide  emissions,  and  Governor
Rell’s Connecticut Climate Change initiative.

UTC  also  frequently  partners  with  suppliers  to  help  them  reach  our  standards.
For  example,  Hamilton  Sundstrand  provides  training  for  its  suppliers  to  help  them
attain  UTC  environmental  levels.  And,  Pratt  &  Whitney  is  a  corporate  sponsor  of
EPA’s  Strategic  Goals  Program  under  which  large  companies  share  with  suppliers
their  best  practices  in  environmental  management  systems,  pollution  prevention
and waste minimization.
Conclusion

Good corporate climate policies have proven to be complementary to good business
policies,  allowing  UTC  to  understand,  manage,  track  and  minimize  our  greenhouse
gas  emissions  and  energy  use  while  simultaneously  adding  business  value.  Thank
you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  giving  us  the  opportunity  today  to  share  with  you  and  the
Members  of  the  Committee  some  of  the  specifics  of  our  commitment  to  reducing
greenhouse  gases  throughout  our  operations  and  across  all  our  product  lines.  If
you’d  like  further  information  regarding  our  environmental  success  story,  we  have
copies  of  the  UTC  2004  Corporate  Responsibility  Report  available  here  and  on  our
website at www.utc.com.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ROBERT H. HOBBS

Director of Research Operations

Experience
United Technologies Research Center—1971–present
1997–
1996–1997 Director, Chemical Science and Fluid Mechanics Dept.
1995–1996 Director, Mechatronics Dept.
1994–1995 Manager, Collaboration Technology
1994–1994 Manager, Network Technology
1978–1994 Senior Theoretical Physicist
1971–1978 Research Scientist

Applied  theoretical  modeling  in  the  areas  of:  dynamical  systems,  quantum  chem-
istry,  acoustics,  fiber-optics,  electro-optics,  lasers,  semiconductors  and  diverse  phys-
ical  and  chemical  systems  ranging  from  atoms  and  molecules  to  elevators  and  jet
engines; and program management.
MIT DSR—Physics Instructor—1971
MIT Center for Theoretical Physics—Research Assistant—1968–1970
Johns Hopkins Univ. Applied Physics Laboratory—Summer 1963–1965
Research Analysis Corporation—Group Leader—Summer 1960–1962
Johns Hopkins Univ. Operations Research Office—Summer 1959

Educational Background
Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Ph.D. Theoretical Physics—1971
Massachusetts Institute of Technology, S.B. Physics—1964
Publications/Patents
38 papers, 1 issued patent
Hobby
Yacht Racing Administration—1968–present including:

United States Junior Olympic Committee—1992–1996
United  States  Sailing  Association  (National  Governing  Body  of  sailing  in  U.S.)

President, United States Sailing Foundation—2004–2000
Chairman, Olympic Sailing Committee—1996–2000
President—1991–1993,  Vice  President—1985–1991,  Board  of  Directors—
1979–1993

Intercollegiate Yacht Racing Assoc. of NA (NGB of collegiate sailing in U.S.)

CEO—1979–1988

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

DISCUSSION

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much, Dr. Hobbs.
And Mr. Meissen, thank you for commending our leadership. Let
me say to you, to all of you, we want to commend your leadership.
It  is  music  to  our  ears  up  here  to  hear  from  leading  figures  in  the
‘‘real  world’’  outside  Washington,  DC  and  the  responsible  manner
in which you are dealing with this very important subject.

Let  me  ask  you.  When  you  are  out  leading  the  parade,  you  are
also  a  target.  What  has  been  the  reaction  that  you  have  had  from
your  business  colleagues?  And  are  you  winning  any  converts,  or  is
it  not  in  your  enlightened  self-interest  to  try  to  convert  the
unconverted?

Mr. Rogers, let me ask you.
Mr. ROGERS. Mr. Chairman, I served as a Chairman of the Envi-
ronmental  Policy  Committee  for  our  industry  association  EEI  for
four or five years, and what I have seen in our industry is a move-
ment  toward  dealing  with  these  issues  in  a  straightforward  man-
ner.  They  are  all  in  a  little  different  place.  Some  of  our  companies
have nuclear primarily, and it is easy for them to think about this
issue and deal with it. Some like ourselves are predominantly coal.
It  is  a  different—we  start  in  a  different  point.  But  if  I  look  at  the
climate  programs  that  existed  during  the  1990s  in  terms  of  green-
house  gas  reductions,  I  look  at  what  has  happened  over  the  last
five or six years, our industry is really starting to step up and deal
with  this  issue  in  a  very  responsible  way.  And  I  am  proud  to  be
part  of  an  industry,  and  one  that  has  such  a  direct  impact  on  so
many, because who doesn’t use electricity. And I see people increas-
ingly  look  at  this  issue  in  our  industry,  and  I  think  that  is  a  good
thing.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Thank  you  for  that.  Thank  you  for  your

leadership. I hope that there is some followership.

Dr. McFarland.
Dr.  MCFARLAND.  Yes,  I  agree  that  there  is  an  increasing  trend
of  industries  stepping  forward  to  deal  with  this  issue  in  a  prudent
manner  and  take  action.  You  see  this  initially  with  global  compa-
nies  that  are  having  to  operate  in  a  carbon-constrained  world  in
other regions. About half of our business and 40 percent of our op-
erations  are  outside  the  United  States,  and  we  are  operating  in
carbon-constrained  regimes.  And  there  are  other  global  companies
that  are  having  to  do  the  same.  So  it  is—you  know,  as  I  said,  it
is  a  social,  economic,  and  environmental  reality  for  many  compa-
nies.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Mr. Meissen.
Mr.  MEISSEN.  I  do  agree  with  you.  Some  people  struggle  with
this concept of climate change. It is happening in distant places. It
is  going  to  happen  in  the  future.  But  at  Baxter,  we  focus  on  im-
proving efficiencies, environmental stewardship. We put it in terms
of  being  more  efficient,  effective,  cost-effective.  It  makes  us  more
competitive.  And  that  is—by  focusing  on  our  energy  management
program,  which  is—most  of  our  energy  greenhouse  gas  emissions
are  associated  with  that.  By  driving  on  that,  pushing  on  that,  we
are able to also reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Dr. Hobbs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

Dr.  HOBBS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  believe  our  Chairman,  George
David,  has  been  both  visible  and  vocal  on  the  issues  of  environ-
mental  protection  and  sustainability  globally.  I  am  very  proud  of
the  stand  he  has  taken  in  these  issues.  UTC  also  partners  with
others,  including  EPA  Climate  Leaders,  Pew  Climate  Center,  and
closer  to  home,  the  Connecticut  Climate  Change  Group.  So  we  are
working  with  our  other  industry  people  to  try  to  both  understand
and share practices.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Well,  you  know,  there  are  some  doubters
out there. We are still doing our leveled best to try to convince the
doubters that they shouldn’t be so skeptical.

But  Mr.  Rogers,  in  your  testimony,  you  had  some  interesting
commentary,  and  I  would  like  you  to  repeat  it  a  little  bit  and  ask
the  others  to  comment.  Suppose  we  are  wrong.  What  is  the  worst
case if we are wrong?

Mr.  ROGERS.  If  we  are  wrong,  what  it  means  is  we  have  devel-
oped  technologies  that  are  more  environmentally-friendly.  What  is
wrong with that?

Chairman BOEHLERT. That is exactly right.
Mr.  ROGERS.  And  we  help  our  customers.  Particularly  if  you  are
a power supplier, you help your customers use energy more wisely.
What  is  wrong  with  that?  And  as  I  see  it,  we  are  moving  direc-
tionally. I see it with SOΧ, NOΧ, mercury, and I see it with carbon.
We are moving more and more to almost, not quite, because I don’t
think  the  cost-benefit  test  can  be  met,  but  we  are  moving  in  a  di-
rection of minimizing our emissions from all operations across this
country.  I  think  that  that  is  a  standard  that  we  are  moving  on
around the world. Now there is a place where it doesn’t make sense
to reduce further, but the reality is I think most global companies,
both  companies  that  are  looking  at  what  is  going  on  around  the
world  and  are  looking  at  the  science  are  saying,  ‘‘We  need  to  deal
with this issue. We need to be responsible about this issue.’’

And  I  remember,  Mr.  Chairman,  a  senior  partner  of  mine  when
I practiced law here in Washington, Bob Strauss. And Strauss used
to  say,  ‘‘When  you  see  a  parade  form  on  an  issue  in  Washington,
you  have  two  choices:  you  can  throw  your  body  in  front  of  it  and
let them walk over you, or you can jump in front of the parade and
pretend it is yours.’’

Chairman BOEHLERT. Very fortunately, he is still providing lead-

ership in a whole wide range of areas to this day.

Dr. McFarland, do you have a comment?
Dr. MCFARLAND. Yes, I agree entirely that this makes sense any-
way from a wide range—for a wide range of issues. With global eco-
nomic  growth,  we  must  learn  to  use  our  resources,  natural  re-
sources,  more  effectively.  Saving  energy  makes  sense,  economic
sense, especially when you see rising energy prices, energy security
issues.  So  even  if  we  are  wrong  about  climate  change,  which  I  be-
lieve  that  we  are  not,  and  our  company  believes  we  are  not,  then
the actions that we have taken make sense.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Well, as you pointed out in your testimony,

the scientific case continues to be strengthened every day.

Dr. MCFARLAND. Yes.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  The  scientific  consensus  is  clearly  there.
You understand it. You have outlined to us the benefits to your in-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

dividual  companies  and  to  society.  I  love  Mr.  Rogers,  and  I  wish
he  would  speak  some  time,  but  we  won’t  have  him  do  it  now,  his
grandkids theory. We were discussing that yesterday. And the test
that  he  applies  in  many  of  his  decisions:  ‘‘How  is  this  going  to  im-
pact on my grandkids?’’ Very important.

Mr. Meissen.
Mr. MEISSEN. Well, I don’t see a downside. I only see an upside.
I  see  an  upside  to  becoming  more  energy  efficient,  more—reducing
costs, becoming more competitive. I see an upside working with our
many suppliers, and by working with them on the Lean and Clean
principles  that  I  mentioned,  they  also  become  more  competitive.
And  also,  which  is  very  important  for  Baxter  and  other  companies
that  have  many  suppliers,  they  are  more  reliable.  And  they  are
going to be in business longer and be there to deliver the products
and  services  that  they  provide  our  company.  And  I  also  think  that
there  is  no  downside,  just  an  upside  in  acting  responsibly  for  the
company.  And  I  believe  our  customers,  shareholders,  stakeholders
expect us to do that.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much.
And Dr. Hobbs?
Dr. HOBBS. Taking the actions that we have at UTC are not only
protecting  the  environment,  but  they  are  saving  us  money  and
making  us  more  effective  in  creating  better  products  for  us,  so  all
of that is good. Furthermore, I hope that we don’t have to have the
trash pile up in front of our house before we realize that we should
produce less waste. That is really all we are talking about.

Chairman BOEHLERT. So it is a win-win situation.
Dr. HOBBS. Absolutely.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you all very much.
My time has expired.
Mr. Gordon.
Mr. GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
So  oftentimes,  we  have  a  bad  news  panel.  This  is  nice  to  have
a  good  news  panel  today.  Dr.  McFarland,  I  think  you  hit  a  good
note when you reminded all of us that we should not penalize early
movers.  That  needs  to  be  echoed  so  that  as  this  process  goes  for-
ward that we reward and not penalize.

And Mr. Rogers, you were very impressive in laying out the logic

But  what  I  would  like  to  do  is  turn  to  the  international  folks

of your case.

here first.

As  we  all  know,  the  Kyoto  protocol  has  been  ratified  by  the  req-
uisite number of countries. What I would like to better understand
is what you are going to be required to do internationally that you
are  not  going  to  be  doing  here,  what  is  the  cost  of  that  in  terms
of  competitiveness,  and  what  would  be  necessary  to  get  you  to  the
Kyoto  levels.  So  I  will—maybe  we  will  just  do  it  in  reverse  order
here.

Dr.  HOBBS.  Mr.  Gordon,  UTC  is  a  global  company.  We  make
more  of  our  revenue  outside  the  United  States  than  inside  the
United States, or at least have more employees outside the United
States.  We  have  been  taking  our  environmental  actions  globally
right  from  the  beginning.  The  kinds  of  energy  reductions  and——

Mr. GORDON. But if I could——

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

Dr. HOBBS. I didn’t talk about, like, air emission reductions.
Mr.  GORDON.  Well,  excuse  me.  I  don’t  mean  to  be  discourteous,
but  we  have  got  a  limited  time  here.  More  specifically,  what  are
you going to be doing internationally—what are you going to be re-
quired to do internationally that you are not going to be doing here
and how is that——

Dr.  HOBBS.  Well,  what  I  was  about  to  say  is  that  we  are  not
going  to  do  anything  internationally,  because  we  are  already—we
believe we are already doing it.

Mr. GORDON. And are you doing the same——
Dr.  HOBBS.  We  are  doing  the  same  thing  in  the  United  States.
Mr. GORDON.—domestically? So it has no impact.
Dr. HOBBS. I believe that is the case.
Mr. GORDON. Thank you.
And what about DuPont?
Dr. MCFARLAND. I think it is the same case for DuPont. We view
this  as  a  global  issue.  We  are  taking  actions.  We  do  have  plants
in  Europe,  for  example,  that  are  under  the  cap  and  trade,  but  the
energy  efficiency  put  us  in—well  positioned  right  now.  The  ques-
tion is going forward. But to date, it—there is no——

Mr.  GORDON.  So  you  think  domestically  you  will  be  meeting  the

Kyoto standards?

Dr. MCFARLAND. We reset our goals and we looked at energy effi-

ciency improvements. It is being done globally.

Mr. GORDON. But do you expect that here, domestically, you will

reach the Kyoto standards?

Dr. MCFARLAND. Yes.
Mr.  GORDON.  Okay.  And  what  about  Baxter?  I  am  not  trying  to

criticize. I am just trying to better understand here.

Mr.  MEISSEN.  We  are  working  to  reduce  our  greenhouse  gas
emissions.  To  meet  the  Kyoto  standard  may  require  some  addi-
tional  efforts  than  we  currently  have.  We  have  been  preparing  for
a carbon cap and——

Mr.  GORDON.  Okay.  When  you  say  that,  do  you  mean  inter-

nationally or domestically?

Mr. MEISSEN. Both.
Mr. GORDON. Okay.
Mr. MEISSEN. Both. We are in—we realize that the cap-and-trade
schemes  are  emerging  around  the  world,  and  it  is  taking  place  in
Europe.  And  in  anticipating  that,  we  became  a  founding  member
of the Chicago Climate Exchange, which is a carbon cap and trade
organization  in  Chicago,  which  I  might  talk  about  later,  but—as  a
member company. And there, we are gaining experience in trading.
We are gaining experience in making our greenhouse gas emissions
database  more  robust.  And  we  are  gaining  institutional  knowledge
in  how  that  operates  so  that  we  can  better  respond  to  these  cap
and trade systems as they emerge.

Mr.  GORDON.  So  do  you  expect  to  meet  the  international  Kyoto

Mr.  MEISSEN.  We  expect  to  meet  the  emissions  limits  for  those

standards?

facilities that are affected.

Mr. GORDON. Internationally?
Mr. MEISSEN. Right.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

Mr.  GORDON.  Indeed.  What  more  will  be  needed  here  in  this

country for you to accomplish that?

Mr. MEISSEN. I believe that as we go forward into the future, we
are going to be adopting more state-of-the-art technologies, more ef-
ficient utility systems. We are going to——

Mr.  GORDON.  Well,  is  it  the  cost?  I  mean,  are  you  concerned

about losing a competitive advantage to do that?

Mr. MEISSEN. No. I—we are taking—our approach is a global ap-
proach,  just  like  these  other  gentlemen.  And  we—by  driving
down—we  are  seeing  the  benefits  of  being  more  efficient  in  seeing
and  realizing  those  benefits,  it  is  spurring  us  on  to  achieve  more.

Mr. GORDON. Mr. Rogers wrote—go ahead, sir.
Mr.  ROGERS.  Congressman,  let  me  caution  a  little  bit  on  Kyoto,

if I may.

or——

mark.

may.

Mr.  GORDON.  I  am  not  trying  to—I  am  not  either  advocating

Mr. ROGERS. No.
Mr.  GORDON.  I  just  want  to  know  where  we  are  to  get  a  bench-

Mr.  ROGERS.  But  let  me  kind  of  make  an  important  point,  if  I

If you look at—Kyoto goes back to 1990 levels.
Mr. GORDON. Right.
Mr.  ROGERS.  I  think  it  is  impossible,  particularly  for  the  power
industry,  to  go  back  to  1990  levels,  given  how  much  our  economy
has grown over the last 15 years. If you put a stake in the ground
around  2000,  it  is  a  more  prudent  approach,  given  where  we  are
today  across  this  country  in  the  growth  of  the  demand  for  elec-
tricity.  As  I  think  about  going  forward,  the  prudent  way  forward
is to think more about slowing down the rate of emissions and then
starting  to  reduce  the  emissions  level.  And  that  is  a  strategy  that
matches up with concerns by environmentalists who talk about the
carbon  debt,  and  also  matches  up  extremely  well  with  a—from  a
cost-benefit standpoint.

And  finally,  I  would  suggest  that  Kyoto  is  such  a  politically-
charged word. We are much better off, as we think about reducing
carbon  going  forward,  to  come  up  with  a  son  or  daughter  of  Kyoto
rather than that.

Mr. GORDON. Well, let me ask you this. There are other countries
that  have  adopted  Ktoto.  I  mean,  they  may  game  it  or  not.  But
what  is  going  to  happen  to  those  power  companies  in  the  other
countries? Are they to go back to 1990? I know that, as you pointed
out,  they  probably  have  more  of  a  nuclear  base  that  might  make
it easier, but are they going to make the 1990 baseline or are they
just going to game it or give up or what is going to happen?

Mr. ROGERS. I had the opportunity yesterday to have lunch with
Prime  Minister  Blair,  and  we  talked  about  the  United  Kingdom.
The  United  Kingdom  is  an  interesting  situation,  because  they  are
meeting  their  targets  and  why  are  they  meeting  their  targets  in
the generation? Because they had a lot of coal. What has happened
is, starting in the 1990s, and really with Thatcher, what they have
done is shut down their coal plants and really converted to gas fire
generation  in  a  large  movement.  That  has  been  responsible  for  a
lot  of  their  change.  They  have  been  able  to  take  natural  gas  out

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

tion?

of  the  North  Sea,  bring  it  into  the  United  Kingdom,  and  use  it.  If
you go to a country like France, they already have 75 to 80 percent
of  their  generation  in  nuclear,  so  no  problem.  The  countries  who
will  have  the  difficulty  will  be  Germany.  Germany  is—there  the
government has cut a deal with the Green Party to effectively shut
down nuclear by 2025. I don’t see how they are able to hit a Kyoto
target  in  2012  if  they  are  facing  a  shut  down  of  nuclear  units  in
subsequent years.

The  following  point  on  this  is  it  is  not  clear  yet  if  they  will  hit
the  Kyoto  targets,  which  are  really  2012  targets,  and  are  other
countries.  Some  of  the  countries  have  got  a  head  start,  and  the
United  Kingdom  would  be  an  example  of  that  because  of  the  con-
version from coal to gas that happened in the 1990s.

Mr.  GORDON.  So  what  does  that  mean  for  our  competitive  posi-

Mr.  ROGERS.  The  troubling  competitive  issue  is  if  they  start  to
try  to  say  that  U.S.  companies  are  subsidized  because  they  are
not——

Mr. GORDON. You inferred a trade problem. So are you foreseeing
that  there  could  be,  again,  whatever  trade  allegations  brought
against us and penalties on the international scale?

Mr. ROGERS. I could see the EU and countries and companies in
the EU starting to use that as an argument that U.S. countries are
subsidized because they don’t have to comply with Kyoto, as a con-
sequence,  their  products  are  cheaper.  I  think  that  is  a  possibility.
We haven’t seen that yet, but I think that is a possibility.

Mr. GORDON. I wish we could talk more, but my time is up.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Dr. McFarland, did you want to respond to

Mr. Gordon? Okay. Fine.

Mr. Bonner.
Mr. BONNER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Many people back in our Districts have—who have seen corpora-
tions  move  overseas  in  a  global  economy  have  asked  questions  of
us  over  the  years  what  are  we  doing  to  stop  these  job  losses.  You
have  got  companies  that  go  to  India  or  China  or  places  in  Europe
or Central or South America, and the belief is that they don’t have
the same minimum wage standards that we have. They don’t have
the same environmental protection laws that we have. For those of
you who have companies in or plants in other countries, how do our
environmental laws and what we are doing compare with the plant
operations  that  you  have  got  in  China,  or  in  India,  or  in  Europe,
or  in  other  parts  of  the  world?  Are  we  putting  our  U.S.  companies
at  a  disadvantage  in  terms  of  being  able  to  stay  on  the  continent
and provide jobs to American workers? It is an open question.

Dr. MCFARLAND. You know, I would be happy to provide more in-
formation,  because  this  is  somewhat  outside  my  area  of  expertise.
But  speaking  for  DuPont  strictly,  we  have  one  environmental
standard around the world. And wherever we put a plant, it is the
same standard. So you know, that is not an issue for us.

Dr. HOBBS. For UTC, it is much the same. Our—we endeavor to
hold  everyone  that  works  for  UTC  to  the  same  standards  of  envi-
ronmental performance, and by the way, the same ethical perform-
ance.  And  we  provide  things  like  education  evenly  all  over  the
globe.  We  don’t  set  wage  standards  in  all  of  the  places  that  we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

have  factories,  but  to  the  extent  that  we  are  using  our  rules,  we
have global standards.

Mr. BONNER. And let me just add to Dr. McFarland since he has
the  plant  in  my  District,  we  are  grateful  for  the  jobs  that  DuPont
provides  in  south  Alabama  and  consider  you  all  very  good,  out-
standing corporate citizens.

Mr. Rogers, I would like to go to a question that comes from one
of  the  comments  you  made  earlier  in  your  statement,  and  that  is
that  states  are  not—and  I  want  to  get  your  quote  right,  increas-
ingly  taking  on  added  roles  in  their  monitoring  and  regulation  on
greenhouse  emissions.  In  your  judgment,  since  there  are  50  states
and obviously 50 different standards, is that an added hardship or
is  that  something  that  your  company  welcomes  in  terms  of  the
added emphasis that state governments are applying?

Mr. ROGERS. I think it is an additional hardship from the stand-
point—I mean, you create this patchwork of different regulations in
different  states,  and  it—one  of  the—from  a  national  policy  stand-
point, we ought to have environmental policies that apply across all
of  our  country  in  every  state,  and  we—and  it  should  be  a  national
policy,  not  state.  I  think  it  would  make  it  very  difficult  for  compa-
nies  to  operate  in  this  country,  particularly  in  the  power  industry.
If  you  have  one  rule  in  Alabama,  you  have  got  another  rule  in
Georgia, another rule in the Carolinas. The question is how—what
does  that  mean  when  power  flows  between  states.  And  so  to  have
the  states  weighing  in  with  specific  rules  that  are  different  than
the EPA, I believe, would be a problem.

Mr. BONNER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much.
Mr. Carnahan.
Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I  want  to  compliment  all  of  the  panel  on  the  work  that  you  are

doing —your leadership in this important environmental area.

I wanted to get some additional comment from each of you quick-
ly,  because  I  guess,  Dr.  McFarland,  you  had  expressed  concern
about  being  put  at  a  competitive  disadvantage,  and  Mr.  Meissen
had  indicated  that  he  believed  they  were  actually  achieving  some
competitive  advantage  from  some  of  the  activities  and  develop-
ments. And I wanted to see if there is really a difference of opinion
here or get your additional comment about that.

Dr. MCFARLAND. I don’t see a difference of opinion on that. What
we are—you know, what Mr. Meissen is talking about is in the cur-
rent  climate.  And  we,  too,  are  saving  money  by  our  energy  effi-
ciency  goals.  However,  if  some  sort  of  regime  is  set  up  where  you
are set to a standard that is based on historical performance, then
the  companies  that  have  moved  early  have  already  picked  their
low-hanging fruit. They have done the things that they can do most
economically. So if it is set on a prior performance standard, those
that have moved are going to have to spend more to meet a reduc-
tion target, given reduction target, as compared to those who have
not taken action.

So  the  difference  is  Mr.  Meissen  is  talking  about  in  the  current
climate. And we, too, have saved money in the current climate, but
we  are  talking  about  in  a  regulatory,  carbon-constrained  regime

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

where  you  are  set  to  a  standard  that  is  based  on  some  prior  per-
formance.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Just  let  me  interrupt  here,  and  I  will  not

take this out of your time.

I want to point out that you should be credited and not penalized
for  your  early,  positive,  constructive  action,  and  that  is  our  objec-
tive.

The gentleman is——
Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. Meissen, did you have any additional comment?
Mr. MEISSEN. Okay. Thanks a lot.
I  think  many  companies  expect  that  they  would  be  credited  for
the initial activities that they have done. Their participation in the
voluntary  programs,  such  as  U.S.  EPA  Climate  Leaders  program,
the  different  registries  in  different  states.  I  do  believe  that  it  is  a
challenge  to  have  different  regulations  in  different  states,  and  a
uniform framework and a uniform time frame, I think, will be ben-
eficial  for  companies.  They  would  provide  companies  flexibility  in
planning,  especially  capital  planning  cycles,  which  are  multi-year
cycles,  and  if  there  is  a  requirement  to  invest  in  maybe  expensive
core  generation  systems,  it  has  great  savings  also,  then  they  can
work that into their strategic planning cycle and capital cycle.

Mr. CARNAHAN. I guess I want to also close with a quick question
to  get  your  opinion  about  what  you  believe  would  be  some  of  the
best  things  we  could  do  from  the  public  policy  perspective  to
incentivize  and  encourage  companies  to  continue  with  some  of
these cutting-edge actions. Really, any of the panel.

Dr. MCFARLAND. Well, it—to provide some assurance, regulatory
assurance,  that  those  who  have—are  taking  forward—or  are  step-
ping  forward  with  action  are  credited  for  those  actions  going  for-
ward.

Mr.  ROGERS.  I  think  another  thing  that  the  Committee  could  do
is continue to take a holistic review of the R&D programs the gov-
ernment  now  funds  and  look  at  ways  to  jump-start  some  of  these
programs and where the focus is on the D part of the programs and
also  more  toward  the  deployment  and  not  just  the  development.
And I think that would be a movement in the right direction.

Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  The  Committee  is  proud  of  the  leadership
provided  in  advancing  clean  coal  technology,  and  I  would  imagine,
Mr. Rogers, you would be a cheerleader in that arena.

Mr. ROGERS. Yes, sir.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you very much.
The  distinguished  Vice  Chairman  of  the  Committee,  Mr.  Gut-

knecht.

Mr. GUTKNECHT. Well, thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. And
let  me  thank  you,  Chairman,  for  bringing  this  distinguished  panel
here today.

I want to compliment all of you and your companies for what you
are  doing.  And  I  happen  to  agree  that,  long-term,  this  makes  good
sense.  It  makes  good  business  sense,  it  makes  good  environmental
sense, and so I just want to congratulate all of you and the compa-
nies that you represent, because the testimony here has been excel-
lent, and I agree with the basic point.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

But  I  do  want  to  pursue  something  that  Mr.  Bonner  from  Ala-
bama  raised.  And  I  think  it  is—I  wasn’t  completely  satisfied  with
the responses that we had. One of the reasons that the Kyoto pro-
tocols  received  a  rather  chilly  reception  up  here  on  Capitol  Hill,  I
think,  was  because  it  exempted  some  of  the  developing  countries,
and  in  particular,  China  and  India.  And  there  is  growing  concern
in  all  kinds  of  businesses  that  I  talk  to  on  a  regular  basis  in  my
District, and I suspect my District is no different than the Districts
of  most  of  my  colleagues  here  on  this  side  of  the  panel,  and  that
is that we were going to impose fairly strict standards on American
enterprises  but  not  on  those  in  developing  countries,  like  China
and  India.  I  wonder  if  you  could  give  us  a  little  more  response  to
that.  And  how  serious  is  that  problem?  And  long-term,  you  know,
where do we go from here?

Mr. ROGERS. Congressman, let me suggest that you can not have
an  effective  climate  program  without  having  both  China  and  India
as part of it.

The question really is raised, well, what do we do as we work to
make  them  part  of  it.  I  think  it  has  to  be  the  industrial  countries
of the world, and clearly China and India, given how fast they are
growing, the number of power plants they are building, the number
of factories they are building. So the question is how do you get the
timing right on that. We could, as a country—it was good judgment
not to go back to 1990 levels at this point. But good judgment also
tells  you  that  we  need  to  work  to  start  to  reduce  the  rate  of  emis-
sions  in  preparation,  and  but  we  have  to  work  hard  to  make  sure
internationally  we  bring  those  two  countries  along.  If  you  could
bring  those  two  countries,  then  over  time,  you  would  bring  other
developing countries along, but they clearly have to be part of this
to get a good result.

Mr. GUTKNECHT. Anybody else?
Does  it  place—particularly  small  manufacturers.  I  think  it  is
easier if you are a big player and you have access to lots of capital
and,  more  importantly,  you  have  a  strong  science  and  technology
base  to  your  company  anyway.  I  think  it  is  relatively—it  is  easier
for companies like yours, with all due respect, than it is if you were
a smaller company that is building widgets in north Mankato, Min-
nesota  that—you  know,  they  can’t  do  that  kind  of  thing.  And  that
is where I think a lot of the fear was.

Anyway, that is not really a question. I would just yield back my

time. And again, thank you for what you do.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Mr. Lipinski.
Mr. LIPINSKI. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I would like to, as my colleagues have done, applaud everyone on
the  panel  here  for  what  your  companies  have  done  to  improve  the
environment.

Now the question that I have, the first question comes from what
Dr.  McFarland  said,  he  had  talked  about  he  doesn’t  want  compa-
nies  to  be  penalized,  those  who  have  picked  the  low-hanging  fruit,
to be penalized if there are some regulations put out that they are
penalized  as  compared  to  other  companies  who  still  have  the  low-
hanging  out  there.  And  I  think  we  certainly  all  agree  about  that.
But  my  question  is,  and  we  will  start  with  Dr.  McFarland,  and  I
want  to  hear  from  everyone  on  the  panel,  how  far  have  you  gone

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

now in picking all of the low-hanging fruit. Are you close to the end
now  of  reductions?  You  have  gotten  the  low-hanging  fruit,  and  we
all know once it gets tougher, then there is much less economic in-
centives and other incentives to make further reductions. Is this it?
Are  you  close  to  the  end  of  what  is  going  to  be  easy  to  do?  And
what incentive is there to do any more?

Dr. MCFARLAND. Well, clearly we have picked the lowest-hanging
fruit,  but  technology  is  not  static.  We  are  continuing  to  drive  to-
ward  lower  emissions  and  improving  our  performance  on  these.  It
is difficult to answer, because the way we make the decisions is to
provide marginal cost curves for what projects we can undertake to
achieve,  you  know,  the  best  greenhouse  gas  emission  reductions,
and  those  marginal  cost  curves  change  yearly  with  advances  in
technology.  So  I  am  not  trying  to  avoid  your  question,  it  is  just  a
difficult  question  with  the  technology  changing.  We  could  continue
to  focus  on  making  project—process—progress  to  reducing  our
emissions.

Mr.  LIPINSKI.  Are  there—right  now,  and  this  is  for  Dr.  McFar-
land  and  all  of  you,  are  there—do  you  have  items  right  now  that
are in the works in the plans to do more reductions?

Dr. MCFARLAND. Yes.
Mr. LIPINSKI. Mr. Rogers.
Mr.  ROGERS.  I  would  approach  the  question  by  saying  we  are  in
the business of supplying electricity, and we have to have the capa-
bility  to  meet  whatever  demand  is  placed  on  us  in  the  future,  and
we  operate  in  an  area  where  there  is  growing  demand  for  elec-
tricity,  so  we  have  to  build  more  generation.  So  our  ability  to  do
that, if we build gas-fired plants, is  o  the carbon emission of a coal
plant. Gas prices today are $5 to $7, and the economics of that are
questionable.  And  the—a  broader  question  of  our  country,  do  we
really  want  to  have  our  power  generation  increasingly  dependent,
ultimately, on foreign sources of natural gas.

We  are  also  looking  at  an  integrating  coal  gasification  facility.
That  would  allow  us  to  reduce  our  emissions  even  further,  if  we
can  build  that  and  it  makes  economic  sense.  We  are  currently,  as
I  mentioned  before,  working  with  GE  and  Bechtel  trying  to  nego-
tiate the building of a facility like that. And that would be a $1 bil-
lion investment. So we continue to look at investments and the en-
vironmental  footprint  of  the  investment  is  very  critical  to  how—
what decision we make.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Mr. Meissen.
Mr. MEISSEN. Yes. Most of Baxter’s greenhouse gas emissions are
associated with the use of energy. And because of that, Baxter has
a  very  active  energy  management  program.  We  have  a  network  of
energy  managers  in  our  largest  facilities.  We  hold  energy  con-
ferences,  a  global  energy  conference  every  two  years.  And  we  are
doing energy audits, energy reviews of all of our major facilities on
a frequent basis. And when we do these reviews, we do find oppor-
tunities. The projects, because of the dynamics of our organizations
and  many  other  companies  like  us,  the  manufacturing  processes
are  changing,  the  fuel  costs  are  changing,  the  opportunities  are
coming  before  us  that  we  find.  People  say,  ‘‘Well,  we  have  picked
all  our  low-hanging  fruit,’’  and  I  believe  that—my  experience  at
Baxter is that the tree keeps growing, the fruit keeps coming down

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

lower, and every year we can go around and pick some more fruit.
And  so  it  is  a  continuous  process  of  being  more  efficient  and  look-
ing for projects. And we always have a bank of projects that we are
working on and additional projects that we can work before us.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Dr. Hobbs.
Dr.  HOBBS.  Mr.  Lipinski,  UTC  is  coming  to  the  end  of  the  first
decade of its environmental goals, and we are developing our goals
for  the  next  decade.  They  will  continue  to  say  we  will  improve  in
greenhouse  gas  emissions  and  reductions  in  energy  usage.  But  we
are looking more actively now at other parts of the value chain for
new  areas  that  we  can  make  the  impact.  So  we  are  looking  at  our
partners  and  suppliers.  How  can  we  partner  with  them  to  make
sure  they  are  doing  the  same  things  we  are?  But  we  are  looking
for additional places to harvest low-hanging fruit as we go forward.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  BOEHLERT.  To  follow  up  on  Mr.  Lipinski’s  question,
are  there  federal  technology  development  or  demonstration  pro-
grams  that  have  or  could  make  a  difference?  I  guess  what  he  is
looking  for,  and  so  am  I,  and  I  am  sure  all  of  us,  is  sort  of  guid-
ance. What more can we do? So are there federal technology devel-
opment  programs  that  have  made  a  difference,  or,  if  they  were
more adequately funded, could make a significant difference?

Mr. Rogers.
Mr.  ROGERS.  I  am  delighted  with  that  question,  because  I  think
back—on  the  project  we  are  trying  to  create  today  on  coal  gasifi-
cation,  I  think  back  to  the  early  1990s.  And  we  were  the  bene-
ficiary  of  a  grant  from  the  Department  of  Energy  to  build  a  coal
gasification  facility,  one  of  only  two  that  were  built  in  the  United
States in the early 1990s. And we built it in Indiana, Wabash River
Plant. And we used the Dow technology there. And we took the gas
that  came  out  of  that  unit  and  generated  electricity.  Here  we  are
today,  more  than  a  decade  later,  working  on  a  coal  gas  plant  that
is  going  to  be  closer  to  being  what  I  call  a  commercial  project
versus demonstration. I think it is going to be very critical to have
additional  funding  for  carbon  sequestration  projects  and  carbon
capture projects in these coal gas, because the economics of coal gas
is  very  close  to  pulverized  coal,  depending  on  your  assumptions
about how carbon constrained we are in the future. The thing that
really  needs  to  be  funded  on  these  coal  gas  projects  is  really  the
funding  of  the  carbon  sequestration.  And  I  think  that  would  be
very  important  in  order  to  allow  further  development  of  the—be-
cause  as  you  know,  in  technology,  it  is  not  the  first  generation,
often not the second, but it is generally the third, fourth, and fifth
technology,  or  generations  in  these  technologies  where  it  becomes
very cost-effective. We need more money to experiment with carbon
sequestration.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Does anyone else care to comment on that?
Dr.  HOBBS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  personally  am  from  our  research
center,  and  so  we  have  been  very  pleased  to  have  help  from  the
government  on  occasions  to  help  us  develop  new  products  more
rapidly that wouldn’t come along as quickly without your help. One
of our projects we are working on recently is basically an air condi-
tioner  running  backwards.  An  air  conditioner,  normally  you  put  in
electricity  and  you  get  out  cold  air.  We  said,  ‘‘Suppose  you  put  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

hot air. Can you get out electricity?’’ So we took a Carrier air condi-
tioner, take a thermal waste heat source and get hundreds of kilo-
watts  of  electricity  out  of  it.  In  partnership  with  the  Department
of  Energy,  we  are  able  to  try  this  in  some  field  tests,  for  instance,
at  some  geothermal  sites  in  Alaska  we  are  hoping  for  later  in  the
year.  There  is  important  opportunity  to  try  some  things  quickly
that  we  wouldn’t  be  able  to  do  on  our  own  and  maybe  bring  some
new products to market that make really good use of waste energy.
Huge  amount  of  waste  energy.  If  we  could  harvest  a  lot  more  of
that  to  reduce  the  generation  requirements  in  this  country,  that
would be really a neat opportunity.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Okay.  And  I  would  appreciate  after  this
hearing,  we  will  probably  correspond  with  each  of  you,  one,  to
thank  you  for  your  outstanding  testimony,  and  two,  maybe  to  ask
some  additional  questions.  And  I  would  appreciate  it  if  you  would
give some thought to that question, specific question, what more do
you think, short of writing a blank check for all research, and that
is obviously not going to happen, but what more do you think, spe-
cifically,  we  should  do  in  terms  of  the  Congress  in  providing  fund-
ing  for  the  demonstration  programs  that  offer  some  real  promise?
And so we will follow through on that.

Ms. Biggert.
Ms. BIGGERT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
My first question is for Mr. Meissen.
I  understand,  and  it  was  in  your  testimony,  that  there  are  a
number  of  companies  in  the  Chicago  area  that  have  formed  the
Chicago Climate Exchange, the first voluntary pilot carbon-trading
platform. Can you tell me what is its purpose and something about
your participation in that exchange?

Mr. MEISSEN. Okay. Yes. Thank you, Representative.
Approximately two years ago, the Chicago Climate Exchange was
formed. This is the first multi-sector, multi-national carbon trading
scheme performed in—actually in existence in the United States. It
was  formed  initially  by  14  companies.  Baxter  was  one.  Currently,
there  are  over  90  members  in  different—members  in  different  cat-
egories of membership.

The purpose of the exchange is to demonstrate that a carbon cap
and  trade  scheme  can  work,  to  demonstrate  the  procedures,  dem-
onstrate that a metric ton of carbon, there could be a cost assigned
to  that  in  a  trading  scheme.  And  for  Baxter,  we  found  that  very
beneficial to us, because we are learning what that is all about. We
are  developing  institutional  knowledge  on  how  it  works.  And  that
helps  prepare  us  to  address  carbon  cap  and  trade  schemes  as  they
evolve around the world.

Ms.  BIGGERT.  And  this  is  the  first?  There  haven’t  been  any  oth-
ers  throughout  the  country?  Have  people  contacted  you  on  how  to
form this or anything? Is this——

Mr.  MEISSEN.  Oh,  yes.  We  have  gotten  a  lot  of  good  recognition
for this. They have asked us about our participation in it. We have
also been asked to speak on that in a number of forums.

Ms. BIGGERT. How do the energy requirements of manufacturing
at  Baxter  differ  from  some  of  the  other  companies  and  industries
that might be involved?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Mr. MEISSEN. One of the major differences with energy usage for
Baxter  that  is  a  manufacturer  of  health  care  products  is  that  we
have to manufacture them in clean rooms under sterile conditions.
And so our clean rooms and production operations relating to them
are  very  energy-intensive.  But  we  focus  a  lot  of  effort  on  making
those more efficient. And we recently were going to a concept called
isolators  where  instead  of  building  a  large  clean  room,  we  are
building a small self-contained production unit where the basic pro-
duction  takes  place,  and  those  units  are  much  more  effective  and
provide higher levels of quality. It assures quality and also reduces
energy costs.

Ms. BIGGERT. Okay. Thank you.
And Mr. Rogers, you mentioned a merger with Duke Power. And

I understand that that company has nuclear facilities.

Mr.  ROGERS.  Yes,  ma’am,  they  do,  indeed.  And  actually,  one  of
the reasons why we thought combining with them was a good thing
for  us,  we  were  the  largest  non-nuclear  generator  in  the  United
States,  primarily  coal  and  gas,  and  by  combining  with  Duke,  who
is  a  recognized  leader  in  the  operation  of  nuclear,  it  gives  us  the
capability  to  use  that  technology,  because  we  don’t—there  are  no
silver bullets for the future, and we don’t know what technology is
going  to  be  the  right  technology,  because  we  don’t  know  what  the
rules  will  be  yet  with  respect  to  environmental  requirements.  And
there might be a day where nuclear again is important to our coun-
try. I sense that it might well be.

Ms.  BIGGERT.  So  I  know  that  even  the  Administration  has  just
come out with talking about how we haven’t built a nuclear facility
in  years  and  years  and  years  and  that  there  is  some  talk  about
wanting to further that. Would your company then be in a position
to maybe want to build another reactor?

Mr.  ROGERS.  It  is  my  understanding  that  Duke  has  announced
that  they  would  be  very  interested  in  building  another  nuclear  fa-
cility.  However,  it  is  almost  impossible  for  them  to  contemplate
that unless there is some resolution on the issue of storage of spent
fuel, and the Yucca Mountain issue has been a major forever issue
in  our  industry  that  is  yet  to  be  completely  resolved.  I  think  it
would  be  very  difficult  for  anybody  in  this  country  to  build  a  nu-
clear unit in the face of no resolution of that spent fuel issue.

Ms.  BIGGERT.  Thank  you.  And  we  will  be  having  a  hearing  on

that soon.

Dr.  Hobbs,  you  were  talking  about  the  waste  heat  energy.  What
are  the  obstacles  that  stand  in  the  way  of  making  this  waste  heat
productive?

The  kind  of  product  that  we  are  looking  at  works  very  well  now
if  there  is  high-grade  waste  heat.  And  the  research  efforts  we  are
going to today, particularly, are looking at lower-grade waste heat,
heat that is not as hot when it starts. This includes all things from
solar sources, for instance, solar collectors, to, as I say, geothermal
sites  and  other  sorts  of  sites.  And  the  technology  we  are  working
on  is  how  to  use  this  lower-temperature  heat  effectively,  and  can
you  make  the  whole  process  work.  It  is  exciting  science  right  now.

Ms. BIGGERT. Are there any other market barriers?
Dr.  HOBBS.  I  have  still  got  to  make  the  product  work  before  I

worry about marketing.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

all.

Ms.  BIGGERT.  Well,  thanks  for  all  you  are  doing,  and  thank  you

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you, Ms. Biggert.
Ms. Woolsey.
Ms. WOOLSEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I  would  like  to  piggy-back  on  the  last  question  you  brought  up
to the panel, because you actually stole my question, so I am going
to just take it and go further with it.

It  is  clear  that  it  would  make  a  big  difference  if  products  and
services  that  would  help  you  with  these  new  technologies  were  al-
ready  available  in  the  marketplace  and  that  they  were  available,
affordable, and efficient and did what you needed them to do.

So  I  am  asking  you  a  couple  of  things.  I  mean,  I  am  so  im-
pressed,  Dr.  Hobbs,  that  you  actually  develop  your  own  products
for your solutions. One, if those products were already available on
the  market,  would  you  just  purchase  that  solution  and  those  serv-
ices, and two, are you able to recoup your costs by turning that into
a sellable product yourselves?

Dr. HOBBS. I hope if somebody else had it we might buy the com-
pany. We partner with all sorts of people for solutions. And in fact,
the place that my research center particularly is working now is on
integrated  solutions.  We  are  looking  at  more  than  simple  compo-
nents  but  at  whole  systems  and  how  you  can  take  multiple  things
and  put  them  together  to  gain  efficiency  and  lower  total  cost  and
reduce greenhouse gases and so forth in the process. And so having
other  people—parts  of  systems  that  belong  to  other  people  is  per-
fectly  fine.  The  more  things  that  we  have  to  play  with,  the  more
opportunities there are.

Ms.  WOOLSEY.  Right.  Any  of  you  that  would  like  to  respond
about  what  in  your  own  industries  you  would  take  advantage  of  if
it  were  available  in  the  marketplace,  and  also  with  the  idea  that
I believe green technology is the next future industry of the United
States if we will wake up and get behind it. So what does the Fed-
eral Government need to do to help that industry go forward?

Dr. McFarland, you had a——
Dr.  MCFARLAND.  Yes.  You  bring  up  another  issue.  What  you
heard  about  today,  primarily,  are  the  actions  that  industry  is  tak-
ing  to  reduce  its  own  emissions.  And  you  have  heard  the  other
panel  members,  and  we  as  well,  provide  products  to  increase  the
efficiency of our end users. If you look at how carbon emissions are
spread  across  the  economy,  assigning  the  carbon  emissions  that—
from  Mr.  Rogers’  sites  and  other  utilities’  sites,  to  the  end  user,
about  B  of  the  emissions  come  from  industry.  About  B  come  from
buildings.  And  about  B  come  from  transportation.  It  is  not  exactly
that.  I  could  get  you  better  numbers  on  that.  You  can  find  them
in the reports.

We  have  got  to  engage  all  of  the  sectors  of  the  economy.  This  is
a  global  issue,  as  has  been  pointed  out  before.  We  need  to  engage
all  countries.  But  we  also  need  to  engage  all  sectors  of  the  econ-
omy.  And  what  Dr.  Hobbs  is  talking  about  is  a  better  way  to  con-
vert  energy  and  more  efficiently  use  the  resources,  but  you  have
got to have that pool. The industry is generally very cost-sensitive,
and in some cases, more cost-sensitive than other sectors of the so-
ciety.  So  we  look  at  energy  already  as  a—on  the  bottom  line.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

Projects  that  we  are  talking  about  here  today  I  know  go  beyond
what  we  would—what  would  be  normal  business,  because  they
would  not  normally  make  the  investment  hurdle.  But  again,  you
heard  from  people  here  that  are  looking  at  energy  as  part  of  the
bottom line.

Ms. WOOLSEY. Thank you.
Anybody else want to comment?
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Mr. Sodrel.
Mr. SODREL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
It is great to have a couple Hoosiers here. In fact, I have bought

some of your electricity, Mr. Rogers, as little as possible.

Mr.  ROGERS.  Well,  thank  you  for  whatever  you  bought.  We  need

the money.

Mr.  SODREL.  In  my  other  life,  I  was  in  the  transportation  busi-
ness,  and  we  found  that  reducing  our  energy  use  was  very  cost-ef-
fective, but there is that 90/10 rule that people talk about: you get
90 percent of the benefit by 10 percent of the money. When we had
trucks getting four miles to the gallon, it wasn’t very difficult to get
five. And when you got five, it wasn’t very difficult to get six. What
we  found  was  that  the  latest  technology  in  trucks  costs  more
money  to  acquire,  costs  more  money  to  maintain,  and  burns  more
fuel.  So  it  is  very  difficult  to  get  the  user  excited  about  going  out
and acquiring the asset. So I—you know, we talked a lot about the
Kyoto protocols and how that affects our business. And I appreciate
the  fact  that  American-based  industries  that  are  operating  in  for-
eign  countries  will  apply  our  standards  to  that  operation.  That
doesn’t  mean  that  our  domiciled  in  that  country  will  do  likewise,
which puts us at a cost disadvantage.

I  guess  my  question  is,  Mr.  Meissen  was  talking  about,  you
know,  efforts  in  his  plant,  how  close  are  we  to  getting  to  the  end
here? I mean, I always tell people, in our business, we can save 100
percent  of  our  energy  and  create  no  environmental  problems  if  we
just  lay  off  600  people  and  they  don’t  come  to  work  today.  You
know, then we could save it all. So it is a balance between creating
jobs and doing it with the minimal impact on the environment. And
my  question  is  how  close  do  you  think  you  are  to  the  end  where
it becomes almost prohibitively expensive to cut emissions any fur-
ther?

Mr. MEISSEN. Well, Representative, what we have seen at Baxter
over the last 10 years is we have been able to accomplish an incre-
mental  improvement  in  energy  efficiency  and  an  incremental  im-
provement or reduction in energy costs. And I don’t see the end in
the  next  decade  or—I  mean,  I  see  incremental  improvements  con-
tinuing to increase, because every once in a while, there is a quan-
tum  shift,  there  is  a  new  technology.  We  can  go  10  percent  all  of
a sudden in a certain area. I think it is difficult to anticipate where
that end might be, but I think it is a number of years out for Bax-
ter.

Mr.  ROGERS.  I  would  respond  to  that  by  saying  the  cost-benefit
curve  continues  to  move,  and  we  really  shouldn’t,  sort  of,  have  a
preordained  spot  for  it  in  the  future,  because  as  you  look  at  tech-
nologies,  I  look  at  the  combined  cycle  plants,  gas-fired  plants  have
been developed by GE and how much their efficiency has been im-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

proved  over  the  last  decade.  I  look  at  coal  gasification  and  how
much  we  have  brought  the  costs  down  and  we  are  going  to  have
the  ability  to  do  it  even  in  a  cheaper  way  going  forward.  We  par-
ticipated  and  are  joint  owner  of  a  coal  generation  facility  at  the
Texas City plant with BP where basically the same concept of cap-
turing the heat and fully utilizing it within the system has created
great efficiencies in terms of the utilization of natural gas.

So  I  think  our  country  is  on  a  road,  and  if  we  have  clear  stand-
ards or goal lines with respect to emissions levels, I think we have
the  capability  in  this  country  to  use  our  ingenuity  and  our  ability
to  develop  technological  solutions.  I  think  there  is  no  end  to  what
we can achieve.

I had the good fortune in my life to have Neil Armstrong on our
Board  of  Directors,  which  always  meant  that  I  started  every  con-
versation  ‘‘one  small  step.’’  But  I  think  if  we  had  in  this  country
a kind of a man-to-the-moon type commitment with respect to tech-
nology  and  certain  lines  of  where  we  need  to  be  in  the  future  in
terms of emissions level, I think this country has got the capability
to get it done.

Mr. SODREL. Just a follow up.
Because  all  of  you  have  worked  very  hard  on  emissions  and  re-
ducing  your  emissions,  would  you  work  any  harder,  would  you  be
any more successful if we passed regulations that moved you faster
than  available  technology  can  take  you?  I  mean,  is  our  new  law
going to help you become any more efficient than the existing laws?
Mr. ROGERS. Some of my friends in the industry would say, ‘‘Now
you have gone from preaching to meddling,’’ if you require us to do
something  that  we  don’t  have  the  capability  to  do  or  there  is  not
the technology to do. But I believe that we need to be very sophisti-
cated in the way we think about this, because sometimes if you put
a  stake  in  the  ground,  you  go—you  are  forced  and  you  work  hard
and  you  make  it.  There  might  be  times  where  you  can’t  make  it,
and we need to have regulations that are flexible enough that—and
understand  that  to  get  the  balance  right  on  a  stake-in-the-ground,
we are going to make it, plus some flexibility if it doesn’t work out
that  way.  That  is  where  we  have  got  to  have  very  creative  legisla-
tion  and  regulators  that  really  understand  what  the  goals  are  and
how best to get there, but at the same time not creating something
that is just impossible.

Mr. SODREL. Would anybody else like to respond to that one?
Dr.  HOBBS.  Let  me  just  add  two  or  three  words.  I  think  that  if
there  is  additional  legislation,  flexibility  in  the  approaches  that
companies  have  to  approaching  it  is  the  key  issue.  If—you  know,
to  Mr.  Rogers’  point,  it  is  the  ability  to  use  different  technologies
and bring different things to the table that will be so important for
continuing  to  make  these  strides.  So  if  there  is  legislation,  it  has
to  be  crafted  in  a  way  that  it  doesn’t  inhibit  our  ingenuity  and
flexibility.

utes.

Ms. BIGGERT. [Presiding.] The gentleman’s time has expired.
The gentleman from Texas, Mr. Green, is recognized for five min-

Mr. GREEN. Thank you.
And I would like to thank the Chairman and the Ranking Mem-
ber. I suppose I am especially appreciative of the Ranking Member

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

for allowing me the opportunity to occupy this space. It is a lot big-
ger  when  you  get  here  than  it  appears  to  be  from  the  far  end  of
the table.

I  do  want  to  acknowledge,  as  others  have,  that  we  have  an  out-
standing  group  of  experts  here  today.  And  I  have  been  more  than
impressed with what you have said. I have been inspired. And Mr.
Rogers,  just  to  pick  on  you,  I  want  you  to  know  that  your  com-
ments  most  recently  made  about  what  we  are  capable  of  doing,
those  are  truly  inspirational  comments.  Probably,  had  we  been  in
another  venue,  someone  would  have  applauded  what  you  said.  I
think  you  demonstrated  to  us  by  way  of  your  articulations  that  if
we  have  the  will,  we  can  find  the  way.  And  that  is  what  we  are
trying  to  gather  now:  the  will  to  get  this  done,  because  Americans
have  always  had  the  ability  to  find  the  way  once  we  have  applied
the will.

I  would  like  to  just  mention  China  for  a  moment,  if  I  may,  be-
cause  having  visited  China,  you  really  don’t  have  to  be  an  expert
to  see  that  there  really  is  a  problem  there.  It  is  quite  visible.  It  is
almost  intuitively  obvious  to  the  most  casual  of  observers.  And
given  that  it  is  now  a  problem,  given  that  they  are  placing  more
cars on the road, given that they are attracting businesses from all
over the world, given that they are constructing more buildings and
industries,  if  it  is  a  problem  now,  it  surely  is  going  to  become  a
major  problem  in  the  future.  And  the  question  that  we  have  to
grapple  with  is  how  do  we  get  them  to  comply  to  come  on  board
if  we  are  not  on  board.  And  I  am  saying  that  with  as  much  sin-
cerity  as  I  can,  because  I  am  interested  in  having  you,  if  you  can,
to the extent that you can, give some intelligence with reference to
how  do  we  get  this  done,  which  has  to  be  done,  without  having
done  it  ourselves.  Mr.  Rogers,  perhaps  you  can  continue  to  inspire
me.

Mr. ROGERS. That is a very tough question.
I believe very strongly that we have to bring China and India on
board,  not  necessarily  all  of  the  other  developing  countries  at  this
time.  But  it  is  really  a  question  of  leadership.  And  you  are  right
in  your  point  that  it  is  pretty  hard  to  preach  something  when  you
are not doing it yourself. But I think the question that we have to
ask ourselves is can we put a stake in the ground on this issue that
moves us in that direction but, more importantly, allows companies
in  our  country,  like  the  ones  here,  and  other  companies,  like  GE,
who  can  develop  the  technologies  that  they  can  subsequently  sell
into  China  and  India  creates  a  market  for  their  products  but  they
are  products  that  allow  them  to  create  energy  in  a  more  efficient
way  or  to  reduce  emissions,  whether  it  is  SOΧ,  NOΧ,  mercury,  or
CO2. And I think all of those are problems in China and India.

And so my judgment is that we are going to have to lead on this.
I  don’t  think  leadership  translates  into  Kyoto.  I  think  it  is  some-
thing  less  than  that,  because  I  don’t  think  our  country  can  do  it
for  now.  But  I  do  think  we  can  do  something.  And  we  need  to  do
it  and  say  we  will  go  to  this  place,  and  if  India  and  China  are  not
on board at that place, then maybe we don’t go any further. So we
have—I  think,  at  the  end  of  the  day,  we  are  going  to  have  to  go
first in order to bring them along with us.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

And  quite  frankly,  I  am  impressed  with  what  Prime  Minister
Blair is doing. He is taking the G–8 in a couple of months and basi-
cally going to make this issue a primary issue. And he believes that
bringing  both  India  and  China  on  board  is  critical  to  our  success
on this issue.

Mr.  GREEN.  I  welcome  any  additional  comments,  Mr.  Chairman,

if time permits. If not, I will yield back.

Chairman  BOEHLERT.  Time  does  permit.  And  incidentally,  if  we
were  in  a  different  venue,  you  had  said  you  would  stand  up  and
applaud. You can stand up and applaud right here. This venue is—
but  I  don’t  want  you  guys  to  think,  quite  frankly,  that  this  is  all
going  to  be  a  cakewalk  as  you  go  forward.  You  understand  that.
Maybe absent today are some of the most critical of our colleagues
in  terms  of  this  whole  issue,  and  I  am  really  sorry  that  they  have
conflicts and can’t be here, because I would like them to hear what
you are saying. And what you are saying is you are not just altru-
istic in doing what you are doing, providing leadership, and you are
not  just  goodhearted  citizens.  There  is  an  enlightened  self-interest
in doing what you are doing, and it is good for everybody.

So you have got more time, Mr. Green.
Mr. GREEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
If another panel member would care to give a response. Yes, sir.
Mr.  MEISSEN.  Well,  I  can’t  speak  to  what  other  industries  and
companies  are  doing,  but  given  the  nature  of  our  products  and
services  and  our  manufacturing  operations  around  the  world,  we
operate—we have the same standards around the world, and these
are  the  same  standards  on  quality,  but  also  in  environmental
health  and  safety  policies  but  also  on  energy  conservation,  water
conservation,  and  other  resource  conservation.  We  have  a  number
of facilities in China and a few in India that are doing an excellent
job  on  managing  resources  and  operating  in  a  very  cost-effective
manner.  Actually,  a  few  best  practices  are  coming.  So  I  think  that
it first starts with the company. And in our case, we can’t influence
maybe what other companies or larger organizations can do, but we
can  influence  what  we  do.  We  can  set  our  policies.  We  can  set  the
direction we want to go. We can set our strategic focus. We see the
carbon cap and trade schemes emerging around the world, and that
is why we got involved in the Chicago Climate Exchange. The emis-
sions of all of the members of the Chicago Climate Exchange equal
over  c  the  emissions  of  Great  Britain.  And  in  the  first  year  of  our
pilot program, we were able to reduce that eight percent on an ab-
solute  basis.  And  that  is  by  finding  the  most  cost-effective  in  the
different  facilities  and  the  different  organizations  to  implement  a
project that reduces carbon.

And  so  when  you  have  a  multi-sector,  multi-national  organiza-
tion,  you  can  find  the  lowest—I  mean,  the  cost—incremental  cost
to  reduce  carbon  can  be  determined,  and  therefore,  you,  cost-effec-
tively, can reduce it for the whole group.

Mr. GREEN. Yes, sir. Dr. Hobbs.
Dr. HOBBS. Just one more quick thing.
Sometimes  applauding  what  people  are  doing  good  is  a  good
thing,  too,  so  recently  our  Carrier  division  and  the  state  Environ-
mental Protection Agency of China established a China Ozone Pro-
tection  Award.  The  program  recognizes  individuals  and  organiza-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

tions  promoting  the  use  of  non-ozone-depleting  technologies.  That
is not greenhouse, but it is allied, and—but we are trying to project
the  same  kind  of  responsible  image  to  China  that  we  do  in  the
United States.

Mr. GREEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield back.
Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you, Mr. Green.
Chairman Inglis.
Mr.  INGLIS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  That  enlightened  self-in-
terest  you  were  talking  about,  Mr.  Chairman,  comes  home  with
General  Electric  who  makes  those  coal  gasification  turbines  in
Greenville,  so  we  are  very  excited  about  that.  And  I  think  that  it
is something that proves the point that you are making, that indus-
try with enlightened self-interest can do things that really can help
the whole world. So that is exciting.

Also,  Mr.  Rogers,  we  are  excited  about  Duke  Power  looking  at  a
nuclear  power  plant.  I  think  the  best—one  of  the  best  sites  they
could  look  at  is  in  South  Carolina’s  Savannah  River  Site,  particu-
larly  if  they  use  that  technology—use  that  opportunity—your  new
company  uses  that  opportunity  to  create  hydrogen  as  a  byproduct
out  of  that  nuclear  reactor  that  they  would  build.  We  know  a  lot
about  keeping  hydrogen  under  pressure  at  Savannah  River  Site,
because  we  have  kept  tritium  under  pressure  for  30  years  there,
and  so  it  would  be  a  fabulous  place  for  Duke  Power  to  do  this,  to
start  moving  us  toward  fixing  what  Dr.  McFarland  was  talking
about,  at  least  B  of  that  sector  being  transportation.  If  we  can  cre-
ate hydrogen and move toward a hydrogen economy that could pro-
pel  us  in  cars,  it  would  be  a  fabulous  thing.  And  we  have  got  an
opportunity with that next nuclear reactor. And I hope, Mr. Chair-
man, that that becomes an opportunity for us to work in a very bi-
partisan  way,  and  also  biophilosophical,  if  that  is  a  word,  way  be-
tween conservationists and environmentalists. Conservationists are
people  who  want  to  conserve  things.  Environmentalists  are  people
who  have,  perhaps,  a  slightly  different  worldview  or  a  different
worldview  than  conservationists,  but  there  is  agreement,  it  seems
to me, or potential for agreement on things like moving toward hy-
drogen, especially if you did it through nuclear.

So  that  is  a  little  bit  of  preaching  there  about  the  opportunities

that are available.

And the question—I would follow up in what Mr. Green was ask-
ing  about.  It  seems  to  me  that  if  we  are  to  encourage  China  and
India  to  do  what  we  have  now  figured  out  to  do  because  our  tech-
nology has gotten us to the place where we can do it, if we can get
them, in some way, to go with that technology right off the starting
line rather than to retrofit later. I have got to assume it is far more
expensive—and  this  is  your  experience.  I  have  got  to  assume  it  is
far  more  expensive  to  retrofit  an  investment  you  already  have.  If
we could encourage them to somehow get involved in this new tech-
nology,  like  coal  gasification  turbines  made  by  General  Electric,  to
buy  those  first  rather  than  build  the  quick  and  easy  now,  come
back  later  and  find  it  cost-prohibitive  to  go  that—can—anybody
want to comment on how you can encourage people to do that? Ob-
viously, your companies are leaders in this.

Mr.  ROGERS.  I  think  it  is  really  critical  that  when  new  power
plants  are  built  in  China  and  India  they  use  the  best  available

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

technology.  And  you  are  right.  I  mean,  as  a  company  that  in  the
Midwest  we  will  have  spent,  over  the  last  decade  and  looking  for-
ward  to  2010,  almost  $4  billion  on  retrofits  in  terms  of  putting
scrubbers on the back end of plants and putting SCRs to take NOΧ
out  and  take  SO2 out  and  to  combine  they  take  mercury  out.  It  is
smarter  to  do  it  on  the  front  end.  And  when  you  build  a  power
plant,  whether  you  build  it  in  China  or  you  build  it  in  the  United
States,  you  are  building  that  plant  to  be  there  for  40  to  50  years.
And that is why it is so important in this country, and that is why
I  am  so  much  a  pragmatist  about  this.  I  am—all  across  our  coun-
try,  power  companies,  over  the  next  three  to  five  years,  are  going
to  be  making  decisions  about  the  next  generation  of  power  plants
to build. We don’t even know what the rules are on SOΧ, NOΧ, and
mercury.  We  don’t  know  what  the  rules  are  on  carbon.  But  we  all
instinctively  know  that  they  are  going  to  be  tighter  than  they  are
today and that we will have carbon rules. And because we will, we
are forced to look at nuclear more, look at coal gasification because
those  are  lower-cost  approaches  to  taking  it  out.  If  you  looked  at
a coal plant today and you—and if this is the coal plant where the
retrofits  have  been  put  on,  probably  only  that  much  of  the  coal
plant  is  where  the  power  is  generated.  All  of  the  rest  is  to  clean
up the air byproduct. If you look at a coal gasification facility, what
you see is you could do it cheaper, take the SOΧ, NOΧ, and mercury
out, on the front end, and so you don’t have to build this huge facil-
ity  on  the  back  end  of  the  power  generation.  And  that  is  about  as
technical as I ever get.

But  my  point  is  that  these  decisions  are  40-  and  50-year  deci-
sions. And so to your point, if we can lead with our technology and
to set—help them and do it ourselves, set guidelines and goal lines,
I think we have the ability to make the right decisions, rather than
make the wrong decision and have to fix it 15 years from now.

Mr. INGLIS. Anybody else want to comment about that?
Dr.  MCFARLAND.  On  the  issue  of  leadership  and  bringing  the
other  countries,  China  and  India,  on  board,  it  is  also  a  matter  of
implementing those technologies here to bring the costs down. And
also,  there  is  a  long-term  issue  here  that  we,  to  solve  this  issue,
are  going  to  have  to  have  breakthrough  technologies,  and  devel-
oping  and  providing  the  market  signals  to  implement  those  tech-
nologies  in  the  long  run  are  going  to  be  absolutely  critical  to  solv-
ing this long-term global issue.

This  isn’t  a  sprint.  It  is  a  marathon.  We  have  got  to  get  started
now.  It  is  going  to  take  decades  to  really,  truly  address  this  issue.
You  know,  just  to  put  it  in  perspective,  to  achieve  the  goals  of  the
Framework  Convention  on  Climate  Change,  which  I  like  to  talk
about  rather  than  the  Kyoto  protocol,  some  time  in  the  next  75  to
150  years,  global  average  per  capita  emissions  of  carbon  must  be
one-tenth  of  what  they  are  today  in  the  United  States  and  con-
tinuing  to  fall.  The  more  you  emit  now,  the  less  you  can  emit  in
the  future.  So  it  says  you  start  now,  you  take  incremental  steps,
and you prepare for the future.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you.
The gentleman’s time has expired.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

To paraphrase an old adage, Dr. McFarland, a journey of decades
starts  with  the  first  day  of  forward  movement,  and  you  guys  are
moving forward. Thank you.

Mr. Wu.
Mr.  WU.  I  would  like  to  commend  the  Chairman  for  his  leader-
ship on this issue and thank the panel, Mr. Rogers, Dr. McFarland,
Mr. Meissen, Dr. Hobbs, for your private sector leadership and the
enterprises  which  you  represent,  whether  it  is  Cinergy  or  DuPont
or  United  Technologies  or  Baxter.  Thank  you  very  much  for  pro-
viding that private sector leadership.

I don’t have a question for you all so much as I have a comment
about what is going on in the public sector on this issue. Now I am
way past the age where I take newspaper stories at face value, but
there  is  a  front-page  story  in  today’s  New  York  Times  by  Andrew
Revkin. And anything that says that a former American Petroleum
Institute  official  is  now  the  Chief  of  Staff  for  the  White  House
Council  on  Environmental  Quality  sort  of  gets  me  to  read  the  rest
of the article. And the rest of the article proved rather interesting,
because  it  turns  out  that  this  attorney  with  an  economics  back-
ground has been editing science reports on climate. And here is an
example  of  a  paragraph,  which  he  crossed  out  from  a  scientific  re-
port.

The  paragraph  would  have  read,  and  this  is  all  crossed  out,
‘‘Warming  will  also  cause  reductions  in  mountain  glaciers  and  ad-
vance  the  timing  of  the  melt  of  mountain  snow  peaks  in  polar  re-
gions.  In  turn,  runoff  rates  will  change,  and  flood  potential  will  be
altered  in  ways  that  are  currently  not  well  understood.  There  will
be significant shifts in the seasonality of runoff that will have seri-
ous  effects  on  native  populations  that  rely  on  fishing  and  hunting
for  their  livelihood.  These  changes  will  be  further  complicated  by
shifts  in  precipitation  regimes  and  a  possible  intensification  in  in-
creased frequency in extreme hydrologic events.’’

‘‘Extreme  hydrologic  events’’  is  what  I  think  we,  in  the  North-
west,  call  a  flood.  And  this  is  all  redacted  from  a  scientific  report.
And  it  would  be  disturbing  in  and  of  itself  were  it  not  for  the  fact
that in the story, it said that ‘‘critics admit that while all Adminis-
trations routinely vet government reports, scientific content in such
reports  should  be  reviewed  by  scientists,’’  and  that,  further,
‘‘politicization  by  the  White  House  has  fed  back  directly  into  the
science program in such a way as to undermine the credibility and
integrity  of  scientific  programs  with  a  chilling  effect  and  has  cre-
ated  a  sense  of  frustration  among  scientists.’’  And  there  is  a  com-
ment of the National Academy of Sciences that they warn that the
Administration’s procedures for vetting reports on climate could re-
sult in excessive political interference with science.

Now  you  all  have  provided  terrific  private  sector  leadership  in
this  arena,  and  Mr.  Chairman,  you  and  others  on  this  committee
have  provided  leadership  on  this  issue  in  terms  of  science.  And  I
would  submit  that  we  have  an  oversight  responsibility  to  make
sure  that  the  integrity  of  the  scientific  process  is  maintained  no
matter  what  the  current  political  climate  may  be.  There  is  always
a  limit  to  what  we  can  do,  whether  that  is  technologic  or  political,
but we must exert best efforts.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

As you know, Mr. Chairman, on my side of the aisle, I have been
a relative moderate on climate change issues. I have been more fo-
cused  on  backyard  issues  than  global  change  issues,  but  I  do  find
that  a  twisting  of  the  scientific  process  is  very  disturbing  to  me,
and I would like to submit this June 8 New York Times article into
the  record  of  the  hearing  and  yield  back  the  balance  of  my  time.

[The information follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you.
From one relative moderate to another, the Chair now recognizes

Dr. Ehlers.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  would  just  observe
that  when  I  stopped  reading  the  New  York  Times,  I  increased  the
amount of time I had available and reduced my anxiety level. That
is  offered  in  jest,  by  the  way.  I  don’t  want  a  New  York  Times  edi-
torial  about  the  know-nothing  attitude  in  the  Science  Committee.
I  had  several  questions  I  was  going  to  ask.  Many  of  them  have

been touched upon.

questions.

Let  me  summarize  with  a  few  comments  and  some  additional

First of all, on Mr. Green’s question and the answers.
I  certainly  agree  that  China  and  India  are  the  greatest  problem
in the near future, but I think the Kyoto treaty was fatally flawed
by  not  setting  up  a  timeline  for  every  nation.  And  the  reason  for
that  was  alluded  to  by  Mr.  Rogers,  in  your  comment  that  energy
investments  tend  to  be  very  long-term  investments.  And  if,  for  ex-
ample,  Uganda  and  Costa  Rica  knew  that  they  were  going  to  be
subject  to  the  treaty  requirements  in  2020,  they  would  make  far
different  investment  decisions  now  than  they  would  make  if  they
knew they didn’t have to worry about it until some time in the fu-
ture,  and  they  wouldn’t  have  to  make  retroactive  changes.  So  I
really  think  every  nation  has  to  be—has  to  know  it  is  going  to  af-
fect  them,  because  clearly  in  sunny  climates,  particularly  central
Africa,  our  good  investments  in  solar  energy  over  the  long  run
might  be  much  more  productive  than  investments  in  burning  coal.

That was just a comment.
But  Mr.  Rogers,  also  in  your  testimony,  you  seemed  to  suggest
that  restrictions  on  greenhouse  gas  emissions  can  result  in  leader-
ship  and  technology  and  advanced  competitiveness.  I  think  that  is
a  very  important  factor  that  we  tend  to  overlook  too  often  on  the
Congress,  and  I  have  been  impressed  with  those  countries  that
have  adopted,  including,  at  times,  the  United  States,  that  have
adopted  advanced  requirements.  They  have  led  to  developments  of
entire  new  industries  in  environmental  control  and  which  imme-
diately  becomes  an  export  business  when  other  countries  have
dropped  those  same  requirements.  But  it  seems  to  me  that  is  al-
ways  forgotten,  or  else  ignored,  by  those  who  say  there  is  no  cli-
mate change. We could—if in fact we are wrong in that, or they are
wrong  on  it,  we  could  be  in  the  situation  of  having  to  import  our
environmental  controls  rather  than  being  in  the  position  of  devel-
oping  them,  as  Dr.  Hobbs  says,  and  exporting  them.  Does  that
make sense to you, or am I in La-La Land here?

Mr.  ROGERS.  No,  I  think  you  make  a  very  good  point.  And  at
great  risk,  I  am  reminded  of  a  series  of  articles  that  were  in  the
New  York  Times  over  the  last  week  talking  about  the  innovation
and  the  new  technologies  in  Japan,  because  they  are  very  focused
on  reducing  their  emissions  of  carbon  and  greenhouse  gases.  And
it reminded me that, you know, there is an advantage to countries
who know they are going to have to deal with this. It is an advan-
tage  of  going  to  work,  developing  the  technology,  and  solving  the
problem.  And  I  believe  that  we  might  be  left  behind,  because  we
don’t have the same motivation here, although these companies are

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

just such wonderful examples of people that are looking ahead. Be-
cause  I  think  the  reason  that  they  are  looking  ahead  is  because
they  know  eventually,  or  inevitably,  that  there  are  going  to  be  re-
quirements  and  that  they  will  make  money  off  of  these  tech-
nologies. And they see it as a trend that is occurring, and they are
positioning themselves for it.

So I support your point very strongly.
Mr. EHLERS. It seems to me that our business community in the
United States is, in many ways, ahead of both the political commu-
nity  and  the  general  public  on  that  issue,  and  that  is  particularly
displayed by the folks represented here.

Two other quick points.
First  of  all,  Dr.  Hobbs,  I—as  a  scientist,  I  have  to  take  a  little
exception  to  the  suggestion  that  you  can  just  reverse  an  air  condi-
tioner  and  put  in  heat  and  get  electricity  out.  I  don’t  want  people
to  think  that  they  can  buy  this  thing  and  just  put  a  switch  on  it
and flip it and run it backwards.

Dr.  HOBBS.  Yeah,  you  have  to  change  a  couple  of  valves,  but  it

is not much worse—not much more than that.

Mr. EHLERS. Well, we will have to talk about that.
But your second point that you added later is the most important
one.  It  is  very  much  dependent  on  the  quality  of  the  heat  you  are
working with. If you have high-energy content heat, it is very sim-
ple.  If  you  have  low-energy  content,  it  is  hard  to  beat  the  econom-
ics,  and  I  hope  we  can.  One  thing  we  can’t  beat  are  the  laws  of
thermodynamics, of course. That is our ultimate limitation.
Just quickly picking up on Mr. Sodrel’s excellent question.
I  think  another  factor  that  is  involved  in  this  is  that  as  fuel
prices  increase,  and  this  is  not  a  short-term  phenomenon,  even
though  they  may  drop  next  year  for  a  few  years,  but  long-term,
there  are  going  to  be  sharp  uptake  as  we  deplete  our  fossil  fuel,
but  particularly  petroleum  and  natural  gas  resources.  Many  new
approaches are going to become economically feasible, so that is an-
other  factor  that  says,  you  know,  things  that  don’t  look  feasible
now,  from  an  economic  standpoint,  will  be  feasible  in  10  years,  15
years, and so let us get the ground work done.

And  I  can’t  let  this  pass  without  getting  in  a  very  strong  state-
ment saying that that is why it is absolutely important for the gov-
ernment  to  continue  to  support  fundamental  research  so  that  you
fellows can pick up the results of that and apply it in a very prag-
matic  way  and  solve  these  problems  and  make  things  more  eco-
nomically  feasible.  If  we  don’t  step  up  to  the  plate,  as  we  should
in  the  Congress  and  fund  the  fundamental  research,  it  is  going
leave you folks high and dry in the future. If we do that, it is going
to give you lots of opportunities for applied research technology de-
velopment that is going to benefit not only you but the entire coun-
try.

As  you  said,  it  is  better  to  preach  than  to  meddle,  and  so  I  de-

cided I should preach instead of meddle in your business.

So that is the end of my sermon, Mr. Chairman. Thank you very

much.

Chairman BOEHLERT. Thank you, Pastor—I mean, Dr. Ehlers.
Listen, we have got truth in advertising. Dr. Ehlers is a very dis-
tinguished scientist in his own right. He is a fellow of the American

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

Physical  Society  and  one  of  the  strengths  of  this  committee.  And
I thank you for your observations.

I  am  going  to  speak  shortly.  I  am  going  to  have  a  whole  room
full  of  lobbyists  from  the  high-tech  industries  meeting  on  Capitol
Hill.  And  part  of  my  message  to  them  is  we  want  you  to  lobby  us
more, because we have to be strong advocates for more investment
in  fundamental  research.  We  have  to  be  strong  advocates  in  more
investment in K–12 science and math education. We are competing
in  the  global  marketplace,  and  we  are  not  doing  as  well  as  we
should.

And  so—but  part  of  the  reason  we  are  doing  better  than  some
people  think  is  the  panel  before  us  and  the  companies  you  rep-
resent  and  the  leadership  you  are  providing  in  a  very  important,
sensitive area.

So  I  thank  you  for  being  facilitators  and  resources  for  this  com-
mittee. We will follow-up with some additional questions, as I indi-
cated. In the meantime, have a good day.

This meeting is adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 12:05 p.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(67)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Dr. Mack McFarland, Environmental Manager, Fluorochemicals Busi-

ness, E.I. DuPont De Nemours and Company

Q1. If you have any views on federal technology programs that you believe could help
reduce  greenhouse  emissions  with  improved  focus  or  additional  funding,  please
provide them to the Committee.

A1. While  many  of  DuPont’s  greenhouse  gas  reductions  have  involved  non-CO2
process gases, we recognize that energy related technologies will be the predominant
source  of  GHG  reductions.  We  therefore  believe  the  following  areas  are  important
to pursue (not all of which lie in the Committee’s purview).

• There  are  a  range  of  energy  efficiency  and  alternative  energy  provisions  in
the House and Senate energy bills currently in conference that we believe are
beneficial,  including  from  the  Senate  bill  provisions  1521,  1522,  1529,  1527,
1524, 1506, 1508, 1501, 1507.
• As  a  general  matter  support  for  co-generation  and  other  forms  of  distributed
• The  Department  of  Energy’s  biofuels  program,  under  which  we  are  collabo-
rating on an Integrated Corn Based Biorefinery, provides great promise to ad-
vance non-fossil fuels.
• There  are  a  range  of  energy  efficiency  and  renewable  energy  matters  on

generation can help to make energy use more efficient.

which additional R&D can yield significant benefits. They include;

to distillation.

• Continuing advances in low cost, distributed process energy instrumenta-
tion  that  can  be  installed  without  a  shut-down.  Concurrent  advances  in
control room energy monitoring supervised by expert systems.
• Continuing  development  to  improve  the  reliability  and  efficiency  and  de-
crease  the  capital  cost  of:  insulation  and  steam  traps,  topping  cycles,  re-
covery of waste b pressure generators, modern motors.
• Long-term development of separation technologies that are an alternative
• Decreasing  the  capital  cost  for  renewable  energy  equipment  with  par-
• Significantly reducing the purity required for any fuel used in a fuel cell.
• Addressing  the  large  scale  electrical  energy  storage  problems  (environ-
• Improving the efficiency and reliability and reduce the cost for the trans-
• Decreasing  the  environmental  impact  of  storage  and  production  of  all

ticular attention to solar and large stationary CHP and fuel cells.

mental footprint, durability and cost).

mission of electricity.

forms of biomass.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(69)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TOM CATANIA

VICE PRESIDENT, GOVERNMENT RELATIONS

WHIRLPOOL CORPORATION

Whirlpool Corporation is the world’s leading manufacturer and marketer of major
home  appliances  with  annual  sales  of  over  $13  billion,  producing  42  million  appli-
ances  per  year,  and  employing  68,000  employees.  We  have  50  manufacturing  and
technology  research  centers  around  the  globe.  Whirlpool  markets  Whirlpool,
KitchenAid,  Brastemp,  Bauknecht,  Consul,  and  other  major  brand  names  to  con-
sumers in more than 170 countries. We have nine major manufacturing facilities in
the  United  States.  Of  these,  our  plant  in  Clyde,  Ohio  is  the  world’s  largest  clothes
washer  plant.  Our  plant  in  Marion,  Ohio  is  the  world’s  largest  dryer  plant  and  our
plant in Findlay, Ohio is the world’s largest dishwasher plant.

Whirlpool  Corporation  respectfully  submits  the  following  testimony  together  with
the  attached  slides  describing  what  we  are  doing  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emis-
sions.  Some  may  still  debate  whether  the  science  is  definitive  about  the  causes  of
global  climate  change  or  even  whether  it  is,  in  fact,  occurring.  Despite  any  remain-
ing  uncertainty,  though,  Whirlpool  Corporation  believes  prudence  dictates  that,
when existing solutions are available to mitigate a company and its products’ impact
on the environment, they are worth pursuing especially where, as has been our ex-
perience,  many  of  those  solutions  are  not  only  a  win  for  the  environment  and  the
consumer, but also for our employees and our shareholders.

Whirlpool  Corporation  is  first  and  foremost  a  consumer  and  brand  focused  home
appliance  company.  Our  tens  of  thousands  of  shareholders  and  employees  and  tens
of millions of consumers expect us to fulfill our commitments to them to the utmost
of our collective ability, and they also assume that we can exceed their expectations
while  minimizing  our  impact  on  the  environment.  We  take  those  expectations  to
heart.  We  have  found  that  reducing  the  greenhouse  gas  emissions  impact  of  our
company and its products is quite compatible with what some see as a more narrow
mission  of  being  a  profit-maximizing  home  appliance  manufacturer  and  marketer.
Market-based Incentives and Public/Private Partnerships

We  believe  that  GHG  emissions  reductions  can  be  achieved  most  effectively  and
quickly through an appropriate balance of regulatory measures, market-based incen-
tives, and public/private partnerships. Such incentives include a manufacturer’s tax
credit  such  as  the  one  being  debated  in  the  current  Energy  Bill  for  super  energy-
efficient  appliances.  It  could  also  include  demand-side  management  incentives  to
consumers that encourage them to choose more energy efficient appliances. One ex-
ample  nearby  was  the  state  of  Maryland’s  exemption  of  ENERGY  STAR  appli-
ances  from  state  sales  tax.  This  program  saw  a  21  percent  increase  in  the  sales  of
ENERGY STAR appliances.

If  the  Appliance  Manufacturer  Tax  Credit  were  passed  by  Congress  this  year  in
the  Energy  Bill,  it  would  save  over  200  trillion  BTUs  of  energy,  or  the  equivalent
of taking 2.3 million cars off the road, or eliminating the need for 6 coal-fired power
plants for a year. The bill would also reduce the amount of water necessary to wash
clothes  by  870  billion  gallons  or  approximately  the  amount  of  water  necessary  to
meet  the  needs  of  every  household  in  a  city  the  size  of  Phoenix,  Arizona  for  two
years.
If, for example, the state of Ohio were to pass a four-year, state sales tax exemp-
tion for consumers of ENERGY STAR  clothes washers, dishwashers, refrigerators,
and  dehumidifiers,  the  carbon  savings  would  be  224,107  m/t.  The  CO2 avoided
would  be  822,472  m/t;  and  consumers  would  have  $261  million  more  to  put  back
into the economy and pay for other products and services.
Public-private  market  transformation  partnerships  that  have  been  successful  in-
clude  the  ENERGY  STAR  program  implemented  by  the  U.S.  Environmental  Pro-
tection  Agency  and  the  Department  of  Energy.  This  program  is  voluntary  and  yet
has  become  competitively  mandatory  in  the  sense  that,  if  a  manufacturer  does  not
participate in the program, the manufacturer risks losing market share. It is an ex-
cellent  program  that  transforms  consumer  education  into  an  opportunity  for  manu-
facturers  to  successfully  market  a  more  environmentally  friendly  product  at  a  pre-
mium.  Today,  over  40  percent  of  the  appliances  in  the  ENERGY  STAR  product
categories meet or exceed the ENERGY STAR levels.
If  all  new  appliances  sold  in  the  United  States  were  ENERGY  STAR  qualified,
the  electricity  saved  in  one  year  would  be  3.4  billion  kWh,  the  gas  saved  would  be
109  million  kWh,  the  carbon  emissions  avoided  would  be  2.4  million  metric  tons,
and the savings in monthly electricity bills would be $618 million.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

Voluntary Cap and Trade Program

If  a  voluntary  cap  and  trade  program  offers  true  incentives  for  our  industry  to
reduce  GHGs,  then  such  a  program  would  be  helpful,  too.  However,  the  current
thoughts  on  cap  and  trade  programs  do  not  incentivize  our  industry  to  participate
since  the  proposed  programs  do  not  credit  our  industry  with  savings  from  the  life-
cycle use of the product—the largest portion of GHG emissions reductions for appli-
ance manufacturing. In 2000, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) reported
that  in  1999,  28  percent  of  all  residential  electricity  consumption  in  the  U.S.  came
from the use of white goods (refrigerators, dryers, freezers, clothes washers, cooking,
and  dishwashers).  The  UK  Ecolabelling  Board  reported  in  1992  that  the  cradle-to-
grave assessment of the environmental impact of clothes washers was allocated such
that less than 10 percent of the impact came from production, distribution, and dis-
posal of the product. Whereas, life-cycle use of the product accounted for over 90 per-
cent of the environmental impact. This shows that, if the government wants to moti-
vate appliance manufacturers to participate in a meaningful cap and trade program,
then  it  needs  to  provide  credit  for  the  power  plant  emissions  reduced  or  avoided
through the increased energy efficiency of our products.

We  currently  do  not  participate  in  the  1605b  voluntary  emissions  reduction  pro-
gram because there is no clear benefit for our participation since our indirect emis-
sions reductions would not be credited in the proposed final interim guidelines. They
should  be.  Also,  we  are  already  reducing  emissions  voluntarily  and  so  there  is  no
incentive  to  become  mired  in  a  complex  and  burdensome  emissions  reporting  pro-
gram.  Additionally,  1605b  fails  to  recognize  emissions  reductions  made  before  the
2003 reporting period.
Unilateral Reductions

Whirlpool  Corporation  has  committed  to  reducing  its  GHG  emissions  globally  by
three percent during the period 1998 through 2008 despite a nearly 40 percent pro-
jected  increase  in  production  volumes.  A  description  of  this  commitment  is  in  the
attached  presentation.  Whirlpool  Corporation  made  this  commitment  because  it  is
the right thing to do and it is a possible thing to do while still addressing our busi-
ness  objectives  of  producing  consumer-demanded  products,  employing  people,  and
generating  profits.  As  national,  regional,  and  global  plans  are  developed  to  address
climate  change,  care  should  be  taken  to  analyze  the  overall  climate  impact  of  any
particular  measure.  For  example,  banning  the  use  of  a  particular  greenhouse  gas-
emitting compound as a refrigerant or refrigerator wall insulation material, may be
a  net  climate  detriment  if  its  impact  in  the  product  is  to  decrease  its  energy  effi-
ciency.
What Whirlpool has done and will continue to do

I  am  submitting  a  detailed  presentation  of  what  Whirlpool  Corporation  has  done
in  the  past  to  address  GHG  emissions,  however,  I  will  briefly  cover  a  few  of  the
highlights here.
Whirlpool  has  earned  the  ENERGY  STAR  Partner  of  the  Year  award  six  times
since 1999. Whirlpool has led in the crafting of all major appliance efficiency legisla-
tion since 1975 and in the crafting of every appliance efficiency standard since 1990.
The  appliance  industry  as  a  whole  has  contributed  significantly  to  energy  effi-
ciency  and  consumer  savings  over  the  years.  Today’s  refrigerator  uses  61  percent
less  energy  than  in  1983,  saving  the  consumer  $59/year  vs.  a  20-year  old  unit.
Whirlpool’s  side-by-side  refrigerators  use  619  kWh/year,  equal  to  a  75-watt  light
bulb.  In  1980,  as  reported  by  the  EIA  in  2001,  it  took  $87  per  year  to  operate  the
average  clothes  washer  and,  in  2001,  the  cost  dropped  to  only  $25  a  year  for  the
highly efficient Whirlpool Duet.

Whirlpool  was  the  first  appliance  manufacturer  to  announce  in  2003  a  global
greenhouse  gas  emissions  reduction  target.  Using  1998  annual  total  global  emis-
sions  from  product  manufacturing,  product  lifetime  energy  use,  and  any  emissions
associated  with  product  disposal  as  our  baseline,  Whirlpool  will  decrease  our  abso-
lute  total  emissions  by  three  percent  by  2008.  This  reduction  will  occur  despite  a
projected increase in unit sales by nearly 40 percent during that period. Such a re-
duction  results  in  an  annual  savings  of  four  million  metric  tons  of  carbon  in  abso-
lute savings and fifteen million metric tons of carbon annually compared to our 1998
per unit rate of emissions. Fifteen million metric tons represents the elimination of
28  coal-fired  power  plants  and  the  equivalent  of  10  million  fewer  cars  on  the  road.
This commitment is a global effort. This is something very important to recognize
given  that  the  Kyoto  Protocol  and  a  few  other  recent  climate  change  proposals  do
not  address  climate  change  on  a  truly  global  basis.  Our  emissions  per  unit  reduc-
tions from 1998 to 2008 are projected to be over 20 percent for production in Europe,
India, and China and nearly 30 percent for production in the U.S. and Canada.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

Closing

I appreciate the opportunity to provide comments on this important subject today.
In  summary,  Whirlpool  Corporation  knows  that  it  can  contribute  meaningfully  to  a
reduction  in  greenhouse  gas  emissions  without  jeopardizing  its  leading  global  posi-
tion  in  the  industry.  In  fact,  working  on  energy  and  water  efficiency  has  helped  us
develop some of the products that are most profitable and loved by consumers. How-
ever,  we  believe  this  virtuous  cycle  is  created  through  market-based  mechanisms
that encourage technological innovation, allow flexibility in global production, credit
indirect  emissions  reductions  that  occur  during  the  use  of  the  product,  and  consist-
ently  support  public-private  partnerships  that  stimulate  consumers  into  action.  We
look  forward  to  working  with  you  in  the  future  on  this  important  matter.  Thank
you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

108

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

110

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

111

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

112

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

113

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

114

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

115

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

116

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

117

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

118

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

119

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

120

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

121

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

122

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

123

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

124

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

125

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

126

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

127

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

128

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

129

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

130

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00134 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

131

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00135 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

132

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00136 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

133

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00137 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

134

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00138 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

135

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00139 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

136

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00140 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

137

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00141 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

138

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00142 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

139

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00143 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

140

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00144 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

141

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 06:48 Nov 12, 2005 Jkt 021708 PO 00000 Frm 00145 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL05\060805\21708 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

